Authors
Ben Hoffman
Number of Reviews
325

Title
Review for Twilight of the Golds, The (1997) (TV)
The most relevant, thoughtful, provocative and timely film so far
this year, TWILIGHT OF THE GOLDS will give you something to think
about long after you have left the theater.  Based on a play by
Jonathan Tolin, this wonderful film is at once controversial and
entertaining. . . controversial only because the moviegoer is
forced into asking himself/herself, What should have been done?
There are no easy answers.
Walter Gold (The lovable actor, director, writer Garry Marshall)
and his wife, Phyllis (the equally famous Faye Dunaway) are the
parents of Suzanne (Jennifer Beals) and David (Brendan Fraser).
Although David is gay, his family has long ago made peace with
themselves about his homosexuality; in short, he is their dear son
and they love and accept him and his lifestyle.
The loving family is made further happy with the announcement by
Jennifer and her husband, Rob (Jon Tenney) who is a geneticist,
that Walter and Phyllis Gold will soon be grandparents. After a
series of tests to reveal sex, birth defects, etc. are performed
on the baby, there is good news and bad news.  The good news is
that the baby has no inherited illnesses; the bad news is that the
baby is carrying a gene which is found in 90% of gay men. The
chances are very great that the child, a male, will grow up gay.
As of this writing, there has been no medical breakthrough that
reveals a specific "gay gene."    However, for purposes of the
movie, it fits in perfectly.
What to do?  Do they opt to continue with the pregnancy and have a
child who will suffer the same hurts that David has had to endure
in growing up?  (How about that some of the hurts may have been
caused by the parents until they could "adjust?") Or should they
in the best interests of their potential son (of course!) abort
the pregnancy?
When David learns that there is that problem of the child being
gay and that there is abortion under discussion . . . but by no
means a final decision . . . he is hurt and furious, asking his
parents, "Would you have wanted an abortion if you had known I was
going to be gay?"
This is a "liberal" family but even families that are liberal and
loving find that there are always tough decisions in life . . .
and the Golds are now having the biggest they have ever had to
face.
Among others in the cast are Sean O'Brien, John Schlesinger and
Rosie O'Donnell.

Title
Review for Dead Man Walking (1995)
     Among the bitterest disagreements people have (right after
religion) is on the subject of the death penalty.  Put at its basic
is "an eye for an eye" vs. "Who is man that he should play God?
There are many sub-issues to the arguments and DEAD MAN WALKING
takes on many of them.  The film is based on a book by Sister Helen
Prejean, C.S.J., but dramatic liberties are inevitably taken as this
is not a documentary.  The basic story, however, is true.
     Matthew Poncelet (Sean Penn) is in prison after having been
found guilty of rape and then the killing of the teenage lovers.
Penn's performance is superb, now cocky, now desperate, sneering and
laughing with disdain.  Sister Helen Prejean (Susan Sarandon)
learns about Poncelet and, understanding his anguish, decides to try
to comfort him despite his horrible crimes.  At the same time, the
nun has to consider the feelings of the parents of the slain couple,
the fierceness of their understandable hatred and their wanting full
retribution knowing that their children are gone forever. Director
Robbins keeps everything as fair as possible
     Sister Prejean is asked by Poncelet to be his spiritual advisor
and to accompany him in his last moments before the execution.  It
is the final hour before his death that lifts the film onto a new
plateau as we are shown, in detail, what happens at an execution to
the prisoner, to the parents who want to watch, to the warden and
the jailers, the reporters.  It is a film to make you think and to
think hard.
     Robert Prosky has the role of the lawyer who seeks a
last-minute stay of execution.

Title
Review for Englishman Who Went Up a Hill But Came Down a Mountain, The (1995)
     In 1917, WW I was going strong in England.  Everyone was involved
in the war effort. This film's story, probably a myth or legend which
was passed on to writer-director Christopher Monger by his grandfather,
is about a now non-existent town in Wales, and a couple of Englishman
who were sent to survey the terrain for purposes of having accurate map
information should the war spread there.
     Two men, Reginald Anson (Hugh Grant) and George Garrad (Ian
MacNeice) are the surveyors.  Specifically, there job is to measure the
town's most famous attraction, its mountain.  When Garrad makes an
educated guess before the actual survey begins that it probably is some
number of feet short of being a mountain and so is really a hill, the
townspeople, a weird lot, are furious and determined it will be a
mountain.
     The film is a delightful and charming farce.  When the two
surveyors do the actual measuring they find that, indeed, the mountain
is rather a hill, short by fifteen feet.  Outrage sweeps the town's folk.
What they do, among other things, to keep the mountain designation,
includes inviting the beautiful Betty of Cardiff (Tara Fitzgerald) to
help persuade the surveyors to stick around while the hill is turned
into a mountain.
     THE ENGLISHMAN (and the rest of the title which will not fit on
any marquee) is one of the better comedies so far this year.

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
     The idea that ancient civilizations were visited by Beings from
another planet has long been a source of mystery and wonderment for us
on Earth.  Could they have made the pyramids?  Could they be
responsible for the tremendously heavy statues on Easter Island?
Director Roland Emmerich and co-writer Dean Devlin, have made an
entertaining film that approaches the subject of inter-planetary
visitors not from the standpoint of "could they have " but rather "what
if they really did come here?"
     "StarGate" refers to the entrance-way from one world or galaxy
into another.  When an ancient artifact is discovered near the Great
Pyramids of Giza in Egypt that could lead to our learning the origin of
our civilization, both the military and civilian authorities show great
interest.
     Representing the military is Colonel Jack O'Neil (Kurt Russell),
the hard-nosed investigator of the artifact.  Representing a different
viewpoint (openness rather than secrecy) is Daniel Jackson (James
Spader), a brilliant Egyptologist.   Along with a small group of men
they embark on the journey to the "other side" of the Universe.  It
seems that going through the StarGate scrambles the molecules of their
being and are re-assembled when they reach their destination.
     What they find when they arrive and what they learn of the people
and their origin is a fascinating story. Their fight for life against
the ruler, Ra (Jaye Davidson), and even a love interest in the "other"
world, the beautiful Sha'uri (Mili Avital) makes for exciting science
fiction; if that is a genre that turns you on, go for it.

Title
Review for Blue Sky (1994)
     The plus side of BLUE SKY is that both principals have roles in
with which they have not been previously associated.  Hank Marshall
(Tommy Lee Jones) is a military scientist who loves his work as a
nuclear engineer.  He also is a kind, tolerant family man whose wife,
Carly, (Jessica Lange) is the sexiest woman on the military base.
Jones as a reserved husband dedicated to both his work and his family,
is a switch from the intense obsessive character he was in The
Fugitive.
     The beautiful Jessica Lange who, in THE MUSIC BOX, was the
attorney who defended her father accused of being a Nazi criminal, is
here a most delightful, uninhibited wife who likes to dress like
Marilyn Monroe and have her hair done like Elizabeth Taylor, does a
sexy dance with Colonel Vince Johnson (Powers Boothe) that makes the
famous dance scene in THE SCENT OF A WOMAN seem like kid stuff.   One
moment she is Bardot, another she is Hayworth.
     So why is the movie not as good as it could have been?  Mostly
because it has a sub-plot about a cover up by the military when they
allow a nuclear explosion to send radiation to people from nearby
locations.   The two stories, the Marshall family and the nuclear cover
up do not blend well together.   The film should have concentrated on
Lange and Jones or the nuclear underground testing (leaving the sky
blue ... as in the film's title) or it should have had more about
nuclear testing. Instead, both are short-changed.
     Fine acting by Jones, Lange and Boothe ... and do not forget the
dance.   Others in the cast are Carrie Snodgrass, Amy Locane, and Chris
O'Donnell.

Title
Review for Only You (1994)
     So what if it is only a romantic fairy tale, a comedy, the kind
they used to do in the 1930s?  Maybe that is what we need right around
now after so many heavy films, something we can just sit back and enjoy
and laugh and not worry about whether or not anything up on the screen
could possibly happen.  If you are in the mood for that, this is you
movie.
     Marisa Tomei is so pretty in a non-Hollywood way, so wholesome and
lovable that you just wish you could hold her in your arms and live
happily ever after.  When, as Faith, she meets up with Peter (Robert
Downey Jr.) another handsome, non-grunge, and he needs only one glimpse
to fall completely in love with her, we are delighted for them.
     When Faith was a child, her Ouija board came up with the name,
D-A-M-O-N B-R-A-D-L-E-Y, as the man she would one day meet and marry.
Now, grown up, Faith visits a Fortune Teller who sees in the crystal
ball the name, Damon Bradley; Faith realizes this can be no mere
coincidence.  But she is about to be married to a podiatrist.  And when
her fiance's old school friend, on his way to Venice, Italy, phones to
wish her well, and HIS name is Damon Bradley, well!
     Her sister-in-law and best friend, Kate (Bonnie Hunt), is having a
problem with her husband's infidelity so when Faith says she absolutely
must go to Venice in search of Damon Bradley, Kate takes off with
her.   There they meet Peter, a shoe salesman,  who pretends that he is
Bradley ... and the fun really starts with many twists and turns and
one delightful surprise following another.
     Rounding out the cast are Joaquim De Almeida, Fisher Stevens,
Billy Zane, Siobhan Fallon, John Benjamin Hickey and Adam LeFevre.
     Written by Diane Drake.  This is her first produced screenplay.

Title
Review for In the Company of Men (1997)
It was difficult for me to picture the motives of the two
yuppie junior executives Chad (Aaron Eckhart) and Howard (Matt
Malloy).    They are unhappy with their jobs because they seem
always to be passed over when promotions are made . . . and they
are angry at the world.  So far, that is understandable.  What is
not so readily understood is the absolute meanness, perversity in
the suggestion by Chad that he and his friend find a woman who
needs love and friendship, overwhelm, her with kindness . . . and
then drop her like a bomb from on high.
True, they both have lately been having girl trouble but their
prime anger seems to be with their employment . . . and it a far
cry from that to the obscene undertaking they engage in with a
pretty woman, Christine (Stacy Edwards), a secretary.  What kind
of misogynist bastards are they?   How are we supposed to
understand, to relate to these two brutes?   What possesses someone
to think up such a vile trick and what allows another to go along
with it?
Christine is dated by both men.  While she falls madly in love
with Chad, she has strong feelings for Howard as well.  Why not?
They treat her as if she were the most desirable woman on Earth.
With her disability of being mute, able only to speak in a strange
voice, this very pretty woman is vulnerable to anyone who will
shower her with attention.
At some point, she is told by Chad that he will no longer see her.
No reason.  Just a metaphoric slam in the face.   When Howard
later confesses to her that he, too, is in on it, that it is only
a gag, I wanted to throw things at the screen.   A controversial
film?  You bet it is.
Fine acting, good dialogue, keep the film alive and worth seeing
. . . but be prepared to hate a couple of rats.

Title
Review for Boca a boca (1995)
This is a farce about sex.  The farce genre calls for frantic running
around,  mistaken identities and unexpected confusion at every turn,
the setting aside of reality; most of all, by definition farce must
have comedy.  Given those criteria, MOUTH TO MOUTH does quite well.
It is frantic.  People seem to be running all the time.  No one is whoM
he appears to be.  And it is funny.  It also is about sex . . . and
that never hurt a farce.  This sex is about those who work for the "900
Hot Lines," pretending to be enjoying the sexual conversations with
those who phone in.
And of those who call and pay for their chatting, there are no doubt
many who are lonely and confused.  One such is Ricardo (Joep Maria
Flotats) who is in the midst of an unhappy marriage.  On top of that,
he is unnerved by thoughts he may be gay . . . which he is not.
Calling the Hot Line is a safe way for him to get his jollies.
Among those manning the phones is an aspiring but unemployed actor,
Victor (the handsome, sexy Javier Bardem).   The Hot Line is his means
of support.  In a short while, Victor is doing great on the phones
turning people on.   As one would imagine, we are treated to some
hilarious scenes between Victor and Ricardo.
Underlying the film is the message that there is more to life than
casual sex.  Victor undergoes a metamorphosis when he gives up his
dreams of being a famous movie star, getting rich; instead he decides
to be a decent human being.  In fact, there are lots of people whose
lives are changed before the film concludes . . . on a happy note, of
course, as befits farce.
Also in the cast are the beautiful Altana Sanchez- Gijon, Maria
Barranco, and Myriam Mezieres.

Title
Review for Chasing Amy (1997)
This is the third in a trilogy written and directed by Kevin Smith.
The previous two films were the offbeat and very entertaining CLERKS
and MALLRATS. In this third film, Smith digs deeply into relationships
as we come close to the end of a millennium.  Men and women are as
ridiculous in their relationships as they were a few decades ago.
Two cartoonist partners, Holden (Ben Affleck) and Banky (Jason Lee) are
prospering with their cult comic books.  When they meet Alyssa (Joey
Lauren Adams) who is also a comic book artist, Holden is instantly
attracted to her.  He is at least momentarily unnerved when he sees her
with her girlfriend in a passionate kiss but he is so taken with her
that he is willing to settle for just a relationship as friends even if
his partner, Banky, says Holden is not the type to have women as mere
friends.
Apparently, Alyssa, a gorgeous blonde with a sweet, lovable face, just
THINKS she is a Lesbian.  How else explain her attraction to Holden?
Lesbians do not turn into heteros just because they meet a man to whom
they are attracted.  Alyssa has been a free spirit doing sexually
whatever she wanted when she was younger, experimenting in every way.
The question is whether Holden, a man of today, is able to handle what
his adored Alyssa did ten or more years ago.
As in all three of his films, Smith's writing is exceptional so the
dialog flows smoothly.  That is true of his directing, as well.  Off
the beaten track of most of today's films, Smith cuts to the heart of
what is troubling the young people of today who are still, in many
cases, unsure of where they stand and where they are going or want to
go.  Profound, witty and entertaining,.
Nevertheless, I had looked for a different ending to the film.  I could
be wrong.  Perhaps Smith's is the better option.

Title
Review for Madness of King George, The (1994)
     Put this one at the top of your list of films.  Nigel Hawthorne as
the mad King George III is a lesson in how a great actor performs.  The
many moods, the raving, the sobbing,  the regal, the prisoner and the
befuddled are all portrayed in Hawthorne's face and gestures to where
you forget you are watching a movie.  This is *real* acting.
     Everything about the film speaks "Class," with an attention to
detail in costume, sets, and especially the story and the actors all
working together to make this a movie you will not soon forget.  Even
the music lends beautifully to the enjoyment of the film with the music
adapted
     It is about the year 1788, some five years after George III has
lost the Colonies. For some 30 years as monarch of all he surveyed;
as kings go (or went), he was a good king, a family man with a good
wife, Queen Charlotte, (Helen Mirren) who bore him fifteen children.
Now, he has begun to change, his moods varying rapidly with very odd
and unkingly behavior.  Doctors are called to find out what has caused
this sudden, unpredictable change.  But the doctors' prescriptions have
no favorable result.  Word leaks out as words have a way of doing and
pretty soon the whole country is worried about their government.
     Behind the scenes, there is his son, the Prince of Wales (Rupert
Everett), who would like to see his father declared insane so that the
Prince could become regent. Based on the stage  play by Alan Bennett,
(called "The Madness of George III") , the story of King George is a
winner, with fine support from Ian Holm, Amanda Donohoe, Rupert Graves
and those already mentioned above.

Title
Review for Saint, The (1997)
When director Noyce undertook (sic!) this version of THE SAINT, he
asked the writers, Jonathan Hensleigh and Wesley Strick, to include
something about Simon Templar's early life, how he changed from a
sinner to a saint, something the original writer of The Saint stories,
Leslie Charteris, neglected to do.  The movie therefore starts off
in an orphanage in the Far East.  There, young Simon refuses to reveal
his identity to the orphanage's administrators. It was there he learned
to use disguises, retreating from the real world.
Val Kilmer who plays the title role, gets to use a dozen or so
disguises.  Unfortunately, one would have to be blind not to recognize
old Val under all the makeup.  On the other hand, Kilmer appears to be
well aware of that and he plays The Saint with a twinkling eye and a
half grin.  That is the good part of the film.  The rest is downhill.
What does a nuclear scientist look like?  What if she is a woman?  The
woman scientist may very well look like Dr. Emma Russell (Elisabeth
Shue) but we have all been conditioned to expect something less than a
beautiful blonde.  It therefore makes Ms. Shue an unbelievable
scientist.  That may be our fault but this being a movie, we want our
scientists to look like what we expect a scientist to look like.
Right?  Right.
The plot can be disposed of very quickly.  The movie takes place in
present-day Russia.  In a key supporting role, there is Ilya, (Valery
Nikolaev) the violent and unpredictable son of a very influential
industrialist Ivan Tretiak (Rade Serbedzjia.)  The Saint is hired to
get a valuable secret from Dr. Russell which will enable holding the
world hostage.  They did not reckon that The Saint would fall in love
with Dr. Shue, thus putting a crimp in everyone's plans. Why they did
not anticipate that, I cannot say.  It certainly occurred to me.

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
This can be characterized as a "nice" romantic, family film.    With
the exception of one frightening, traumatic scene the film makes for
pleasant watching.    Nothing, after the accident with the horse, is
designed to excite.   Beautiful photography of wide open spaces in
Montana makes the film easy going.
14-year-old Grace MacLean (Scarlett Johansson) is involved in an
accident while riding her horse.    Her friend is killed and she loses
part of her leg.  This leads to depression.    This trauma affects not
only Grace but the horse also has a change of behavior and will not
allow anyone to approach him    Grace's mother, Annie (Kristin Scott
Thomas), a dynamic always-on-the-go magazine editor is mobilized into
action to help her daughter.  This is not as easy as it would seem as
she and her husband Robert (Sam Neill) are not very close and daughter
Annie is not overly fond of her mother either.
When Annie hears there is a man who treats horses (A horse whisperer),
she decides she will leave her husband at home while she and Grace
travel to the Montana ranch where the man is said to work his wonders.
That man is Tom Booker (Robert Redford).     Before the horse is made
rid of his trauma, a romance springs up between Tom and Annie and
life on a ranch in Montana.
What I found difficult to swallow was Redford's portrayal of life in
Montana.   Every resident on the ranch appeared to be the happiest
person in the world.  No thought of drugs for the kids; how could
they, busy as they were branding cattle, mending fences, up early each
morning, big smile on their faces.   Diane Booker, (Dianne Wiest)
Tom's sister, despite all her cooking and other ranch chores, is
supremely happy, as is everyone at the table come chow time.  In the
evening, how about some square dancing and again all smiles.    All
those smiles made me a bit uneasy.     But if you are looking for a
pleasant film, this is it.

Title
Review for Mask, The (1994)
     The biggest thing in movie making these last few years has been
the advent of fantastic special effects.  Leading the pack is ILM,
Industrial Light & Magic, which has given us JURASSIC PARK, DEATH
BECOMES HER, WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT, ET: THE EXTRATERRESTRIAL, the
"Indiana Jones" series, the "Star Wars" trilogy, and on to FORREST
GUMP.  In THE MASK they live up to their reputation as the best.
     Here the wearer of the mask has all the outlandish movements we
are accustomed to seeing in cartoons.  The character spins like a top,
whirls into the air and away, has eyes that pop way out, a tongue about
a yard long, a heart that jumps out several yards and pumps away.
     But while special effects are great the movie also needs a story
and THE MASK provides that along with some great comedy by Jim Carrey.
Stanley Ipkiss (Carrey) is a timid bank clerk.  Into the bank (with
thunder and music turned way up) enters Tina (Cameron Diaz in her
first film): tall, blonde and with a body made in heaven.  While making
advances on the stunned Ipkiss, the camera in her purse is taking
pictures of the vault.
     When, through a series of circumstances, Ipkiss finds a mask that
has been in a treasure chest under sea for many years, he puts it on
his face as a gag and instantly changes into a man of action, a super
hero.  Bullets cannot stop him.  He whirls, he dodges, he is invincible
but always in a highly original and humorous way.
     Very funny dialogue aids the film so that Carrey's broad comedic
style here and the odd story of the magical mask all result in a
hilarious and different kind of movie.  While the film could use about
15 minutes of editing, it is one of the funniest to come along in a
great while.

Title
Review for Paradise Road (1997)
The fact that the film is based on a true story, the hardships visited
on women prisoners by the Japanese in WWII, is about the only good
reason to see the movie.  For one thing, it comes across as a female
version of the magnificent BRIDGE OVER THE RIVER KWAI. . . and suffers
greatly in comparison.
Director Bruce Beresford, director of such outstanding films as BREAKER
MORANT,  DRIVING MISS DAISY, DON'S PARTY, TENDER MERCIES, CRIMES OF THE
HEART, AND MISTER JOHNSON . . . all exceptional films, has faltered
with PARADISE ROAD.  It never really picks up speed being slow-moving
almost from its inception.
Given a great cast with which to work, it is a pity that more could not
have been done with them.  For one thing, I suspect that Beresford
wanted to give equal time to each of his stars and instead ended up
with including each in an episode that did not fully mesh with the
others.
The story, which seems not to be as well known as it should be, is of
the tens of thousands of women (Australian, Europeans and Americans)
who were captured in the Japanese steam-roller push through Asia.  .
When bombs started dropping in Singapore, many women embarked on a ship
that should have brought them safely out of the war zone; instead they
were captured and taken to Sumatra and imprisoned.   How they endured
their incarceration, with music and singing as a catalyst to help them
endure, is the story'S essence.
Glenn Close stars as Adrienne Pargiter, the women's leader in the
prison camp. Pauline Collins is the missionary Margaret Drummond, who
along with Pargiter, stand up to their captors.  Joanna Ter Steege is
a nun, Sister Wilhelmina, Elizabeth Spriggs is Mrs. Roberts.  Julianna
Margulies has the role of Topsy Merrit,  Jennifer Ehle as Rosemary,
Cate Blanchette as Susan, and Fargo's own Frances McDormand is Dr.
Verstak who fronts as the doctor to the sick and injured women.  Sadly,
McDormand's interpretation of her role did not live up to her splendid
marshall's performance in FARGO that won her the Academy Award's Oscar
for Best Actress in 1996.  With a cast like that, we should have
gotten a better film.

Title
Review for Mondo (1996)
No one knows where the 11-years-old Gypsy boy, Mondo,
came from (Ovidiu Balan, a real-life Rumanian gypsy  who
lived in a Gypsy camp in France with his mother and
grandmother and about to be deported when tapped by the
director, himself of Gypsy heritage, to play the part).
We first see him running through the streets of Nice
looking, seeking, contemplating his surroundings and all
the time on the run.  If he sees someone he likes, he
asks with an endearing smile if they will adopt him.
The film is about his life, what he sees, how he
survives, the friends he makes and, always avoiding the
police.  It is based on a short story by J.M.G. Le Clezio
(Mondo et autres Histoires)..
Many interesting characters cross the screen as Mondo
makes his rounds. There is the magician (Philippe Petit)
and his friend (Schaia Aalam) who, too, look after him a
bit.  She is a Turkish Kurd singer who has taken refuge
in Nice..  There is the woman, Thi Chin, a Vietnamese
(Pierrette Fesch)  who worries about this homeless boy.
And then there is the homeless man, Dadi (Jerry Smith),
a Scotsman who had been brought up with British Nobility
but abandoned it to live in the streets of Nice under a
bridge.  There is Giordan, the fisherman (Maurice
Maurin) who is a gardener in Menton but on Sundays can
be found fishing.  He wants to teach Mondo to fish and
to learn to read and write.    The mailman (Ange Gobbi)
(in real life a postman). who Mondo always asks if there
is any mail for him as if anyone knew his whereabouts. .
. . and the postman sadly says there is none today.
Despite the uncertainties of his life and where will
his next meal come from (a bakery lady gives him
bread), Mondo appears to be enjoying the freedom.
Blend these characters together with humor and pathos,
throw in the Gypsy Mondo, and we have a charming,
heartwarming film.
After the film's completion, Ovidiu Balan, his mother
and grandmother were deported to Rumania..

Title
Review for American President, The (1995)
     It is not likely that many people imagine an American President's
life is easy.  Director Rob Reiner has made a most delightful film
about what goes on behind the scenes in running the country, and still
made it a most entertaining movie.  The film not only has humor but it
packs a powerful punch at our Right Wing (with the dastardly Senator
Rumson played by Richard Dreyfuss.)  It also takes on the NRA and those
who would destroy our environment, comes out convincingly in favor of
the ACLU and why free speech is so important. Even media harassment is
covered.  Terrific.
     President Andrew Shepherd (Michael Douglas) is a widower with a
young teenage daughter.   Sydney Ellen Wade (Annette Bening) works for
an environmental group where she is in the forefront of trying to get
their agenda voted on and passed by Congress.  When the President and
accidentally meet, at the White House, Sydney meet, he is, to use an
old but charming word, smitten.  He has got it bad.
     After a series of humorous incidents where she does not believe
the phone calls to her sister's home where she is staying, are really
coming from the White House, they finally get together.  When the
President invites her to a State dinner, the right wing goes into
action to smear him and to find out what they can about her past life.
And when you look, you find.
     As part of the President's staff are Martin Sheen, Michael J Fox,
Anna Deveare Smith, Samantha Mathis, Shawna Waldron and David Paymer.
Great cast, great story, great entertainment.  Oscar, here we come.

Title
Review for Spanking the Monkey (1994)
     From the opening scenes between the son, Raymond  Aibelli
(Jeremy Davies), and his father, Tom  (Benjamin Hendrickson), we feel
an immediate empathy for Raymond and a strong distaste for Tom.
Raymond, a college freshman, is met at the airport by his father who
immediately (and all through the film) lays a guilt trip on his son.
Raymond is expecting to do an internship during the summer as a start
toward his ambition to be a doctor but his father tells him that the
mother, Susan (Alberta Watson), has broken her leg in a fall and that
as Tom has to go out of town on business, Raymond will have to take
care of his mother.  Forget about the internship.
     Hendrickson is excellent.  His manner and speech are so earnestly
reasonable and whining that Raymond would have to be an ingrate to say
"No."
     Raymond caters to his mother as she lies helpless in bed.  His
every moment, almost, is at her beck and call.  You can see he is
trapped.  Even when he goes to the bathroom to masturbate (spank the
monkey), he has no peace, the dog sniffing and whining on the other
side of the closed door. When he takes the dog for a walk he meets Toni
(Carla Gallo), a high school senior who starts the ball rolling between
them, only to later report him to her father, a psychiatrist, for his
having been too rough.
     Nothing goes well for Raymond.  He does not take drugs, he is
studious, yet everything seems to conspire against him ... including
his youngish mother who has been neglected by her husband for too
long.  Things begin to happen as the intimacy of carrying her to the
bathroom, helping her shower, massaging her toes and limbs, start to
take on new meaning.
Superbly acted by all, with excellent dialogue by
Writer/Director, David O Russell in his first feature film, make this
a "must see" film.

Title
Review for Kavkazskij plennik (1996)
War movies (actually anti-war) come in all sizes and shapes. Who can
forget APOCALYPSE NOW with its gigantic helicopters coming in as if
from outer space, firing at the Vietnamese on the ground, with Wagner's
Die Valkyrie enhancing the awful drama . . . or the magnificent DAS
BOOT with its story of the crew of a German submarine?  PRISONER OF
THE MOUNTAINS takes an entirely different, much more subdued but every
bit as powerful approach to tell of the craziness and inhumanity of
war. . . as well as the decent people who are caught up in the
insanity.
The time is today in the former USSR. It is set in a small town very
much like Chechnya where the inhabitants (Muslims) have been battling
their neighbors and the Russians on and off for hundreds of years;
where the villagers still live as they did thousands of years ago.  The
story, while based on Tolstoy's PRISONER OF THE CAUCASUS, (written as a
short story for children), has been brought up to date with new themes
introduced.
A Russian patrol is ambushed by some Muslim inhabitants of the village
with the object of capturing a Russian soldier whom they can use as a
hostage, a bargaining chip for a young villager being held prisoner by
the Russians.  The prisoner ia the son of the village's patriarch, an
impressive, tall man, Abdoul-Mourat (Jemal Sikharulidze).  Instead,
they inadvertently capture 2 Russians, Sacha (Oleg Menshikov) who has
become cynical from many years of soldiering and Vania (Sergei Bodrov,
Jr. who happens to be the director's son), a recent recruit.  Both
being prisoners, they have to learn to live together and to cooperate
with one another if they hope to escape.  In an escape attempt,
however, Sacha is killed.
Vania's life now hinges on the patriarch's son being exchanged for
him.  Vania's mother tells the Russian captain that she is going to
speak to Abdoul but before that can be accomplished the young Muslim
prisoner in an attempted escape is fatally shot.
A terrible confrontation now seems inevitable.  What choice does Abdoul
have but to revenge his son by killing Vania? The captain, for his
part, tells Vania's mother that if any harm comes to her son, the
Russians will exact a terrible price on the village.
On the Muslim side, the father, shotgun in hand, marches  Vanua in
front of him, prepared to kill him. .  What happens next is entirely
unexpected, shocking, frustrating. . . and will break your heart.
For several minutes after the film ended and the credits rolled I was
still in my seat unable to move.  A great movie!
Others in the cast include Susanna Mekhralieva as a young girl of the
village,  Alexei Zharkov as the Captain, and Valentina Fedotova as the
mother.
My own choice for the Best Foreign film of 1996.

Title
Review for Whole Wide World, The (1996)
     Novalyne Price Ellis is now 88-years-old.  The film is based on
her book, ONE WHO WALKED ALONE,  a remembrance of  Robert E Howard
whom she loved way back in the 1930s.  Howard was the very eccentric
author of the  weird stories of CONAN, THE BARBARIAN.  As he was the
first to unreservedly admit, he was "the best writer in the whole wide
world."
     The film is a precious gem from its opening scene of Novalyne
(Renee Zellweger) on the porch of her home in rural Texas to the
fadeout at the end that lingers lovingly on her face.   Vincent
D'Onofrio, who plays Howard, transports us into another world, that of
the writer who wanted no ties of any kind.  As Howard sits at his
typewriter, he verbalizes and furiously enacts the weird and ferocious
Conan stories.
  When Novalyne meets him it is love at first sight but his love is
not the same as hers.  Where she yearns for "normal" love, he feels
marriage is binding, that it will restrict, and he will have no part
of it. Like Robert, she too is a writer with the big difference that
she is unpublished.  Robert, a bear of a man and outspoken, tells her
that her stories are laughable.  He explains that the people in her
town about whom she writes are unreal because they bear no resemblance
to what the people are really like . . . and he despises all of them.
     Robert's father (Harve Presnell) is a doctor.  His sickly mother
(Anne Wedgeworth) makes the most of her illnesses thus keeping her
extremely devoted son close to her  to the point where it borders on a
sickness with Robert washing her, carrying her and always hovering
over her. As he explains to Novalyne, his mother was the first to
recognize his genius and he feels indebted.
     D'Onofrio's portrayal of Howard is in the Oscar nomination class.
Zellweger, too, is perfection, reminding me of a younger Steenburgen.
The music of Harry Gregson-Williams and Hans Zimmer is right on target
and never obtrusive; Claudio Rocha's photography brings us right into
agricultural Texas;  the film's pace is exactly right.    What more
could you ask for? Look for a nomination for Best Film of the year.

Title
Review for Schreckliche Mädchen, Das (1990)
When Anja Rosmus researched her hometown's past during the Nazi era she
was subjected to all kinds of harassment and death threats, the least
of which was being referred to as "that terrible girl". . . or as
translated for the film's title, "that nasty girl."
Based on her story of her research and the town's reaction we are
treated to a most wonderful film which despite its very serious subject
contains much humor.  Lena Stolze does a great job as Anja growing from
a teenager early in the film to a mother of 2 children.
It starts with Anna's teen years in a Catholic school, her winning a
national essay contest and her decision to enter another essay contest
picking as her subject, in all innocence, the people of her home town
during the Nazi period.
When she begins the research she is surprised to find that she is being
thwarted in her every attempt to read the town's, the library's and the
church's archives of that period.  As she digs into whatever
information she can gather she discovers that many of the present day
respectable citizens behaved despicably to the Jews, confiscating their
property, accusing them of crimes and allowing them to be sent to
concentration camps.   Although one never hears any talk of that
period,  Anja discovers that the town even had its own concentration
camp.
Very much in a documentary fashion but with a very effective twist, the
film's characters will frequently turn to the audience and explain what
is happening and the circumstances surrounding their actions.   That
all of this is done with a light touch to make its point is
attributable to the talents of its director.  And the point of the film
is to show that 50 years later there is still much hidden in the hearts
of many Germans, and that among many of the young, Hitler is still an
idol.
Masterfully directed by Michael Verhoeven

Title
Review for Welcome To Sarajevo (1997)
Beautiful Jugoslavia only a few short years ago was a most
delightful vacation spot offering tourists lovely picture-postcard
locations such as Mostar with its bridge across the river.  Bombed
to hell!   There is nothing like a civil war to bring out the worst
in what is euphemistically referred to as humans.  Point blank
shooting of prisoners who only a little while ago were one's
neighbors is a daily occurrence.
This exciting film, based on true stories, is about one typical
city, Sarajevo, caught up in a bloody war.   It was world-famous a
few years ago when it hosted the Winter Olympics.  It is also about
the foreign correspondents who live dangerously while snipers peck
away at anyone or anything that moves. 
Michael Henderson (Stephen Dillans) has been all over the world
covering many Wars-Of-The-Month.   But for sheer inhumanity,
Yugoslavia wins the prize.   His job is to get the best stories, the
best pictures, for the media's viewers, readers back home. What is
difficult to understand is that these correspondents risk their
lives to bring us the news but back home many people have never even
heard about Sarajevo and that its stories can be bumped for the
less than earth-shaking news of the divorce of the Duke and Duchess
of York, Andrew and Fergie.
Nightfall finds Henderson and the others meeting in the dimly
generator-lit hotel's bar where they exchange stories about what
they witnessed that day. . .  while bombs and sniper shots are heard
in the background.  American journalist Flynn (Woody Harrelson)
daily risks his life for a story.  Some feel he is engaged in
glamorizing his own heroics rather than telling the story of the war.
Flynn, however, maintains that no one knows Sarajevo but they
certainly have heard of Flynn.
The movie follows the story of the Ljubica-Ivezic orphanage run by
Mrs. Savic (Gordana Gadzic).  The orphanage houses newly-orphaned
children as well as those who were orphaned before the war.  Because
of the political-religious climate in this divided country, some children
are ruthlessly kept from being evacuated from the front line area.
At the orphanage, Henderson is enchanted by Emira (Emira Nusevic) a
young orphan who is determined to get out and away from all this.
Without fully realizing what difficulties and situations lie ahead,
Henderson promises he will help her.
Marisa Tomei has the role of an American aid worker.   Others in
the cast include Kerry Fox, Gorn Visnjic and Emily Lloyd.
With heartbreak and excitement WELCOME TO SARAJEVO will keep you on
edge.  This is a film not to be missed.

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
>From the opening moment, when the titles appear on the screen, the
eerie sounds of a building about to collapse, of columns and steel
supports beginning to crack, envelope the theater.  This sound special
effect sets the films tone and stays with us all through the film.
Good thing, too, because the story is the usual nothing as in almost
all films about disasters.
Los Angeles, with its wonderful weather and laid back life style, is
often the envy of the rest of the country.  Those who envy us and who
are turned on when they read of forest fires in our mountains, followed
by rain and floods, and who may get a vicarious thrill reading about
our latest earthquake, should delight in this new disaster Hollywood
has imagined, a volcano whose lava (as hot as 2000 degrees  Centigrade)
instantly melts even steel buildings that it envelops.  Welcome to
L.A.
Los Angeles has a world-famous site, located next to our County Museum
of Art. It is the La Brea Tar Pits.  (A misnomer, since ""brea" means
"tar." in Spanish.) At the tar pits, one can see a small lake (or large
pool) of oil and tar that still bubble to the surface.  Many
prehistoric parts of mastodons have been unearthed In the film this is
where the volcano erupts, sending hot lava geysers into the air, and
shooting "lava bombs" weighing as much as two tons into the air to
descend on a building or neighborhood instantly destroying it.
Los Angeles has an Emergency Dept headed by Mike Roark (Tommy Lee
Jones). When all hell breaks loose with the volcano threatening to
destroy much of Los Angeles, it is Mike's job to minimize the
destruction and to save as many lives as possible.  They could not
have picked a better person than Mike.  He is cool under stress,
knowledgeable, daring and dependable.  He is ably assisted in this
new unprecedented disaster which no one had anticipated by Lt. Ed Fox,
(Keith David), the Fire Chief.
Mike has a teenaged daughter, Kelly (Gaby Hoffmann) .  He also has
as a good friend and more, Dr. Amy Barnes (Anne Heche), a seismologist,
who also helps in planning what to do about the disaster.  Emmit Reese
(Don Cheadle) is Roark's assistant.who mans the control center while
Roark is out in the field battling the lava flow.  Some 50 local
media people play themselves.
The Special Effects are outstanding: the fires, the lava bombs, the
boiling lava flowing down the city streets.  The story (such as it is)
includes Roark's daughter, Kelly, being in a building that is about to
be blown up to block the path of the lava so that it will detour toward
the ocean.  Having seen enough movies to know that Kelly will escape
unharmed, I was nevertheless wishing she would hurry up and get out of
the building before it descended on her.
Happily, the film shows that when people are faced with something
horrendous, a common enemy, they bond together, forgetting nonsense
such as race, religion, and ethnicity.  This is brought out nicely
when a little boy has lost his mother. When asked to look at a crowd
and see if he can point her out, he says "I can't. Everyone looks
alike."  And indeed they do, tired, covered with soot and ash.
Disaster films seem to be the vogue at the moment.  As Screenwriter
Jerome D Armstrong tells it, ten, twenty years ago, disaster films
were about mechanical failures such as in The Poseidon Adventure, The
Towering Inferno, and Westworld. Here we are dealing with a natural
disaster for which we are unprepared and must learn to deal with it
quickly.
My personal problem was that I was sitting in a theater about 5 - 10
minutes from where the film's disasters were being portrayed and so I
could not get really caught up.  Out-of-Towners should not have that
same experience.  It will get their blood flowing.
Screenplay by Jerome Armstrong and Billy Ray from a story by Armstrong.

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
Anyone who has seen the original JURASSIC PARK will surely want to see
the sequel.  As with the first, it is filled with dinosaurs, both big
and little, more menacing than I recall in the one that preceded this.
For this reason, it is incumbent upon me to suggest that parents of
children under 9-years-old and those of sensitive 10-year-olds take
their offspring to other movies.    It is a bit frightening to see a
couple of tyrannosaurs  engaged in pulling apart a human they have
captured, or to see hundreds of little dinosaurs about the size of
small geese, poke out the eyes of humans, chew at their lips and
cheeks.   It is a kind of THE BIRDS except with dinosaurs.
Then, too, the photography. like much of the story, is dark.  Hardly
any daylight, sunlight, penetrates the huge trees and brush of the
dense forest.   This, when it is in the whole movie, is in itself
depressing.  Nevertheless, the special effects are, as expected,
spectacular though not more so than in the original.  For one thing,
the dinosaurs do not come across as shocking, surprising, as when
first seen in JURASSIC PARK.  There really is nothing here to compare
with our first view in the 1993 version of the dinosaur lifting its
head above the trees in a graceful movement that astonished and
delighted us.    While it is true that THE LOST WORLD utilizes new
computer technology to make the animals move more gracefully, the
improvement was not noticeable.   The original Jurassic Park was
spectacularly wonderful with  Live Action Dinosaurs' Stan Winston in
charge both then and now.
As for the story:  You will recall that John Hammond had discovered
that embedded in amber were bits of DNA.  He was able to utilize the
DNA to grow full- sized prehistoric animals.  It was his dream to have
an amusement park on an island off Costa Rica where visitors could
come to view the dinosaurs and other beasts.  The park was going to be
foolproof safe. Dr. Ian Malcolm, a brilliant mathematician, said there
was no such thing as 100% safe.  As predicted, disaster struck and
everyone fled the island and all the prehistoric animals died . . . or
so everyone thought.
Four years have elapsed since John Hammond's dream came to a disastrous
end. Just when it was believed that the dinosaurs and other prehistoric
animals had all died, it now appears that there were some survivors
living on the nearby island of Isla Sorna where they were free of human
interference   Having learned his lesson that one must not tamper with
nature, Hammond (in this version played by Richard Attenborough) wants
sightseers kept away and the island policed so the prehistoric animals
can live in  peaceful surroundings. To this end, he talks
mathematician Ian  Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum) into overseeing that his
wishes come true.  Things do not quite work out that way.
Others hired by Hammond for chronicling of the island's inhabitants are
paleontologist  Sarah Harding (Julianne Moore),  maker of video
documentaries (Vince Vaughn) and a field equipment specialist (Richard
Schiff) to enable the three to carry on their mission.
The film's villain is Hammond's money-hungry nephew, Peter Ludlow
(Arliiss Howard), who takes control of the company and sets out to
breed the creatures, bring them to the island and set it up as another
Park. Ludlow hires an adventurer, Roland Tembo (Pete Postlethwaite) to
be in charge on the island.
Also in the cast is young Kelly, (Vanessa Lee Chester) who stowed away
on the ship going to the island where deadly dinosaurs roam.   Little
did Kelly know what she was going to experience.
If you loved JURASSIC PARK, as almost everyone apparently did, and you
want more of the same, THE LOST WORLD  will again turn you on.
Based on  Michael Crichton's novel, THE LOST WORLD.

Title
Review for Mixed Nuts (1994)
     It is Christmas when many are so saddened by their lot in life
that they would like to end it all by suicide but that will not happen,
of course, if the screenplay is written by Nora and Delia Ephron and a
cast of stars who go all out to be their zaniest.   So, relax. There is
lots in this lightweight film that will make you laugh.
     Philip (Steve Martin) runs his own suicide prevention hotline
service in Venice, California, a hip little town near the beach just
south of Santa Monica.   Everything is going wrong tonight for him and
his dedicated bunch of volunteers who answer the phones.  For starters,
the landlord (Garry Shandling), is is about to evict them.  Catherine
O'Shaughnessey (Rita Wilson), has a secret love for Philip; she is also
afraid of ending up an old maid.
     Running away with the movie in one of her funniest roles is
Madeline Kahn playing Blanche Mutchnik, who picks on everyone, the
callers and the volunteers.  Everything happens to her, too, including
getting stuck in an elevator in a most hilarious scene only Kahn could
pull off.
     Also in the cast are Chris (Liev Schreiber), a lonely transvestite
who does a great dance with Philip; Gracie (Juliette Lewis in as far
away as one can get from her Natural Born Killers killer role); Felix
(Anthony Paglia), with whom she has an argument on Christmas Eve; Rob
Klein as a miserable tenant and his three dogs: Dr. Kinsky (Rob
Reiner) a veterinarian ... and more.
     While the film does have one funny scene after another, it just
quite misses out on being a "must see," but go see it anyway if only
for Kahn and Martin.

Title
Review for Swept from the Sea (1997)
  Screenwriter Tim Willocks has quite faithfully transposed Joseph
Conrad's moving short story of Amy Foster.    In turn, Director
Beeban Kidron has done her best to stick with the script.
  The story is about Amy (Rachel Weisz), a  poor girl in Cornwall,
England, regarded as not too bright by her parents and farmed out to
work as a serving girl to Mr. and Mrs Smith (Tony Haygarth and Fiona
Victory).  On the surface, Amy is a placid person but inside rages a
passionate woman waiting only for a chance to burst from her  world
surrounded by the sea.   Many are the times she looks out to the sea
from the wall that protects the town.
  Meanwhile, in the Ukraine, scoundrels are filling the ears of
young men with stories of fortunes to be made in America.    These
innocents sell every bit of their meager belongings to ship out to
America.   Once aboard ship, they are put into crowded holds, their
money taken from them.  Conditions are as if they were slaves.
  All this suddenly changes when a storm comes up and there is a
shipwreck, the only survivor being Yanko Gooral (Vincent Perez), a
handsome young man who despite managing to land at the bottom of the
sea wall, looks like a miserable excuse for a human. When he is
discovered, the townspeople are antagonistic.  His Ukrainian
language sounds like the gibberish of a lunatic and they regard him
as such, making life immediately miserable for him.    Only one
person comes to his aid, Amy Foster.  As she had yearned, someone
came from the sea . . . for her.
  The only other person who is able to see anything human in Yanko
is Dr. James Kennedy (in an excellent portrayal by Ian McKellen).
This comes about only because   the doctor and Yanko have a passion
for chess.    In the film, unlike the short story, it is the doctor
who relates to a friend the story of Amy and Yanko.
  The hypocrisy of the townspeople who treat Yank as a lunatic; the
passion of Amy who loves Yanko, feeds him when she is warned to keep
away from him, and brings him back to life; and the child of their
union are all part of this interesting story.
  Prominent in the cast is Kathy Bates as Miss Swaffer.

Title
Review for Crossing Guard, The (1995)
     Freddy Gale (Jack Nicholson) is a jeweler.  Watching the film, my
mind wandered to the many films in which Nicholson starred over the
years, almost all fine films: ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST, A FEW
GOOD MEN, PRIZZI'S HONOR, REDS, CHINATOWN, FIVE EASY PIECES, and EASY
RIDER, to name some of the more outstanding.  And I am watching
Nicholson looking and acting very much as he did in every film he has
been in: the white eyeballs, the devilish look, the way he wipes his
mouth, the way he lowers his voice into a hushed mumble. And I think,
maybe he ought to start looking different in different kinds of
films.  Even at the Lakers' games, with his dark glasses, he is
Nicholson.  His "look" is getting a bit boring.
     The film's story is not much help.  Written and directed by Sean
Penn, it's a simple story and not terribly interesting.  John Booth
(David Morse) accidentally ran over Gale's seven-year-old daughter with
his car.  After spending his time in jail he is about to be released.
While he is ticking off the days on his calendar in the jail cell,
Nicholson is doing the same in his home.  Both know that when Booth is
released, Gale is going to go after him.
     Gale shows up at the home of his ex-wife, Mary, (Anjelica Huston)
and informs her that he is going to kill Booth.  Mary has remarried.
They had gotten divorced, presumably because of Gale's behavior once
his beloved daughter was killed; he has become a changed man who hangs
out at strip joints with other jewelers who look more like sleazy
gangsters.  It now becomes, for the audience to watch and guess how
the film will develop and the development is nothing spectacular.
There is a short look at an elderly crossing guard asleep, or half
asleep, sitting in a chair while the children are in a playground.  If
there were any significance to that, and to the film's title, I missed
it.
     Supporting actors are Robin Wright who befriends and comforts
booth and Piper Laurie (as beautiful as ever) as Booth's mother.
     One of the obviously "silly" incidents (to use a kind word) is the
policewoman who, when Gale is pulled over for possible drunk driving,
takes his gun (he has a license for it as he is a jeweler who carries
valuables) and lays the gun on the trunk of his car within easy reach
of Gale if he chooses to make a grab for it and escape.

Title
Review for Gold Diggers: The Secret of Bear Mountain (1995)
     This was supposed to be an exciting adventure about two
thirteen-year-old girls who became close friends even though they
seemed to have nothing in common.  Instead, the "adventure" is quite
unexciting ... boring, in fact, thus wasting the talents of two fine
young actresses: Anna Chlumsky who appeared in MY GIRL and MY GIRL 2,
and Christina Ricci who was the unsmiling little girl in the ADDAMS
FAMILY, and CASPER.
     The story, in addition to lacking any excitement, is also on the
unbelievable side.  Jody (Anna) has a map of a nearby mountain that no
one believes has gold.  Miners have died years ago in an explosion and
since then everyone has forgotten or derided the idea that there might
be gold there.  But not our tomboyish Jody.  She entices city-bred Beth
(Christina) to go with her to explore the mysterious mountain.  They
use what looks like a boat that has been put together with chewing gum
and sail down the river, miles from home, although Beth has promised
her mother she would be home for dinner.  Fat chance.
Directed by Kevin James Dobson and written by Barry Glasser.

Title
Review for One Eight Seven (1997)
          "187" (pronounced One Eight Seven) we are told is the
California State Penal Code for murder; the term is now used by
gangs all over our lovely country.   Watching the film and seeing
the decline and fall of the U.S. as illustrated by "our" youth is
enough to make one want to throw a net over these young people.
They are lost.  They cannot be rehabilitated.  With all the money
spent on defending our country from perceived enemies, spending to
keep anti-communist dictators in power, and no money for jobs and
housing so that everyone in the country has both, has resulted in
our winning each battle and losing the war.  A pyrrhic victory for
our CIA, our military, our Congress and our Presidents.
          So much for editorializing.  That is not how I write
reviews but this film provoked me into doing just that.  It is
enough for anyone who loves his country, to cry.
          In Brooklyn (where I went to school and where almost all
the teachers even in high school had doctorates) Trevor Garfield
(Samuel L Jackson) is a science teacher, earnest and dedicated.
The class (a euphemism) consists of tattooed, rings in the ears
and nose, "students."   Their sole object is to ridicule, belittle
and denigrate their teachers.   In that atmosphere Garfield tries
to shed a little light.
          Threatened by one of his students (who writes "187" all
over the teacher's books), Garfield brings it to the attention of
a self-serving, keep-my-job and do not raise a fuss, Principal.
The threat has come from a student to whom Garfield had refused a
passing grade.   The Principal pooh poohs Garfield's apprehension.
Shortly thereafter, Garfield is stabbed with what appears to be an
ice pick and he lands, near death in a hospital.  After many
months, he recovers enough to leave Brooklyn and go to the perceived
safety of Southern California.  Hah!
          Garfield quickly learns that it is equally bad in
California.  The schoolhouse is a bungalow.  The students are the
same illiterates he left and they are just as threatening and dangerous.
          At the school he becomes acquainted with a couple of
teachers, Dave Childress (John Heard) and Ellen Henry (Kelly
Rowan).   Dave has been teaching for many years and has given up
on ever being able to impart any knowledge to his students.  He is
"burned out," and is just going through the motions so he can
collect his paycheck.  In between, he smokes and drinks enough to
get crocked. There was a time when he thought he could make a
difference but that was long ago.
          Ellen Henry is fighting a losing battle.   Both she and
Dave look upon Garfield as part hero (having found out about the
stabbing in Brooklyn) and at the same time as someone they cannot
quite fathom.
          When a student becomes too threatening, he is found
dead.   Another student who was always menacingly pointing his
finger in Garfield's face finds himself with a broken finger.
Suspicion falls on Garfield.  Has he taken matters into his own
hands now that he sees there is no other way?
          Up until this point, the film is horrifyingly believable. In about the last 20 minutes, the movie turned sickeningly ludicrous.   I could not believe the denouement I was witnessing.  What were screenwriter (and former substitute
teacher) Scott Yagemann and the Director thinking of?  How could they have Rita (Karina Arroyave) who all picture long wears a ring  in her nose, suddenly appear ringless to do the valedictory speech?   How could everything suddenly turn hopeful?  How could they show the graduating class in cap and gown marching to their seats like normal students when all picture long we saw nothing but misfits?  Give me a break.
Others in the cast include Clifton Gonzalez Gonzalez, Jonah Rooney
and Lobo Sebastian.
Some statistics we are given:  One in nine teachers has been
attacked at school with 90% of the incidents coming from students.
160,000 students stay home from school EVERY DAY because of fear.
Nearly 3 million thefts and violent crimes occur in or near school
each year.
One in five suburban high school boys owns a gun,  40% of them
were threatened and/or shot at while going to school.
Nearly 20% of all students of high school age have carried guns.
Knives or razors  (55%), clubs (24%) and guns (20%).
Nearly 135,000 guns are brought into school each day.
20% of schools report student-on-teacher assaults.

Title
Review for Rob Roy (1995)
     Robert Roy MacGregor (1671-1734) is the most famous of the
Scottish MacGregor clan.   It was he who fought to keep the clan
together despite the poverty they faced and the greed of the lords.
The photography of the film is something to behold; its lakes and
mountains and the barrenness of so much of the country.  This is all
captured by Director of Photography, Karl Walter Lindenlaub.
     Rob Roy (Liam Neeson) is a cattle drover.  When he seeks to better
his condition for his wife (Jessica Lange) and his family, he borrows
1,000 pounds from his lord, the Marquis of Montrose  (John Hurt) in
order to buy cattle and make a profit. The money is stolen from him
and he must now repay his lord.  How the stealing came about and how
he is harassed is the story of the film.
     What lifts the movie way up is the acting of Tom Roth who plays
the role of Cunningham, a fop, a dandy, and a most malicious villain
whose face never loses its constant sneer.  Roth just about steals the
film from the much better known Neeson and Lange.
     The only thing that made me laugh was in a final duel when he
takes off his wig (which all the nobility wore) and tosses it aside
while I thought ""No more Mr Nice Guy."

Title
Review for Secrets & Lies (1996)
     While there are some similarities between SECRET AND LIES and the
recent A FAMILY THING, each stands on its own and approaches their
stories from different angles.   In the latter, a sixty-something
white man (Robert Duvall) discovers that the woman he thought was his
mother and who has just died is not his real mother.  He sets out to
find the blood-family he never knew or had heard about.  He discovers
they are black, with a half-brother played by James Earl Jones.
     SECRETS AND LIES, on the other hand, is about Hortense (Marianne
Jean- Baptiste) a young black woman who is an optometrist in London.
She knows the parents with whom she has been living until they died
were her adoptive parent, not her "real" parents.    When she gets a
sudden urge to learn about her real mother she is given the files the
adoption agency  has on her..   When she finds her mother, who is
white, the mother, Cynthia (Brenda Blethyn) is shocked and
disbelieving until Hortense comes up wiith enough detail to convince
her that they are, indeed, mother and daughter.
     While Hortense and Cynthia take a liking to each other, there is
the rest of the family who have  to be wooed.   Cynthia has another
daughter, Roxanne, (Claire Rushbrook) and how will she take the news
that she has a black half-sister?

Title
Review for War at Home, The (1996)
     There have been a number of fine films about returning vets of
the Vietnam war.  One that comes immediately to mind is COMING HOME,
that starred Jon Voight, Jane Fonda and Bruce Dern.   In that one, the
Voight role was that of a paralyzed vet.  THE WAR AT HOME stars Emilio
Estevez as a vet who cannot sleep because he unable for a moment to
forget what he has been through.  The object of his intense anger is
his family.
     Maurine (Kathy Bates) is his mother who, although well-meaning,
is enough to drive her son, Jeremy, further up a wall.  I was getting
pretty nervous myself as Maurine kept bugging her son as she did  not
have the sense to lay off.  When Jeremy attacks her verbally, she is
unable to understand his fury.
     Jeremy's father, is Bob Collier (Martin Sheen, Estevez's
real-life father who actually introduced him to the film 's story.)
Bob does his best to keep his family together unaware that he is
partly to blame for Jeremy's hatred of him.  It is not until the film
is almost over that we discover the real reason.
     Trying to help but always rebuffed, is Jeremy's sister, Karen
(Kimberly Williams).  In vain she pleads with him to forget the war
and get on his with his family and life.  But how could she know that
he relives the war every moment?
     As Jeremy, Estevez turns in a great performance.  Indeed, Bates
and Sheen are equally fantastic.  It is great to see actors who know
their craft and given a good role they give it all they have got.
Further, as with films about the Holocaust when some wonder why there
are so many films made about it, the devastating effects of the war in
Vietnam has to be told over and over again so we do not again make
such a horrible mistake.

Title
Review for Denise Calls Up (1995)
     This is an original way of telling the story of how many
relationships are started and conducted today.  We are talking about
the computer age, BBSing, e-mail, and the telephone.  We talk to each
other, we get to know each other real well, all because of the
anonymity the computer communication allows.  Because of that daily
contact and "conversation" there is little we eventually do not know
about the other party/parties, nor they about us except what they look
like.
     Denise (Alanna Ubach) is on the phone constantly, frequently
interrupted by Call Waiting.  So are Frank (Tim Daly), Barbara
(Caroleen Feeney), Martin (Dan Gunther), Gale (Dana Wheeler Nicholson),
Jerry (Liev Schreiber) and Linda (Aida Turturro).  The whole film is
about talking, gossiping, rumors, constant interruptions with Call
Waiting, more ringing.
     The conversations lead to intimate relationships, never
consummated; they don't even meet but can they ever talk.  And what
they talk about is usually utter trivia until we learn that one of the
women has become pregnant via a sperm donor.
     The film opens the morning after a party, tables laden with food
because no one showed up last night. . . but they all have great
excuses.  The fact is everyone is afraid to meet in person; keeping it
a phone thing is more relaxing and make believe than the real tbing may
turn out to be.  Every time something is arranged, such as a lunch, no
one shows up.
     Having experienced on my computer much of what goes on in the film
(even if it is exaggerated with dramatic license), I can vouch for its
authenticity.  I mean it COULD happen and among the millions who are on
BBSes and Internet's e-mail, it surely happens many, many times a
day.  It would have been perfect if the film left out the telephone
and somehow utilized the computer for the whole film but that may have
been too tricky to accomplish as a movie.  Nevertheless, especially to
those of us who love our computer communicating, this is a film not to
be missed.  It's billed as a "cyber-comedy."

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
It is a given that when you mess with nature you can expect
trouble. That is what happens when a contagious illness is spread
by a cockroach-like insect in NYC where in some neighborhoods
cockroaches are not exactly unknown. To the rescue comes Dr.
Susan Tyler (Mira Sorvino), a top-notch scientist, and her
husband, Dr. Peter Mann (Jeremy Northam).    They successfully
combine the DNA from other species thus creating a counter agent
to the disease-carrying insect.    This new creation is let loose
in NYC and the plague ceases . . . until three years later when
it emerges in a newer and more horrible form: giant cockroaches
with wings and with one king roach fathering a mass of winged
roaches.
Many science fiction film, as in MIMIC, keep the screen dark for its
eeriness.  Here, much of the movie takes place under the city, in
abandoned subways and sewers . . . and always dark green or darker
hues. That manipulative oppressiveness soon becomes trying; when
almost the whole film is gloomy it is annoying.   In fact the whole
idea of using cockroaches strikes me as being tasteless.
Mira Sorvino's talent is utterly wasted. Dr. Gates, an entomologist
to whom Susan turns to for advice is in nothing more than a cameo
and another waste of a fine actor. Josh Brolin plays an
investigator, Charles S Dutton is a cop, Chuy, the autistic child
who plays "music" by clicking spoons, is played by Alexander
Goodwin.   I found that whole bit about the spoons annoying.
Mimic is based on a short story by Donald A Wolheim and should
have remained just that.

Title
Review for Utomlyonnye solntsem (1994)
     This is the film that won the Oscar for Best Foreign Film of
1994 ... and deservedly so.  Not only does it tell of the horrors of the
Stalin era but it does so by following the life of one family living in
the placid countryside outside of Moscow with everyone apparently happy
until the ending when things close in on them; a history of a country.
     Sergei Petrovich Kotov is a retired colonel, (Nikita Mikhalkov)
who loves his fatherland, is faithful to its leader, Stalin.  Everyone
loves the colonel for his fairness and his ability to right any wrongs
in the village.  With him are his wife, Maroussia (Ingeborga
Dapkounaite) and his adorable and adoring six-year-old daughter, Nadia
(Nadia Mikhalkov) the real life daughter of Director Nikita Mikhalkov
who also wrote the screenplay and plays the colonel in the film.
     A visitor, Dmitri, nicknamed Mitya, (Oleg Menchikov) is on a short
visit to their home.  He was once in love with Maroussia but that was a
long time ago, before he left for France, mysteriously.  Before the
film ends we learn why he went to France, who he has become and the
consequences to the family as events suddenly turn viciously bad.
     The acting is excellent but little Nadia, in particular, will
steal your heart.  Just seeing her is enough to make this fine film
even better.

Title
Review for Beauty and the Beast (1991)
This is the age-old fascinating tale of the beautiful girl and an ugly
beast.  The story is brought to life in this, the 30th animated
full-length Disney film and only the fifth classic fairy tale of Disney
films, (Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs , Cinderella ,
Sleeping Beauty , The Little Mermaid, , a Hans Christian
Anderson story, which became the most successful of all animated films
ever released.) Only through animation, it would seem, could the story
reach new heights of imagination.  Add to it some inspired voice
casting and clever songs and here is a film for both children and
adults to enjoy.  The music is by Alan Menken and the songs are by the
team of Menken and Howard Ashman.
It is the 1800s.  Belle (Beauty) lives in a French village where she
enjoys reading books.  There she is pursued by, a good-looking egotist
named Gaston who is always admiring himself but he is not at all what
Belle is looking for.  Richard White is Gaston's voice.
Her father, an inventor, wanders into a castle where he is taken
prisoner by a horrible-looking beast.  Belle offers herself as hostage
so that her father can be released. Aided by the castle's staff she
discovers that even an ugly beast can have a heart of gold unlike
Gaston who is more of a beast than the one in the castle.  This is
further revealed when he leads a crowd to the castle in the films
climactic denouement.
There's just enough growling and blustering by the Beast to give little
kids a thrill. . . and just enough pathos and personality to make them
love him.  BEAUTY AND THE BEAST is full of the kind of humor one
associates with Disney films.  From the broad brush given Gaston's
egotism, to the antics of the mantel clock, the teapot, candelabra and
wardrobe, the film is a happy romp.
Beauty's loyalty to her father and self-sacrifice will not be lost on
the viewers.  While the film is primarily for children, adults will be
happy to find they, too, are enjoying it.
Easily recognizable voices are those of the Narrator, Donald Ogden
Stiers, Angela Lansbury as Mrs. Potts, the castle's housekeeper, and Jo
Anne Worley as the Wardrobe and Jerry Ohrbach doing the candelabra
voice.
Beautifully animated, with lifelike scenery, BEAUTY AND THE BEAST will
entertain you and your children.
Directed by Gary Trousdale and Kirk Wise.

Title
Review for Nothing to Lose (1997)
The story is far-fetched; the overly-friendly relations between
our white hero and a black family are somewhat heavy-handed.  The
explanation involving the wife's infidelity is quite a stretch, and
the ending should have come sooner; no need to dot every "i" and
cross every "t."  Despite those caveats, I enjoyed almost every
moment.   It was a feel-good movie.
Nick (Tim Robbins) is an advertising executive who comes home early
one day and discovers his wife (Kelly Preston) in bed with his boss.
Nick flies out of the house and furiously drives away unmindful of
traffic.  His life is ruined; he has NOTHING TO LOSE.
A carjacker, T Paul (Martin Lawrence) pulls a gun on him when Nick
stops at a traffic light but Nick, crazy with grief and NOTHING TO
LOSE, not only takes a swipe at T Paul but gets him into the car
and drives away with him.   T Paul explains that he is an educated
person who cannot find a job.  In order to support his wife and
kids, he got the stupid idea of carjacking.  Before very long,
they become friends.   With NOTHING TO LOSE, Nick and T Paul set
out to rob Nick's boss for having slept with Nick's wife.
Unfortunately for Nick and T Paul, they are being followed by
another couple of gangsters, who like them, one is black and the
other white.  (Giancarlo Esposito and John C McGinley)  Neither
Nick and T Paul nor the cops on their trail are aware that there
are 2 sets of black and white suspects.
When T Paul goes home to his family with Nick, T Paul's mother
slaps them around; her son for staying out late and Nick for
probably being a bad influence. In the end, of course, everything
turns out fine . . . by use of two unoriginal bits of mistaken
identity to make the plot work.   Still, quite funny. and
entertaining.

Title
Review for Extreme Measures (1996)
This thriller is about the medical profession and, in
particular, the harm that could be done if a top doctor allows himself
to think that he has the answer that other doctors do not have.  This
allows him to experiment his theories on people who have not given him
permission . . . and if they die, they die, while he keeps on with
his experiments.
Dr. Guy Luthan (Hugh Grant) works in the emergency trauma
section of a hospital.  It is a madhouse in the sense that patients
are brought in from accidents, gun shots, etc. and Luthan has to make
instant decisions.  It's like a war zone.  Whom do you try to save?
If someone is obviously going to die why waste precious time on him
when you could be trying to save someone who appears may still be
savable?
What happens when a patient who is wearing one of those
hospital ID wristbands dies but no one can identify the hospital.  In
addition, his symptoms before he dies are very odd.  While everyone is
running around madly in the trauma ward, only Dr Luthan notices the
band and wonders what hospital had issued it.  This turns into a
mystery thriller as he attempts to track down the hospital and learn
why the man died.  Dr. Luthan feels there is something very fishy
going on and indeed there is.
What makes the film even more exciting is that it involves one
of the country's most famous doctors, Dr. Lawrence Myrick (Gene
Hackman).
Dr. Luthan's nurse is Jodie Trammel (Sarah Jessica Parker)
who works with him in the trauma ward.

Title
Review for Truth About Cats & Dogs, The (1996)
     If you are looking for an entertaining film, and who is not, you
could do a lot worse than dropping in on THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS AND
DOGS.   The title comes from a radio talk show whose host, a
veterinarian,  is Abby Barnes (Janeane Garofolo).   With charm and wit
she hands out advice to those who call in asking for  advice about
their animals.  Abby is very good at helping those with problems but
her own, as is often the case in Life,  are not as easy for her to
solve.
     For one thing, the adorable and charming Abby thinks she is
neither adorable nor charming, so when Brian (Ben Chaplin) phones in
about his dog who loves to lick his face and Brian likes both the
advice and the sound of the voice dispensing the advice , Abby is at a
loss when Brian asks if he can meet her at a restaurant .and thank her
personally.  "What do you look like?" Brian asks.   "There goes the
ballgame," Abby thinks.   In a panic she describes herself as tall and
blonde, a description that  fits her neighbor, Noelle (Uma Thurman).
In any case, she has no intention of meeting Brian so what is a little
lie?
     Much like a female version of Cyrano, THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS AND
DOGS, has just what it takes to make the film so much fun to watch.
Brian searches for Abby and finds her. As the tall, willowy blonde
Noelle happens to be visiting her friend, it is natural that Brian
thinks Noelle is Abby; the description fits what Abby had told him.
>From there, Brian's falling in love with the woman he thinks is Abby,
makes for a funfilled film of mistaken identity but with its own
clever version.   It's a delight.

Title
Review for Beautician and the Beast, The (1997)
The truth is I was not expecting the movie to be as good as it was.  I
can only take Fran Drescher (TV's "Nanny") for short bits. Whether it
was Drescher or the director who slowed her down, it was all for the
good and is largely responsible for the film being charming and funny.
In a way some of the situations are reminiscent of The King and I, even
to some of the comic posturing by the heartily disliked dictator, Boris
Pochenko (Timothy Dalton), of the mythical Eastern European country of
Slovetzia. . . . except that the humor here is different than in The
King and I but frequently and surprisingly every bit as funny.
Joy Miller (Drescher) is a beautician and beauty teacher in the Borough
of Queens, New York City.   But Joy is sure that one day she will get
the break she deserves and, surprise (!) it comes in the shape of
Ambassador Grushinsky (Ian McNeice) from Slovetzia who is looking for a
teacher.  The dictator Pochenko, known in his country as The Beast  is
looking to change his image.  He wants to be liked.  How better than to
engage a teacher to begin to mold his family and then him?    The
emissary knows that Fran is a teacher but he is unaware that her
teaching consists of beauty hints.
Arriving in Slovezia, she is taken with the palatial luxury as well as
its ruler.  Follows some revolutionary intrigue, arrests, etc. and Fran
has to teach Pochenko something about free speech and democracy.  All,
you will be happy to hear, turns out well.  That it entertains all the
way is another plus. Special mention should be made of teenager Lisa
Jakub who is a deadringer for Isabella Rossellini.

Title
Review for Ladro di bambini, Il (1992)
Sad but heartwarming, this story of real life for some unfortunates.
The film is of an 11-year-old girl and her brother, two years younger,
and a good hearted soldier in the Carabinieri.
Because the family in destitute, the mother puts out her young daughter
as a prostitute, the sole income for the mother and her two children.
When the mother and her boyfriend are arrested, he for having sex with
the young girl, the mother for having prostituted the child, the two
children are sent from Sicily to a Children's Home in the custody of a
young soldier in the Carabinieri.
While the young officer is taking them by train to the Home, he does
everything he can to befriend them.   They, he feels, are children and
thus not responsible for what they did or what befell them but both the
girl and boy remain sullen and unresponsive.
Arriving at the Home, they find that they will not be admitted.  The
person in charge says that without a medical certificate for the girl
he will not allow them to stay.  They then start a trip to another
Home, this one in Milan but on the way, the soldier decides they will
stop at a relative's house where he introduces the youngsters as the
children of another officer.   As the relatives own a restaurant and
there is a big party in progress, the girl and boy get a taste of
normal life until one woman recognizes the girl from a picture in a
magazine and blows their cover.  They move on.
The soldier meanwhile has gotten a car.  They stop at a beach where the
kids can enjoy themselves.  Both the girl, but especially the boy, have
now warmed up to the officer who has promised to visit them and
correspond and never to lose track of them.   A poignant moment in a
beautiful film.
Go see the film.   Not all of life is fun and games and this film tells
it as it is, not as we would like it to be.  But it is told so
lovingly. . . and it does have a "maybe it will be OK after all"
ending.
Stars Enrico Lo Verso, Valentina Scalici and Giuseppe Leracitano.

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
John Travolta was originally given the role of the reporter in MAD
CITY but fortunately he opted for being Sam, the bewildered security
guard at a local art museum.   The brash reporter, Max Brackett,
belongs to Dustin Hoffman who does a bang up job.
How many times have we witnessed a reporter shoving a microphone in
the face of an injured person being carried to an ambulance, asking
"How did you feel when you learned you lost your leg?"  How many
times have we seen a TV News crew on the front steps of the home of
bereaved parents, asking them, "What was your first reaction when
you learned your little daughter had been killed by a hit and run
driver?"   The point of MAD CITY, is that the story comes first, the
reporter wanting to milk the situation for as long as he can.  His
exposure on the small screen is the name of the game.
Max, formerly with a network, has been banished to a small station
at the behest of the big city anchor, Kevin Hollander (Alan Alda)
who did not like frequently being upstaged by Max.   To keep Max in
tow, the station's manager, Lou Potts, (Robert Prosky) assigns him
to cover a small story about finances at the local art museum.   He
assigns a young, pretty woman, Laurie (Mia Kirshner) to assist Max.
Best laid plans and all of that, while covering this non-story, Sam,
who had been fired by the art director Mrs. Banks (Blythe Danner)
for drinking a bit too much at the museum's party, comes by to
demand his job back.   When Mrs. Banks says she will not rehire him,
the naive young man pulls a gun which he had no intention of ever
using but brought to the museum along with some sticks of dynamite
thinking to scare Mrs. Banks into giving him back his job.  He has
seen too much TV and has been led to believe that this is how you
get your job back.
In the museum are a couple of dozen children on a tour.  They are
now hostages. So far, that is enough to land SAM in a lot of trouble
but when the gun accidentally goes off and he shoots a fellow guard,
the stakes skyrocket.  Witnessing in an adjacent room is Max who
whispers on the connection to Laurie to alert the station that they
have a major hostage situation.   The bigger the tragedy, the better
the story; it is as simple as that.
MAD CITY then goes on to show Max discovered and coming out of
hiding, befriends Sam whom he advises.   But all the time, he really
does not want the drama to end too soon; not before he can again
become nationally known.   The big city anchor, Hollander, wants to
dump Max and turn this major event into his story.  He promises Max
that if the story is turned over to him, he will see that Max is
returned to big time.
Both Travolta and Hoffman are utterly believable.  Sam. bewildered,
not meaning to hurt anyone, just wanting his job back . . . and Max
orchestrating the proceedings to prolong the drama.
There is a delightful punch line delivered by Laurie to Max at the film's
end but you will have to hear it for yourselves.

Title
Review for Mighty Aphrodite (1995)
     There appears to be no end to the genius of Woody Allen.
Over the years I have seen some great comedies but I do not recall
ever seeing any movie as funny as MIGHTY APHRODITE.  There is no
one in the film world who comes close to Allen  not only in his
incredible sense of humor but in originality.  You have never seen
any movie such as this one. From the opening scene (about which I am
not about to tell you) to the ending clincher it is a beaut.
     Right along with the comedy is a story with an ending O. Henry
would have loved.
     To tell you what role each actor had would reveal too much so
let us just name a few that will not give anything away.  There is
F. Murray Abraham, Olympia Dukakis, David Ogden Stiers, Jack Warden
(as a blind man), and Peter Weller as an art gallery owner who tries
to get Amanda (Helen Bonham Carter, who plays Woody's wife) to leave
Allen. If you remember (and how could you forget?) the lovely Carter
from ROOM WITH A VIEW and HOWARD'S END, you are in for another
surprise.
     The story line is relatively simple.  Amanda decides to have a
baby with her husband, sports writer Allen.  He emphatically puts
his foot down.  Next scene shows them cooing over a one-day-old baby
boy whom they have adopted.  This is followed by a discussion of
choosing a name.
     When the son is about six years old, Woody begins to wonder who
the birth mother was and who the birth father was because he feels
that one day their son will want to know about the parents who are
responsible for his birth.  Visits to the Home where they had
adopted the child leads him on a great search.  He finally finds
Linda (Mira Sorvino) who has changed her name several times for
reasons you will discover when you see the film.  She is the birth
mother.  Her circumstances are not very good so Woody introduces
her to a handsome onion farmer with whom she can live happily ever
after.  That part is played by Michael Rapaport.
     Enough!  For a great evening (or matinee) of laughter, this is
the film to see.  Surely the OSCAR people are furiously taking
notes.
Written, Directed and starring Woody Allen.

Title
Review for Federal Hill (1995)
     Every big city in the U.S. has an area that is decayed, decadent,
drug-ridden, and inhabited by punks.   In Providence, R.I., for the
past 50 years, the area is Federal Hill.  Here you can find the gangs
with their intense devotion to each other and their families but punks,
nevertheless.  When a film is made about them I expect it has a point
(BOYZ IN THE HOOD).  This one does not.
     Nick (Anthony De Santo) and Ralph (Nicholas Turturro) grew up in
Federal Hill.  The only world they know is what happens in their
neighborhood, what they can see from the top of the Hill.  This limits
their interests to what is bounded by their neighborhood and limits
their horizons.  They do not expect to better themselves nor, for the
most, will they.  In fact, they are drones, completely lacking in any
aspirations.
     Close by, but a million miles away in every other way, is Brown
University where the rich send their kids.  One of the students, a
Senior, Wendy (Libby Langdon), enters Federal Hill to scout for some
drugs for the Senior Prom.   When she meets one of the Federal Hill
residents, Nicky, she falls for him ... or so we are asked to believe
by the filmmakers; a rather strong dose of incredibility for us to
swallow.   There is no chance that Wendy's parents will accept Nicky
and how Nicky can ever believe that he would be is nonsense.
     In any case, Nicky and his friend have been to long involved with
the Federal Hill activities and no good will come of that.

Title
Review for Shallow Grave (1994)
     Here we have a humorous, taut, gory and fast-moving mystery that
will keep you more than interested as your emotions get rocked about in
this sometimes funny, sometimes violent film.  Made in Scotland (in
1994) we here in the States could occasionally use subtitles but for
the most part we know what is being said and what is happening.
     Juliet (Kerry Fox), David (Christopher Eccleston) and Alex (Ewan
McGregor) live together as friends in a large apartment.  They
advertise for a fourth roommate.  Juliet is a doctor, Alex is a
reporter but I never did find out what David does for a living except
that he is always in a hurry as he leaves with his briefcase.  After
interviewing what seems like dozens of people, none of whom fits the
criteria set up by the three roommates, (picky, picky, picky) they
finally agree on Hugo (Keith Allen) who appears to be just the right
kind of roommate they are looking for.
     That, however, does not last long as the very next morning they
discover Hugo lying nude and dead (Dr. Juliet confirms he O.D.'d) and a
drawer reveals a hypodermic needle.)  While they are about to call the
police, they discover a suitcase which when opened reveals it is filled
with money.  This presents a dilemma. To keep or not to keep, that is
the question.  They decide, after much ... well, a little ... soul
searching they could use the money better than the authorities.  Of
course,  there is the little matter of getting rid of the body.
     All of this takes place in perhaps the first twenty minutes of the
film.  The fun and the mystery, more murders and police, disputes among
the three former friends take up the the remainder of the film.
     Nicely directed by Danny Boyle who manages to bring out the
changes in people when money is involved ... and to do it with no
wasted film.

Title
Review for SubUrbia (1997)
Director Linklater has at least two excellent films to his
credit, DAZED AND CONFUSED and the even better SLACKER.
However, subUrbia seems to be a variation on a theme and
this third time it tells us nothing new.   Using the same
cutesy upper and lower cases  in the title as in  Eric
Bogosian's play does nothing for the movie.
There are seven 20-year-olds  who have not a clue as to what
they should do with their lives or where they are heading.
This can lead to trouble and not surprisingly, it does. They
have nothing better to do than hang out each night in front
of a convenience store much to the annoyance of its owner, a
Pakistani, who feels their presence is driving away
potential customers.   Racism crops up when one of them has
had too much to drink.  One thing leads to another and none
of it is good as violence erupts.
The Pakistani husband is played by Ajay Naidu and his wife
is Samia Shoaib. The rest of the cast consists of Giovanni
Ribisi, Amie Carey, Jayce Bartok, Parker Posey, Nicky Katt,
Steve Zahn and Dina Spybey..

Title
Review for Little Rascals, The (1994)
     Way back in 1922, Hal Roach who had produced Laurel and Hardy and
Harold Lloyd silent comedies, came up with a comedic look at the
innocent adventures of children.  There existed at the time shorts with
child actors and with the movies designed for a young audience.  Roach,
on the other hand, aimed at both young and adults when he started his
series (originally called Hal Roach's Rascals).
     Roach employed unknowns in order to get spontaneity and naivete.
Child actors such as Shirley Temple were not even considered ... and
Mickey Rooney flunked his audition.  From the beginning the series was
a great success.  The question before the House is: what about this
1994 version?
     Director Penelope Spheeris had a great group of kids to work with,
many of whom looked very much like the original "gang," right down
through Petey, the dog with the black ring around one eye.  The problem
may be that this latest version is too cutesy.  Little Darla, for
example, who looks very much like the original, is made to act too
adult.  The action is for the kids in the audience while the gags are
for their parents.
     Despite the elements being there, the film is only mildly
amusing.  Although most of the new kids look very much like the
originals, it may be that imitation has its limitations.

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
At last a thriller with a protagonist who could be a contestant on
Jeopardy.  That is billionaire Charles Morse (Anthony Hopkins).
Charles thinks it is a wasted talent to know every kind of trivia;
nothing one can use in real life.
Real life is his wife, very much younger than he, the stunning
Mickey who is a model on a shoot in Alaska with Robert Green (Alec
Baldwin) the high fashion photographer;  her husband has been
invited to come along..  Green is in love with Mickey, as who could
resist her incredible smile?   When a new site for  the shoot is
needed, Robert, accompanied by Charles, take off by plane to scout
other locales.  The plane crashes in an Alaskan wilderness, and now
Charles and Robert have to depend on each other for survival. What
complicates matters is that Charles is certain his wife and Robert
have been having an affair.
Suddenly, Charles' knowledge of  trivia becomes the only thing
between living and dying.   There is little of which he is unable to
take advantage, from making fire to warding off a bear who is intent
on tracking them.  The question is, does Charles really want to save
Robert; another question is, would Robert kill Charles if there was
a chance to get back to civilization without him?   The two are as
unlike personalities as ever have been thrown together in a struggle
for life.     This is equally true of the acting styles of Hopkins
and Baldwin.   Add that the director chose a famous super-model to
portray a famous super-model and Macpherson came through very
nicely.
THE EDGE is a tensely fascinating thriller with two  men wary of
each other, a determined bear who does not care which of the two he
tears apart, the weather and the isolation of being lost and
probably never found.    Exceptional performance by Hopkins . . . as
always.

Title
Review for Kissing a Fool (1998)
What a fun movie!    The story may not be the most believable but
the acting is so deliciously good and fast-paced you are not going
to care; it will seem like a true story.
The movie opens with a wedding in a large outdoor garden.
Max (David Schwimmer) and Jay (Jason Lee) are best friends who go
way back together. While Max, a sports broadcaster who has more
women than should be allowed any one man in a lifetime, that is
about all he does know.  Women and sports.   Jay, on the other hand,
is more literary and cultured.   One day Jay tells Max he has a
girl, Samantha,  whom Max   absolutely must date.   Affectionately
called "Sam," she (the adorable Mili Avatal), happens to be an
editor at a publishing house where Jay is having his book made
ready.  Playboy Max and cultured Sam could hardly be less alike.
In a hysterically funny scene, a real belly-laugher, Max berates Jay
for having ruined his reputation by having himself be seen and
photographed with a loud-mouthed drunk.   In detail he describes
last night to an incredulous Jay.
Very shortly thereafter  Max is moving into Sam's apartment.
Surprised?   Never fear; it is all explained in the movie..   Sam
makes an announcement, on a sports broadcast listened to by his many
female friends, that he is no longer "available."    At this point I
should mention that while Schwimmer and Lee are handsome, the
beautiful, Ms. Avatal, a shining star in Israel, has the most
expressive eyes and face anywhere on the screen today.  Lovely.
Worth the price of admission;
All would be well as both Sam and Max appear to be  deeply in love.
But Max,  the kind of guy who never heard  "If it ain't broke,
don't fix it," begins to worry what if one day Sam decides she has
had enough of him and dumps him; he has always been the dumper and
now is afraid of possibly ending up a dumpee.   He must find out if
Sam is a one-man woman.   If Jay would play up to her with flowers,
dinners, nice words, would he be able to get Sam into the sack?  If
"Yes" then he better know before he marries her.
Jay, of course, tells him he is crazy and he will not do it but Max
begs and so Jay goes along. The idea is not to bed her but only to
see if that were possible.   As well we all know, nothing ever works
out as planned which is why this riotous comedy takes a very humorous turn.
Almost stealing the movie from the three main characters is Bonnie
Hunt as Linda, a woman at the wedding who is relating to two
breathless guests what the wedding is all about..   She knows every
bit of the story that leads up to the wedding and she relates what
is happening while the movie flashes back and forth in time to show
what it is she is describing. A gimmick but here used to perfection.
Not to be missed.

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
         **************************************
This is a fun movie.  Harrison Ford, as Quinn Harris),  has never been more
charmingly delightful.  His grin is wide . . . and small wonder: he is playing
opposite Anne Heche (as Robin Monroe) who pulls out all the stops; everyone is
going to love her pixielike smile.  For those in showbiz who worried about
Ellen DeGeneres' girlfriend playing the love interest with Quinn Harris
(Harrison Ford): relax!   Both are terrific actors who light up the screen
when the two are kissing, wrestling or just gazing at each other.
Frank, (David Schwimmer) is just right as the man engaged to marry Robin.
He is a nice, try-hard-to-be-faithful, fianc.   True, he has a real battle
on his hands when the very sexy Angelica (Jacqueline Obradors) invites him
to spend the night with her when Robin and Quinn disappear in the storm. Of
course, things happen to make life not that easy but hey, this is the movie
world. Michael Browning wrote a laugh a minute script that sparkles with
humor and keeps the film  entertaining just about every moment.
Robin is an editor for a New York magazine.  David has surprised her with
tickets to a remote Pacific island where they are to have the time of their
lives relaxing on vacation.    Shortly after their arrival, she receives an
urgent call from her boss, Marjorie (Allison Janney) who does not take "no"
for an answer. Robin must come home for just one day to handle an
emergency.
Robin learns the quickest way to get back to New York is to fly to
another island on a little island-hopper of a plane piloted by an
unlikely-looking pilot, Quinn Harris.    At this point writer Browning has
the weather enter the picture. An unexpected storm comes up resulting in a
crash landing on a remote uninhabited island. . . and the fun begins. The
fun even includes pirates.
This all made for a most entertaining evening.

Title
Review for Dear God (1996)
          DEAR GOD is a pleasant enough comedy and Tom Turner (Greg
Kinnear) is a pleasant enough young man and all would have been well
if the very talented director had not gone overboard and made the
comedy utterly ludicrous and unbelievable.   The one saving grace is
that of Rebecca Frazen (Laurie Metcalf).  Metcalf turns in a most
hilarious performance when she suddenly emerges as an attorney in one
of the funniest bits of acting I can remember.  She is a gem!
          The story is simple.  Tom Turner is a conman.  He owes his
"friends" money that he cannot repay.  When a judge gives him a choice
of sentence, either prison or get a real job, he has to stop and think
before opting for the job.  Reminded me of Jack Benny when, in one of
his stingy skits, he is confronted by a holdup man who says "Your
money or your life" and Benny has to stop and think.  Turner finally
opts for the job.
          Turner works in the dead-letter department of the post
office with a bunch of weird characters played by Tim Conway, Roscoe
Lee Browne, Anna Maria Horsford and several more.  Also in the cast
are Hector Elizondo as the supervisor, Rue McClanahan and Jack
Klugman.  Nancy Marchand is the judge at film's end.  Maria Petillo is
the love interest.
          Turner wonders what to do with letters addressed to God from
people asking for help.  He decides to help them, an unlikely turn for
a conman . . . and so no one on the outside believes him.  But the
film gets crazy when hundreds of postal workers, with their vehicles,
surround the courthouse, and others with placards saying "Save Tom"
kind of moves the film from funny to utterly silly.  On the other
hand, it is a feel-good film so let us not carp.

Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
Born and raised with two strikes against him, Francie Brady (Eamonn
Owens), with a drunk for a father, Benny (Stephen Rea), and a
mother, (Aisling O'Sullivan) slowly going mad because of that and
their abject poverty, the one thing Francie needs but is denied him
is understanding and love. The consequences of being shunned are
horrendous.
 Based on the novel by Patrick McCabe and beautifully directed by Neil
 Jordan whom we all remember from The Crying Game, the film is taut,
 tense with our knowledge that there can be no happy ending for young
 Francie.
 Francie's only friend is Joe (Alan Boyle) who together enjoy a world of
 comic books and imaginative play.   Later, even Joe opts for friends who
 are more stable, leaving Francie further alone and devastated.  One of his
 biggest enemies is the gossip, Mrs.  Nugent (Fiona Shaw) who takes a
 great dislike to Francie, blaming him for all the troubles he experiences.
 When Francie returns from reform school, he finds employment in a
 slaughterhouse, (hence, the film's title) hardly the right place
for a pre-teen, especially one with Francie's problems and
disposition.   Perhaps the last place where he should be working  is
where animals are hacked up and blood is all over the place.
 Both his parents die.  Despite his having had nothing to do with
either, having received nothing from them, he is further alienated.
He latches onto an imaginary Virgin Mary icon (Sinead O'Connor) who
"talks" with him.   However, eventually all of these hardship descend
upon the child and he explodes in a rage of violence.
 Despite the seriousness of the subject, there are, surprisingly,
moments of laughter.  As Shakespeare well knew, you don't  keep
everyone on edge without relieving the tension every now and then.
 I have one caveat: the movie should have subtitles.   I've said it
before of other films made in Great Britain.  In particular, this
film is laid in a small out of the way village and the accents are
rough on the ears.  Despite being able  easily to follow the story
without understanding every spoken word, I felt I was missing
something by not hearing everything uttered.  When are those in
charge going to realize that some English-speaking films do require
subtitles?

Title
Review for Rich Man's Wife, The (1996)
In probably the funniest summer film this season, Mr
Wormwood and wife, (Danny DeVito and Rhea Perlman)  aided by  Matilda
(Mara Wilson) make a most hilariously enjoyable movie for both
children and adults alike.  By all means, this is not to be missed.
Matilda is a very, very bright child whom the parents are
too stupid to notice.  At her very first birthday, with a nice
chocolate cake in front of her, she spells out her name on the
chocolate: M A T I L D A.   The idiot parents berate her for ruining
the cake, never noticing that the one-year-old is spelling.
By the time she is 8-years-old she has devoured almost every
book in the library . . . and we do not mean those that have pictures.
Her father wants her to stop reading and watch TV.  "What can you
learn from a book that you can't learn better from TV?" he demands.
"And, by the way, what book are you reading now; she shows him it's
MOBY DICK."   In a frenzy he tears out the pages and berates her for
reading porno books.
At school, she is sent to an institution that is more
like a jail, with the headmistress, Trunchbull, (Pam Ferris) , more of
a mean old witch than a school principal.   Fortunately, there is Miss
Honey, (Embeth Davidtz) Matilda's teacher, who helps and understands
the child's genius.
Again, forget the summer trash and see a movie worth its
weight in gold.   See the darling MATILDA.
Quirky Eddie (Matt Ross) is a delight to watch in this very
offbeat, funny film.   To begin with, Ed's job is that of a geneticist
who is trying to improve rice.   Ed is shy, naive, and a sweet guy who
has not the faintest idea about how to talk to women.
Ed has just moved to NYC from the midwest.   He finally finds a
place he can share with someone, in this case it is Ray (Kevin Carrol)
a handsome young black man.   Unlike Ed, Ray knows his way around
women.  He has to coach Ed in what to say as he listens in disbelief
to what Ed is rehearsing when a woman friend is about to arrive.
Lee (Callie Thorne) is, among other things, a violinist in a
nightclub quartet.   Ray takes him to the club and Ed falls instantly
in love with Lee. Their romance is something to behold.    The humor
is enchanting as is the wonderful dialog.   It would spoil the review
to tell you more except it is a film you will not want to miss.  The
acting of Ross, Carrol and Thorne are terrific.
There has been very little worth seeing at the movies these
past couple of months.   Many of them look so much alike you would
have difficulty telling them apart.  I am talking about the gore, the
shooting, the psychos. . . the so-called "thriller."
In RICH MAN'S WIFE, Tony (Christopher McDonald) is "the rich
man."   Josie Potenza (the beautiful Halle Berry) is his wife whom he
neglects though it is hard to know why.   Instead he is deep into his
many business deals but finds time to be unfaithful.  When he gets
murdered, Josie is the natural suspect as she has the most to gain,
his wealth.  First she tells the police one story and then she
promises to tell the truth.  What are the cops to believe?
Josie turns to Jake (Clive Owen) for "comfort."  A bad move
as he is a friend of a psycho, Cole, (Peter Greene).  Cole wants not
only to have Josie but to also blackmail her.  Things get real
complicated but stay boring as the film has nothing new you have not
seen many times before.  Only the names are changed to protect the
innocent actors.
Halle Berry is beautiful and Peter Greene is slimy and
vicious.  It takes more than that to make a good movie.
Written and Directed by Amy Holden Jones

Title
Review for Land Girls, The (1998)
Wars, at least those, unlike our mess in VietNam, that are considered
"just," have a way of uniting the population in ways that put aside race,
gender and class.  Everyone pitches in to help our men in battle,   Long
before this happened in the U.S. in WWII, in Britain, as far back as the
first World War, they had the Women's Land Army, commonly  known as the
Land Girls, women who worked on the farms and in factories while their men
were fighting the enemy. As many as 100,000 women were part of that "army"
since its inception.  This film is about three women in WWII and their
adventures on a farm in England.
Based on a 1994 popular book by Angela Huth, it is about three pretty
women with varying backgrounds and personalities.  There is Stella
(Catherine McCormack), a banker's daughter, whose fianc is a Naval
Officer.   Ag (Rachel Weiss), is a graduate of Cambridge University,
brainy and capricious.  Rounding out the threesome is  a  working-class
hairdresser, Prue (Anna Friel.)
The three live on a farm owned by the Lawrences, (Tom Georgeson and
Maureen Obrien).   Also on the farm is the Lawrences' handsome son, Joe,
who wants to be a fighter pilot but has to help out his parents on the
farm.   Before very long the girls and Joe, with pre-war inhibitions out
the window, become "good friends."    Before the war's end, each has gone
through some rough periods; tragedy is a great part of war.  General
Sherman said it better: War is hell.
As with so many films being made these days, this one runs too long.  At
least, the one hour and fifty minutes seems longer than that because the
epilog could have been omitted.   Showing what happened to each of the
characters after the war's end turns out to be on the corny side and
spoils what would otherwise have been a better film.

Title
Review for Denise Calls Up (1995)
     This is an original way of telling the story of how many
relationships are started and conducted today.  We are talking about
the computer age, BBSing, e-mail, and the telephone.  We talk to each
other, we get to know each other real well, all because of the
anonymity the computer communication allows.  Because of that daily
contact and "conversation" there is little we eventually do not know
about the other party/parties, nor they about us except what they look
like.
     Denise (Alanna Ubach) is on the phone constantly, frequently
interrupted by Call Waiting.  So are Frank (Tim Daly), Barbara
(Caroleen Feeney), Martin (Dan Gunther), Gale (Dana Wheeler Nicholson),
Jerry (Liev Schreiber) and Linda (Aida Turturro).  The whole film is
about talking, gossiping, rumors, constant interruptions with Call
Waiting, more ringing.
     The conversations lead to intimate relationships, never
consummated; they don't even meet but can they ever talk.  And what
they talk about is usually utter trivia until we learn that one of the
women has become pregnant via a sperm donor.
     The film opens the morning after a party, tables laden with food
because no one showed up last night. . . but they all have great
excuses.  The fact is everyone is afraid to meet in person; keeping it
a phone thing is more relaxing and make believe than the real tbing may
turn out to be.  Every time something is arranged, such as a lunch, no
one shows up.
     Having experienced on my computer much of what goes on in the film
(even if it is exaggerated with dramatic license), I can vouch for its
authenticity.  I mean it COULD happen and among the millions who are on
BBSes and Internet's e-mail, it surely happens many, many times a
day.  It would have been perfect if the film left out the telephone
and somehow utilized the computer for the whole film but that may have
been too tricky to accomplish as a movie.  Nevertheless, especially to
those of us who love our computer communicating, this is a film not to
be missed.  It's billed as a "cyber-comedy."

Title
Review for Othello (1995)
     Shakespeare's drama, OTHELLO, is one among many of his great
plays.  This story of the beautiful Desdemona (Irene Jacob), the
daughter of a Venetian nobleman, who elopes with her lover, Othello the
Moor, (Laurence Fishburne), a renowned warrior, like most of
Shakespeare's plays ends in betrayal, deceit and tragedy.  Some years
ago I saw James Earl Jones in a live performance that made me burst
into tears as he tore at his breast, as he bemoaned his having killed
his beloved wife.  You could feel his terrible hurt.   Fishburne, one
of my favorite actors, (What's Love Got To Do With It?) however, is not
quite ready to do justice to Shakespeare; at least not to the role of
Othello.
     Iago (Kenneth Branagh) is the conniving villain who despite having
been Othello's right hand man for some ten years, is overlooked and
instead, a promotion goes to Cassio (Nathaniel Parker).
>From then on Iago plots against Othello and Desdemona, to make
Othello suspicious, jealous of his wife.  Othello is filled with
disbelief and demands proof;  Iago supplies the "proof."  Branagh
plays it cool without histrionics but then, Branagh is not new to
Shakespeare.

Title
Review for Secret Agent, The (1996)
THE SECRET AGENT gives new meaning to the thriller genre.  Here is a
tense, taut, thrill-a-minute tour through Soho, London in 1886 with a
spy, Anarchists and Nihilists, including  Robin Williams in a
non-credited role, who walks around with a hand grenade.   Terrorism,
such as we recently experienced in Oklahoma, is not something new.
Hold onto your seat!
Verloc (Bob Hoskins) is both a secret agent and a spy for Russia.
His job is to provoke the dissidents into explosive action while he
pretends to be one of them   When the Russian Embassy decides he is
not doing enough to earn the money they are paying him, they order him
to plant a bomb which will be blamed on the Anarchists.   But things
do not work out as planned, do they?
Verloc has been living nicely on the money he receives as a spy-
provocateur.  He has a young wife, Winnie, (Patricia Arquette)  who
married him so she could take care of her brother, Stevie (Christian
Bale) a somewhat retarded young man who lives with Winnie and Verloc.
While the anarchists complain about government interference in their
lives, they are not men of action and so they are permitted  to engage
in soap-boxing.  But the man known as "The Professor" (George
Spelvin) is a nihilist seeking to destroy everything.   He wants to
invent the perfect explosive. All hell breaks loose in the Verloc
household when Verloc attempts to plant the bomb.
Patricia Arquette will surely be nominated for an Oscar for the
brilliance of her portrayal of Winnie.  Bob Hoskins is his usual
underplayed self and here as the spy he is perfect.   This then is a
thriller you will not want to miss.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Coincidentally, the film's title befits this reviewer's opinion of the
movie.   For sheer entertainment, for witty dialog, for fine acting,
it will be hard for any 1997 film to beat. Nicholson, in particular,
gives the performance of a lifetime as the mean-spirited romance
novelist, Melvin,  who would rather insult you than ignore you.   Not
giving the slightest relationship to whom you are, he enjoys
indiscriminately lashing out.
The first big laugh is when he tosses his next door neighbor's dog
into the trash chute found on each floor of the apartment house.   The
neighbor, Simon Nye (Greg Kinnear) happens to be an artist enjoying
much praise, which is reason number one (though no reason is needed)
for Melvin to attack.   Reason number two is that Simon is gay and
Melvin uses that as an excuse (again, not needed) to vent his spleen
on Simon.
The last of the film's triumvirate is Carol, (Helen Hunt) a single
mother with  an asthmatic child.    She is the waitress in the local
cafe where Melvin has his daily cholesterol-filled breakfast.   Her
small claim to fame is that she is the only one who fights back
against Melvin's sarcasm.
Melvin, as it happens, is not merely just mean; he actually suffers
from the medical problem of uncontrolled compulsive obsession.
Everything and everything is magnified by this illness.   Oddly
enough, the more Melvin lashes out at her and the more she retaliates,
a special relationship develops, each recognizing something good in
the other.    And so, while Melvin, Carol and Simon seem to share
nothing in common, their lives intertwine in this very funny and
touching not-to-be-missed film.
Smaller parts are handled nicely by Skeet Ulrich, Cuba Gooding, Jr.,
and Shirley Knight.
None of this, of course,  would have been possible without Mark
Andrus' excellent story and script, the latter in collaboration with
James  L.  Brooks.   Making intelligent, poignant adult dialog is not
easy but Andrus and Brooks have really poured it on in large
quantities so that it is a delight to listen to the actors say their
lines.

Title
Review for Picture Perfect (1997)
If you are looking for a romantic comedy such as we used to get in
years long gone, this is it.  However, don't stop reading: PICTURE
PERFECT is modern in every way.   Given a cast that can do comedy,
screenwriters Arleen Sorkin & Paul Slansky & Glenn Gordon Caron
have come up with a sprightly, fast moving movie.
Kate (Jennifer Aniston) is a beautiful young woman with an
endearing smile.  She would be a cinch for promotion at her job
except that her boss, Mr. Mercer (Kevin Dunn) promotes only those
who are married, have responsibilities and will not readily quit
the job.
In the office is the Lothario, Sam (Kevin Bacon) who needs the
challenge of a woman who is married, encumbered.  Kate has a crush
on him but as she is single, she does not stand a chance.  Back at
home, Mama (Olympia Dukakis) keeps bugging her.  She wants a
grandchild.
To the rescue comes Darcy (Illeana Douglas) a friend and office
colleague who has the brilliant idea of taking a picture of Kate
and some handsome man at a party and having Kate pretend he is her
guy.  That should make the boss happy.  It also makes Sam happy
because now that Kate is engaged to be married, she falls into the
category that he likes.   Kate, for her part, likes this
arrangement because it has gotten her Sam.
Things begin to heat up when Kate has to produce, get off the
dime.  Everyone wants to meet her boyfriend Nick (Jay Mohr).  To
this end she offers to pay Nick to come to her city and pretend he
is her fiance.   But Nick has taken a liking to Kate . . . and who
can blame him?   He comes to her town but refuses to play her game
. . . and the comedy really takes off.
      Aniston is a delight to watch.  She is currently in TV's
FRIENDS and is scheduled to appear in several upcoming films.  Jay
Mohr is very handsome and personable.  You remember him from JERRY
MAGUIRE.  He will appear shortly in SUICIDE KINGS.  Kevin Bacon
was in APOLLO 13 as well as in many other films in as many
different kinds of roles.

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
In undoubtedly one of the best films of 1996, this biopic of Larry
Flynt, is astonishingly enough, about the First Amendment to the
Constitution. Despite its subject matter, the film is extremely
entertaining mainly because of the hero . . . well, not really a hero
but the protagonist.  One could hardly characterize a crazy (just
eccentric?) pornographer as a  hero.   The beautiful part is that
neither the brilliant writers (Scott Alexander & Larry Karaszewski,
who did the biopic Ed Wood) as well as Director Milos Forman attempt
to gloss over Flynt's faults.
Flynt is played in an Oscar-grade performance by Woody Harrelson,
aided and abetted by an underage stripper named Althea  (Courtney
Love) in a bravura performance, turning from the teenager into a wife
and drug addict. There is not a dull moment in the film which despite
every kind of nudity (you name it) is never erotic.  Sleaze prevails
because that is Flynt's thing and Forman never forgets that for a
single frame.
For a pornographer to be the catalyst of a fight for free speech that
ends in the Supreme Court is ironic and in a way unfortunate.  But as
that is how it happened in real life it is all the more forceful.
This could not have happened without Alan Isaacman (Edward Norton in a
most satisfying, enjoyable portrayal of the civil rights lawyer who
stuck with Flynt all the way.) Personable, believable, charming,
Norton's every moment on the screen was cherished by me.
The film's dialogue was frequently hilarious, always beautifully
written.  The courtroom scenes, the look-alikes of Charles Keating
(James Cromwell) of the Lincoln Savings funds mishandling and Jerry
Falwell (Richard Paul) of the Moral Majority was very funny.  Also in
the cast are the real James Carville who forged Bill Clinton's first
presidential campaign, Brett Harrelson (Woody's real-life brother) as
brother Jimmy Flynt, Donna Hanover as ex- President Jimmy Carter's
evangelist sister who gets Larry to accept Jesus and become a
born-again Christian.  When he gives up on that phase of his life,
Althea proclaims "Porn Again."
This movie has everything:  great acting, drama, nudity, and much
humor. What else do you want?    Run to the nearest theater that is
showing it.

Title
Review for While You Were Sleeping (1995)
     This makes for a very light romantic comedy.  If you are not
looking for anything deeper,  you will find it entertaining.
     Poor but winsome Lucy (Sandra Bullock) works as a cashier at an
elevated station in Chicago, about as dull a job as one could find.
The only bright spot in her day is the handsome man she sees each
morning as he is about to board his train.  They've never spoken; in
fact he does not even know she exists. That is the extent of Lucy's
love life.
     Because Lucy has no real excuse not to work on holidays she is
always talked into doing so; other cashiers have family with whom to
celebrate but for Lucy one day is like the next ... except this day
unexpected things happen.  The man she has a thing for, the one who
shows up every day, is Peter (Peter Gallagher).  For him it turns out
to be a different kind of day, too, as he gets mugged and pushed onto
the tracks.  Lucy races out of the booth, jumps onto the tracks and
saves Peter (and herself) by rolling away from the oncoming train.
Peter, however, ends up in a coma.
     At this point a comedy of errors begins to occur.  Lucy visits
Peter but not being family, she is not allowed to see him.  A nurse
mistakenly surmises that she is his fiancee and allows her into the
room.  When his family arrives, the nurse innocently introduces Lucy as
Peter's fiancee.  He is still in coma.
     Jack (Bill Pullman) is Peter's suspicious brother. Their father is
played by Peter Boyle, the mother is Micole Mercurio, and Glynis Johns
is the grandmother.  Jack Warden is Peter's Godfather.  Everyone
(almost) is overjoyed with Lucy.
     Like all romantic comedies, this one has its twists and its happy
ending.  Sandra Bullock looks lovely and wistful and cute and the
camera keeps focussing on her until I was ready to cry "enough!" But
that is only a small complaint.  It is not IT HAPPENED ONE NIGHT but
for light comedy it suffices.

Title
Review for Shine (1996)
Briefly, SHINE is among the best, the most entertaining, the most
involving film of the year.  The film is, more or less loosely, based
on the life of David Helfgott, an eccentric, fascinating Australian
classical pianist and covers his life from 1950 to 1980.  A great cast
coupled with spellbinding music as well as the direction by Scott
Hicks combine  to make this a most memorable film.  The film's title
is from a press clipping his father saves which says that at the
concert, "David Shines."
Using flashbacks, director Hicks shows  David as an exceptional talent
at a very early age, (Alex Rafalowicz), becoming a young man (Noah
Taylor) and finally as a 40-year-old adult.   The casting is superb so
that not for a moment will you doubt that the three are really the
same person at different ages. . . right down to their mannerisms.
David is a young Jewish boy whose father Peter (Armin Mueller-Stahl,
who has been in some very fine films, most notably, THE MUSIC BOX) was
deprived by the holocaust and other circumstances of being able to
pursue a musical career and who now pushes his son so Peter can
vicariously live the life  which he never had, very similar to what
Mozart's father did to him.   He is constantly reminding young David
of how lucky he is, making him repeat the phrase over and over: "I am
lucky,".
When David gets a scholarship in America, his father turns it down.
When David, now a young man, is able to go to a music school in
London, his father, no longer able to impose his wishes on David tells
him that   if he leaves the house he will never be allowed to return.
This is the biggest factor in David's suffering a nervous breakdown,
receiving shock treatments and ending up in a psychiatric hospital.
One of the moments in the film that had me gulping back tears was when
a woman who was a volunteer pianist at the hospital is playing.the
piano.  When David turns the page for her, she asks, "So you can read
music?" and the disheveled, nervous David replies "Yes."  The woman
asks his name and when he tells her it is David Helfgott, she nods and
suddenly it dawns on her who he is and what has become of him. . . a
high point for me in this wonderful film.
Stage actor Geoffrey Rush is simply magnificent in his portrayal of
David.  Others in this exceptional cast are Lynn Redgrave, John
Gielgud, Googie Withers, Sonia Todd and Nicholas Bell.   What more can
we say except to urge you not to miss seeing this great film.

Title
Review for Cross My Heart (1987)
A simple story about innocence trying to cope with the pain and
uncertainties in an adult world and how other innocents try to help
their friend.  This gentle film is about Martin, a young boy, perhaps 8
or 9 years old, who lives with his mother.  He does not know who his
father is; his mother promises one day to tell him.
In school Martin is frequently in little troubles earning visits to the
principal's office.  And so when his mother dies, he doesn't tell
anyone for three days.  He's heard about orphanages and is not about to
take a chance.
A couple of schoolmates come calling at his home and discover the
reason he has not been to school these last several days.   In order to
keep it a secret they decide to get a coffin, or a long box, and bury
the mother.  Cross My Heart apparently refers to what each child
promises as more and more are let in on the secret because the body is
too heavy and where does one get a long box?  How about the antique
grandfather clock of a friend?
Odd behavior and undone lessons lead to Martin being told to have his
mother sign a note saying she is aware there is a school problem.  When
that is overcome (one of the girls forges the signature), he is asked
to bring his mother to school.  All kinds of subterfuges are used by
the children (such as a false bomb scare) to keep the secret from
coming out.
A sad, sensitive film. (Not to be confused with the poor 1987 film of
the same name that starred Martin Short and Annette O'Toole.)

Title
Review for That Thing You Do! (1996)
          Tom Hanks says that he made the film to "protect my sanity."
He traveled all over the world promoting FORREST GUMP and it was
getting him down.  Wanting to do something different, he yearned for
"something creative" other than acting.   Having seen "The Compleat
Beatles" documentary, and being aware of the many, many band groups
back in the 1960s who had but one hit record and then disappeared, he
decided he'd like to write and direct a film about these "one hit
wonders."
          This then is a kind of compilation of many such groups as
Hanks saw them.  There is Guy Patterson (Tom Everett Scott) whose dull
life as a salesman in his father's hardware store is brightened by the
set of drums he plays after working hours.  This puts him in another
world.  When a group called The Wonders loses its drummer (remember
an ill Ringo being replaced temporarily with someone called Jimmy
Nichols?), Guy is ready to accept their offer to play the drums with
them.   Their identifying tune, "The Things You Do" shoots to the top
of the charts  and soon they are on their road to fame and fortune, or
so it would seem.
          Hanks uses some new actors to make up The Wonders.  There
are, in addition to Scott, Johnathon Schaech, Steve Zahn and Ethan
Embry.   The part of Faye, Jimmy's girlfriend, (Liv Tyler) is
portrayed by a very pretty blonde.  Guy's girlfriend, Tina, is played
by Charlize Theron.  Hanks himself has the role of an executive at a
record company (The Play-Tones) who manages the band.
       While the film is entertaining enough and does portray the
times, (the period of JFK being assassinated, of the VietNam war, etc.)
I found nothing special.  However, it does have some nice music and
it is recommended to anyone who lived through that era of the 60s.

Title
Review for Albino Alligator (1996)
     Although the writer, Christian Forte, was younger than 24 when he
wrote the movie's story, he has fashioned a unique thriller.   You
will be on the well-known edge of your seat as the three robbers, Dova
(Matt Dillon), his brother Milo, (Gary Sinise) and self-styled
sociopath Law (William Fichtner) go through their paces. These consist
of trying to rob an office, have the siren go off and scare them away,
get involved in a police chase in which two cops are killed in a
crash, and end up in  Dino's Last Chance bar.   Boom, boom, boom; it
all happens real quickly and we find ourselves in the bar with a half
dozen hostages.  That is not how the original robbery had been planned
at all.
     The acting is superb.  Janet, (Faye Dunaway and how nice to see
her again) is employed in the bar.  There are also owner Dino (M.
Emmet Walsh), the mysterious Guy (Viggo Mortensen), the young man,
Danny (Skeet Ulrich) and Jack (John Spencer), all being held hostage
while the three robbers figure out how to elude the police who have
surrounded the bar . . . which has no exit other than the front door.
     The film focuses on the hostages (with a couple of neat
surprises) and on the robbers, two of whom (Dave and Milo) do not want
anyone to get hurt whereas Law is eager to kill anyone who may derail
their escape.  Leading the police and the federal Agents is C D
Browning (Joe Mantegna).  In a hilarious scene, he gives a TV
interview to Action News" Channel 7 reporter Jenny (Melinda McGraw).
     I believe there is a blooper.  Dave, angered by the police
phoning him at the bar and advising him to surrender, pulls the phone
from the wall, wires and all, yet later in the film he uses the phone.
 . admittedly a smallish oversight.   I never did figure out what the
film's title meant.
     Tautly directed by Kevin Spacey.  Known for his many theater and
film performances, this is his directorial debut, and a fine one it
is.

Title
Review for Chorus of Disapproval, A (1988)
One can pretty well expect that if it is something Alan Ayckbourn has
written, it is going to be a great farce. In fact, the play on which
the film is based did win several awards.  One can only assume that
something happened in the transition to film. For one thing, sets with
hilarious goings-on in different rooms are a hallmark of Ayckbourn
farces.  Seeing the film with the mobility of a movie camera where the
set no longer is an integral part is possibly what is missing in the
film.
Initially released in 1989 it was withdrawn because of a legal
disagreement between the producers.  Because the film does not depend
on any particular date, however, the fact that it is now being released
seven years later does not spoil the story in any way.  It is a kind of
timeless farce with  Dafydd Ap Llewellyn (Anthony Hopkins), as a
tyrannical, hysterical monster of a director of an amateur production
of THE BEGGARS OPERA. Into this town of Scarborough, England comes Guy
Jones (Jeremy Irons) who has been sent by his employer to do some work
there.  Guy is of the opinion that he was sent there because of a
computer glitch.
Guy, a shy man who has recently lost his wife, sees an ad in the local
newspaper announcing casting of amateurs for a play.  He thinks this
may be what he needs to alleviate his boredom.  However, much to his
innocent surprise, every woman in the cast as well as others who just
live in the town are trying to get him into bed.  This includes Hannah
(Prunella Scales of Fawlty Towers fame) who is the sex-starved wife of
Dafydd. Then there is the swinging couple who like to have different
partners to break the monotony of married life. (Jenny Seagrove and
Gareth Hunt) in a very funny episode involving Guy, a woman friend, and
the swingers.
While the comedy is handled flawlessly, the film slows down
considerably with the insertion of a sub-plot involving Guy's company
and the greedy townspeople of Scarborough.

Title
Review for Assignment, The (1997)
Based, very loosely I would assume, on the exploits of a mid-East
terrorist dubbed THE JACKAL because of his cold blooded heinous crimes
against civilians.  For the past 20+ years he has bombed and shot
indiscriminately at the helpless while he was in the employ of various
Mid-East and European countries.   Women and children were not spared
by The Jackal whose real name was Carlos Sanchez.    Despite all-out
efforts by our CIA, by Moussad, (the Israeli Secret Service) and other
European countries to capture him, the Jackal managed to elude them .
. . until one fine day.   Imprisoned and given harsh treatment by the
Moussad whose chief, Amos (Ben Kingsley) is fiercely delighted at this
success, it then turns out that the man they are holding only looks
like Sanchez (Aidan Quinn) but is in fact Annibal Ramirez (also played
by Quinn) an officer in the U.S. Navy.    He is awarded little more
than a "Sorry about that" and released.
Shortly thereafter he is approached by Jack Shaw (Donald Sutherland) a
high-ranking CIA operative.   Ramirez is told in detail about the
Jackal, shown horrifying photos of maimed children; brought into a
hospital for first-hand viewing of victims.   He is further told that
the Jackal can be caught  only with his cooperation.    Because he
looks exactly like the terrorist, he is being asked to pretend he is
the Jackal while the Israeli and U.S. governments lay a trap.
Ramirez offers all kinds of objections but in the end is talked into
accepting the role.  Thus begins a new life, in its own way a
terrorist life.  He is even asked to be unfaithful to the wife he
loves by persuading the Jackal's girlfriend that he is the Jackal.
Before the Russians (the enemy) can be gulled into the trap, they must
be sure it is indeed the Jackal.
By concentrating on Annibal Ramirez rather than on the terrorist, the
film takes a giant step in the right direction.    Adding to the
believability of the story are the fine performances by the three
leads.   Kingsley, tense and determined; Sutherland with a kind of
smirk; and Quinn doing double duty (but very little as the terrorist)
mostly as the clean-cut Naval officer who almost loses himself in the
terrorist role in order to be believable to the enemy.
Others in the cast include Liliana Komorowska, Celine Bonnier, Claudia
Ferri,  Vlasta Vrana, Von Flores and Al Waxman.

Title
Review for Angels and Insects (1995)
     About 150 years ago there was the Victorian age, known for decorum
and modesty, even prudery.  When we think of that period, the very
word, "Victorian" brings that certain image to mind. Still, people are
unpredictable and, regardless of the age in which they live, there are
secrets about which most of us know nothing.  One such secret was
discovered by a naturalist, William @Adamson (Mark Rylance) who lost
all his specimens he had studied and collected in South America when on
his return to England he was shipwrecked.
     Many educated and wealthy men of the time engaged in studying
nature.  When one such, the Reverend Alabaster, (Jeremy Kemp) heard of
the disaster that had befallen Adamson, he took him into his home where
Adamson met and fell in love with the beautiful daughter of the
Reverend, Eugenia (Patsy Kensit).
     Adamson seemed to have indeed fallen into great luck but nothing
ever runs smoothly.  Adamson wondered why his wife was a tiger in bed
at night but a cool cucumber during the day.  He could find no
explanation.  The other bothersome part of being in the household was
that his brother-in-law, Edgar, (Douglas Henshall)  who despite being
of the aristocracy was in fact a disgruntled boor and seemed to have an
intense dislike of Adamson.  It seems that he wanted the Alabaster
family kept pure; Adamson does not fill the mold of a blond, beautiful
family.  When the secret of the Alabasters is out, it is an exploding
bombshell.
     The film is ably helped by Mary (Kristin Scott Thomas), a poor
relation who lives with the family but who has more in common
intellectually with William than he does with his wife.
     While on the surface this may appear to be a costume film of the
Victorian Age, with the evolutionary theory of Darwin making its
presence known, the movie is much, much more.  Highly recommended.

Title
Review for Two Bits (1995)
     This is a nostalgic film about a child, his mother, and his
grandfather.  It takes place in South Philadelphia in the summer of
1933 when two bits (25 cents) was, in the time of that depression, what
some men would beg to earn for a day's work.  On the day the film
opens, a truck with music and billboards is going through town
announcing the Grand Opening of a new Movie Palace, with the admission
price of 25 cents until 6 PM.
     Looking wistfully at the truck as it passes is twelve-year-old
Gennaro Spirito (Jerry Barone); how he would love to have had the
necessary two bits.  Gennaro lives with his mother, Mary Elizabeth
Mastrantonio, and his sister, and his grandfather (Al Pacino) who is
not only his best friend but also his mentor on what is happening in
the world.  Grandpa announces that this is his last day on earth, that
he will give Gennaro 25 cents when he dies.  Gennaro does not like the
idea of his grandfather dying so that he can go to the movies.
     Although Gennaro tries to pick up some change by performing in the
streets, he remains empty handed.  Grandpa offers his grandson one
other opportunity to earn the two bits.  It seems that when grandpa was
a young man, many years ago, he had hurt a young woman and he wants
Gennaro to visit the old lady and offer Grandpa's late apology.
     Jerry Barone is a handsome youngster with a sweet, kind face.  He
is well able to fit right in with the older stars, Pacino and
Mastrantonio who give their usual fine performances.
     Director James Foley keeps the film purposely at a slow pace,
reflecting the depression, the summer heat, the boy's frustration and
Grandpa's last days.  Very nicely done.

Title
Review for Money Train (1995)
     In the New York City subways, and probably at other subway systems
as well, there is a special train that comes by each station every
night to pick up the day's fare that has been collected. There are
about a half dozen guards who accompany each train allowing Donald
Patterson (Robert Blake), the very tough chief of Metropolitan Transit,
to boast that never, but never, has one of his trains been robbed.
Blake, best known for the TV show where he starred as Baretta, has not
been in a film in about ten years.  That is a pity because he is in a
class by himself.  No one would ever mistake him for some other actor.
     Back to the story:  There are two brothers who, despite an unusual
situation, would die to protect the other.  When Charlie (Woody
Harrelson), who is white, escaped from an orphan asylum when he was
very young, he was taken in by John's (Wesley Snipes) family who is
black.  Charlie has always been on the wild side and foster brother
John has been kept busy keeping Charlie from getting into deep
trouble.   The two bicker but they love each other as siblings should.
It is that relationship that gives the film a real boost.
     Now grown up, they are transit police who work for a division of
Patterson's subway security.  Their job, however, involves much acting,
pretending to be drunk or asleep in the subway while the other watches
to see what petty thief will attempt to prey on the seemingly
defenseless . Their apprehending of criminals in the subway trains and
at subway stations is what keeps whatever safety there is.
     When Charlie runs up a $15,000 gambling debt that he will
obviously never be able to repay, his life is in danger.  A way out
occurs to him; what if he and John were to make off with some of the
money bags being transported by the Money Train?   Despite John's
strenuous objections, ("We are cops!  We don't steal!") Charlie decides
to take a crack at doing it himself.
     Up until then, MONEY TRAIN is very funny, with snappy, witty
dialogue (written by Doug Richardson and David Loughery from a story by
Richardson).  Add some love interest by the beautiful Grace Santiago
(Jennifer Lopez) who is a new recruit, and you have a very entertaining
film.
     So what went wrong?   A couple of things: the runaway subway train
scene seems to go on forever; too much of a good thing.  In addition,
like so many movies, the writers do not know how to end it.   MONEY
TRAIN, unfortunately, falls into that category.  The ending has much to
be desired, especially from a moral standpoint.

Title
Review for Do the Right Thing (1989)
        Written, directed and produced by Spike Lee, this story of a
few days in the Bedford-Stuyvesant area of Brooklyn is riveting.
There's no question that Lee is very talented and knows how to make
films.  The cast, in addition to Lee, includes Danny Aiello as the
owner of a pizza parlor in a black neighborhood.  He is terrific in
that role.
        There's Ossie Davis, who does a masterful job as the neighborhood
souse.  There's Ruby Dee.  There's the character who walks around with
his "ghettoblaster" radio, the three men who just sit on chairs and
argue and philosophize, wondering how the Korean across the way, who
has been in the U.S. only one year, owns a grocery store while they
own nothing. . . each with his own explanation.   And there's Lee as the
pizza delivery man, and there are the pizza parlor owner's 2 sons.
Every character is delineated perfectly.
        Something, however, was missing.  Despite everything in the
film ringing true, what was omitted (perhaps because no answer is
possible) was that Lee attempted no solutions to the story, to the
riot, to the killing, to despite many humorous moments, the utter
monotony of most of the lives.
        An epilog contains a quotation from a Martin Luther King, Jr
speech in which he condemns violence, followed by an excerpt from
one by Malcolm X in which he says he is against violence, except in
self defense, and the only way to overcome the oppression is in self
defense.

Title
Review for Gazon maudit (1995)
        FRENCH TWIST has a humorous premise and for most of the
film it carries out its promise to be funny.   If only directors
would know when to quit when they are ahead.
        The film is about a love triangle but this being a comedy as
well as being French, do not anticipate the usual triangle.
        Loli (Victoria Abril) is a pretty housewife who has a
husband, Laurent, (Alain Chabat) who deals in high-priced real
estate.   Loli understands that his job keeps him working late,
never suspecting that much of the time Laurent is cheating on her.
After a while she makes that discovery and she is, naturally, angry.
Little wonder that there has hardly been any sex of late.
        One day a woman, @Marijo (@Josiane @Balasko), a Lesbian, pulls
up in a truck and asks for some water as her car's water has leaked.
Marijo and Loli have a cup of coffee while Marijo listens to @Loli's
tale of woe.   Pretty soon she comes on to Loli who, in the mood she
is in, responds with hugs and kisses.  Marijo is invited to stay
and sleep on the couch but Laurent will have none of that.  He is
one jealous cheat.
        Unlike other triangle films, tables get turned in the most
odd and humorous way.   However, just when the film appears to have
concluded with a good finale, up comes on the screen, THREE MONTHS
LATER.   This leads to turning a light comedy into an unbelievable
farce, to say nothing of adding more minutes to the film than was
necessary.   Well, at least it was funny up until then.
      Written, playing Marijo, and Directed by Josiane Balasko

Title
Review for Disappearance of Garcia Lorca, The (1997)
Wars are terrible but civil wars are even worse . . . brother
against brother.  I remember well the circumstances of the Spanish
Civil War in 1936 when Generalissimo Francisco Franco lead a revolt
against the duly elected democratic government. Large amounts of
armaments and planes were given to the rebels by Hitler and
Mussolini.  The term "The Fifth Column" (which took on the meaning
of "traitor")  came from that war.    While the Soviet Union sent
meager help to the Republic of Spain and while many young people
from all around the world enlisted in the International Brigade to
fight for the Republic; and while Americans volunteered and formed
The Lincoln Brigade, the United States, under President Franklin
Delano Roosevelt chose to continue our anti-Communist foreign policy
(pretty much as we still do . . . witness Cuba) regardless of whose
bed we had to sleep in.  "We" were neutral; that meant we would not
sell to either side.    That meant a democratic government, a
coalition of many parties, would be overthrown.
Many, but not enough, people saw that war as the prelude to World
War II. This was where the German and Italian military could engage
in real maneuvers, gaining experience for the invasions of Europe
that were soon to follow.
There, in the city of Granada in Spain, was where the poet Garcia
Lorca tried with his words to enlighten and rally the people against
the Franco dictatorship. It was his words that the fascist
government feared and so they finally stopped him from speaking.
In this dramatic and powerful film, Lorca (Andy Garcia)
"disappears," taken in custody never to be seen again.   Ricardo
(Esai Morales) was a mere 14-years- old when he first met Garcia
Lorca at a performance of a play by the poet. Lorca became his idol.
When Ricardo's family moved to Puerto Rico, Ricardo became a
journalist whose mission was to return to Spain and find out exactly
who killed Lorca.    The book he is writing about that event needs
an ending.
Warned that the fascist government would harass him, or worse, if he
goes back to Spain, as they had years ago beaten his father, he
nevertheless is driven to return and solve the mystery of Garcia
Lorca's last moments.
This is a fascinating film that shows the sinister government at
work, routing people from their homes, arresting them and beating
them.    Unfortunately, it is still going on in too many countries
around the world.    Because people being what they are, trusted
friends turn out to be  unworthy.   Friends spy on and reveal the
whereabouts of those "wanted" by the government.
Many are the sub-stories, and love interest, that are scattered
throughout the film.   This production boasts a marvelous cast who
help make it a must-see film.   In addition to the gripping
performances of those already mentioned, there is Maria Eugencia
(Marcela Walerstien) who loves Ricardo;  the taxi driver, (Giancarlo
Giannini); Lozano (Edward James Olmos);  Colonel Aguirre (Jeroen
Krabbe);  Centeno (Miguel Ferrer); Gabino, the bullfighter, (Emilio
Munoz) who knows something about Lorca's last moments.

Title
Review for Now and Then (1995)
     In a few respects, NOW AND THEN, is much like Rob Reiner's STAND
BY ME.  It is about four youngsters (age twelve) and their friendship.
The big excitement is that they are seeking to find out how Johnny, a
friend their age, died.  The part I enjoyed was that it was about
girls whereas STAND BY ME was about boys.  For a change, the girls are
given the chance to show they can act.
     Sadly, unlike the excellent STAND BY ME, not much else good can be
said about this film.  The girls meet at night at the cemetery where
the boy Johnny is buried.  This, in itself, is an unlikely scenario.  I
could be wrong but it strikes me as very contrived to have the girls
visit a cemetery at night. There they pledge to always be friends and
never lose track of each other.
     The film's title derives from the story about how the young girls
were THEN and what they turn out to be NOW.  Samantha as a young girl
is played by Gaby Hoffmann with Demi Moore as the adult, a novelist.
Teeny is played by Thora Birch and Melanie Griffith who becomes a
successful movie actress.  Christina DeWitt is played by Ashleigh Aston
Moore and Rita Wilson who becomes a housewife and has a child.
Christina Ricci and Rosie O'Donnell star as Roberta who becomes a
doctor.
     Flashbacks keep us informed about the "Then" and the "Now" but
nothing very interesting happens in the film.  The fine cast, all good
actors, are wasted on an uninteresting story where you find that you do
not really care what happens to them.  While some of the kids look
like they could look something like the grownups they are supposed to
eventually be, Christina Ricci looks nothing like Rosie O'Donnell.  The
big news is that Demi Moore is never nude in the film.   Is that a
first or isn't it?

Title
Review for Little Dorrit (1988)
     Part One is entitled NOBODY'S FAULT, referring to the general
feeling among the rich in Dickens' day that no one was to blame for the
miserable conditions that existed among the less fortunate.  Everyone,
it appears, passed the buck, while child labor, homelessness, illness,
and hunger engulfed the country.  Bureaucracy was rife.  One could
spend forever trying to get a patent, shuffling from one bureaucrat to
another.  But it's nobody's fault.
     The cast reads like a who's who of England's finest actors, with
Alec Guinness superb as the ex-wealthy patriarch of his family as he
keeps up his standards while in debtors' prison.  Derek Jacobi is
equally wonderful as the man who tries to help Little Dorrit by getting
her brother and father out of the prison, the same debtors prison where
she was born and lived for 20 years.   Little Dorrit, as an adult, is
played by Sarah Pickering.
     Part Two, entitled LITTLE DORRIT'S STORY, covers her birth in
prison, the death of her mother, how she learns to read and write and
sew and cook and take care of her "royal" father.  At times it covers
parts of what we have seen in NOBODY'S FAULT but here it is shown from
her perspective.
     George Bernard Shaw claimed Dickens' story was more seditious than
DAS KAPITAL because of what it revealed of society.  Although the film
showed the poverty and showed people sleeping under wagons in the
street, it did not dwell on it.  On the other hand it showed that there
were kind and generous people in debtors prison who would spend their
entire lives there unless some miracle caused their debts to be paid.
     Throughout the six hours, Christine Edzard's adaptation for the
screen, and direction, never falters; the interest and excitement are
sustained.  The acting is flawless, with many Dickensian characters
peppered along the way.  In addition, the sets and costumes, as well as
the extras employed as background, are wonderfully authentic.  This
belongs on a list of best films ever made.

Title
Review for Powder (1995)
     While the film, POWDER, would have to fall into the genre of
science fiction, the film is absolutely mesmerizing.   It happens that
the genre is perfect for the story.  Equally as important is that it
tells us something about ourselves that everyone should by now know.
And that is that anyone who is "different" from us is suspect, is to be
ridiculed, and feared.
     Powder (Sean Patrick Flanery) is such a person.  His mother
dies the day he is born.  He is an Albino whose father is horrified
when he sees him.  The doctor says there may be other odd things
about the baby.   So when the father dies his grandmother puts him
in a room that is the cellar of the cottage.  Obviously, she does
not want the neighbors to know about him.   When Barnam (Lance
Henricksen) finds out about him he calls on Jessie Caldwell (Mary
Steenburgen) who runs a school for young men who have been in
trouble with the law and need to be taught how to behave.    Almost
needless to add, the "students"  begin to mock the newcomer.  This
leads to some very funny special effects.
     Powder, it is discovered, has an I.Q. that is so high it cannot
be graded.  He also has other powers and these are used to startle
those who try to take advantage of him.    He can manipulate
electricity, magnetize and do other special things that ordinary
people cannot do.
     Steenburgen is her usual kind, sweet self.  Jeff Goldblum as
the science teacher who befriends him is magnificently charming  in
the smallish role he has.  Both the sheriff and his bullying deputy
(Brandon Smith) are excellent.  In short, then, this is a film not
to be missed..

Title
Review for Babettes gćstebud (1987)
     In Denmark, a short story by Isak Dinesen is turned into an
enchanting film.
     BABETTE'S FEAST is a delight.  The story itself is nothing much
and doesn't even sound as if it would be anything one would care to
make into a film.  But the beauty is what's wrapped around the story
and the characters in it.
     Set in an isolated little. windswept village in Denmark, the
residents are kept alive by their unquestioning belief in God.  There
are 2 elderly spinster sisters ("just past their youthful bloom") who,
when their minister father dies, become the center of the spiritual
community.
      Babette, a Frenchwoman, leaves France where there is civil
unrest, for Denmark.  She is taken in as a maid and helper by the 2
sisters.  For the 100th birthday of their deceased father, the sisters
decide to give a nice dinner to about a dozen of their church friends.
.and they allow Babette to make the dinner.  As she has just come into
some money she also insists on paying for the food.  How that
wonderfully funny feast transforms the town is the story.

Title
Review for Fools Rush In (1997)
This could have been just another lightweight bit of
romantic fluff.  Instead, the story has much more going for
it than most films of that genre and, aided by some fine
acting, turns this into a very entertaining romantic comedy.
Alex (Matthew Perry) is a nice-looking young executive type.
He meets up with Isabel (Salma Hayek) a stunningly beautiful
yet wholesome-looking Hispanic woman from Mexico and, after
a one night stand, Alex awakes to find Isabel has left him
without a word or forwarding address.    That is where their
relationship would have ended except that three months
later, Isabel shows up at Alex's place to inform him that he
is the father of the baby she has been carrying.
Isabel is a great believer in Fate.  Alex is a believer in
"doing the right thing."    Based on these two beliefs,
despite their backgrounds being very far apart (Alex is a
WASP and Isabel is a Catholic of Mexican heritage), there is
no question but that they must get married.    There are the
de rigueur meetings of each other's parents and family.  The
WASPs are unhappy (John Bennett Perry . . . Matthew's
real-life father and Jill Clayburgh as the mother).  On the
Hispanic side, there is Isabel's  very protective  father
(Tomas Milian) who still is angry that the U.S. confiscated
Mexican territory, and the mother (Anne Betancourt)  AND
Isabel's five brothers who are suspicious of Alex's
intentions. Also there is the unhappy policeman Chuy (Carlos
Gomez) who was once Isabel's fiance.
As in all romantic comedies, there is the boy meets girl,
boy loses girl, boy gets girl back for the inevitable happy
ending.   Here it is done with humor and charm and leaves
you with a nice feeling, wishing the adorable screen's
couple will live happily ever after.

Title
Review for Picture Bride (1995)
     This is a love story quite unlike others.  In 1918,
sixteen-year-old and beautiful Riyo (Youki Kudoh), an orphan is
coaxed into leaving Japan to marry a Japanese sugar cane worker in
Hawaii after an exchange of photos.  As we learn, both her parents
died some years ago of tuberculosis, a contagious disease.  Riyo's life
with her well-meaning aunt was miserable because the parents of her
schoolmates forbade their playing with her for fear of catching the
illness.  Going to Hawaii, far away from Japan, no one would know the
shame she had felt about her parents' illness.  Riyo, herself, is
healthy.
     Arriving at immigration in Hawaii, she is introduced to her
prospective husband who has paid her fare.   Royo looks at him and at
the photo and says, "There must be some mistake.  This is not the man
in the photo."  He, Matsuji (Akira Takayama), sheepishly explains that
it is indeed he but it was the most recent photo he could find.  He is
now 43.
     There is no turning back to Japan as Riyo does not have any
money.  Next day she is out in the cane fields working away with other
Japanese and Filipinas.  At the shack that is her home, she will not
allow her husband, Matsuji, to touch her.  She decides to work twice
as hard, save her money and return to Japan.  Things do not work out
that way.
     The film portrays the life of the sugar cane workers who were led
to believe they would one day return to their homeland ... but never
did; the "Simon Legree" on horseback with his whip, as he rides up and
down the furrows spurring on the workers.  And it tells about Riyo's
friendship with Kana (Tamlyn Tomita) another woman worker who shows her
how to do laundry for the workers, after her own day is done, so she
can save more money for the trip home that never happens.  Some 20,000
of these "picture brides" came from Japan, and many came from Korea and
Okinawa in the first twenty years of the 20th century.  Nevertheless,
this is a love story and a lovely one at that.
     Toshiro Mishune appears in a film about Samurai warriors that is
shown to the workers.
     Tamlyn Tomita appeared in THE JOY LUCK CLUB, KARATE KID II, and in
many TV shows.
     The film is approximately divided between spoken English and
Japanese with Japanese subtitles for the spoken Japanese.

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
 If there is anything I abhor most in scary movies is when the
director stoops to using sudden loud noises to frighten the
audience.   You know the kind I mean: a door slams shut but it is
only  the wind; a loud crash but it is only the cat knocking over a
flower pot.    It would be nice if directors thought up something
new with which to scare us.   Even the use of masks, as in this
film, is an easy ploy..
 What SCREAM 2 does have going for it is that it does have a bit of
humor.  Kevin Williamson does write well.   One of the questions  he
raises are about the media and its influence on serial killers.
Which came first, the chicken or the egg?
 SCREAM, the 1996 film, was really nothing much until word of mouth
made it a must-see film with the young who do not find real life
scary enough.  That warmed the hearts of those whose job it is to
follow the box office..   Banking (sic) on that phenomenon, it was
logical to expect a SCREAM 2.
 Some of the characters who were in the original now return for the
sequel: among them are Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) as a student.
The original's Deputy Dewey Riley (David Arquette) has now become a
security guard
 From the original there are also Cotton (Liev Schrieber) who had
been wrongfully convicted of murder, and Gale Weathers (Courtney
Cox) who wrote a book about the Woodsboro murders in SCREAM and
whose book has turned into a  movie, STAB, which is apparently the
cause of new murders by a slasher.
 Do not try to guess who the killer is as you will have no clue.  (I
hate that in movies!)   If you like gore and blood and slashings,
this is the movie for you.  If that genre turns you on, hey,  you
will love every moment . . .even if there could have been a bit less
mayhem, a bit fewer deaths.
 Others in the cast are Randy Meeks, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Laurie
Metcalf, Elise Neal, Jerry O'Connell, Timothy Olyphant, Jada
Pinkett, Duane Martin, Rebecca Gayheart and Portia De Rossi.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
As the ad's double entendre proclaims, "Size Does Matter"    Godzilla
Is BIG.
In a little in-joke, scientist Dr. Niko Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick)
is named after Patrick Tatopoulos, the designer of the creature
Godzilla.  The original creature  is based on the Godzilla character
owned by and created by Toho Co. Ltd. in 1954.   Another, not quite
as "in",  is having New York's Mayor named Ebert (because Roger
Ebert looks a bit like like Michael Lerner who has that role).   When
the Godzilla is finally taken care of, the mayor looks for ways his
administration can take credit.
In some spectacular special effects, made possible in part by new
computer graphics software and technology, the film is as real as one
could imagine.   For those displaced New Yorkers like me, it really
looked as if the Chrysler Building and Brooklyn Bridge were being
toppled by the huge creature with every giant step it took, as well as
demolishing Madison Avenue.  Very realistic.
The film starts with a ship at sea.  As a blinding flash of lightning
and accompanying thunder crash across the screen, the ship heaves and
tosses about on huge waves.   News soon reaches the world that several
ships have overturned for no apparent reason and are lost in the
ocean.     In other parts of the world, investigators are baffled by
giant footprints marching across the lands of Panamanian forests,
Tahitian villages and Jamaican beaches.    Dr. Tatopoulos is called in
to help solve the mystery when it is discovered that a giant animal is
wreaking destruction in Manhattan.
As in the original GODZILLA, the story is that it is nuclear radiation
that has caused the monster to grow to its present height. While
Director Emmerich enjoyed the original he was not about to make an
American remake.    The story then concentrates on scariness.  What
do you do about a huge creature that is like the proverbial bull in
a China shop, knocking over buildings and causing untold havoc?
Fortunately, the story, by Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio and Dean Devlin
and Roland Emmerich,  and the screenplay by Dean Devlin and Roland
Emmerich, made sure the characters in the story were real people.  The
parts of scientist Tatopoulos, called back from Chernobyl where he was
investigating unusually fat worms caused by the irradiation at that
disaster site,  and of the French insurance investigator, Philippe
Roache (Jean Reno) were written with them in mind.   The Roache
character is unhappy that the French Government has tested so many
nuclear bombs in the Pacific.     Other unthinking countries have done
their nuclear testing in the Pacific and elsewhere with no regard to
the inhabitants of those areas nor to the consequences.  Mutations are
happening all over the globe and the fictional Godzilla is but one example.
All in all an entertaining film with some great special effects and a
more or less warmed over  but adequate story.    Others in the film
are Hank Azaria as an intrepid  photographer, Maria Pitillo as the
love (small) interest, Harry Shearer as a newscaster who thinks he
would like her as a Washington-type "intern."

Title
Review for Winner, The (1996)
Set in Las Vegas this black comedy is offbeat even for the genre.
Add to it the fine performance by Vincent D'Onofrio who plays
Philip, the gambler who cannot lose.    Coming off two successful
roles, as a writer in THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD and as the Frankenstein-
like monster in MEN IN BLACK, D'Onofrio is a delight to watch at
work.
Philip, gambler extraordinaire who attracts those who like to be
with a sure winner, finds himself  the cynosure of everyone.  Women
flock to him but casinos are not happy with the character with the
Midas touch.  Con men and mobsters also have their eye on him.
However, Philip is as much in the dark as others about why he wins
but he wants run his good luck to wherever it leads.
Out of the woodwork come all sorts of people who want to have
Philip's good luck somehow benefit them or swindle him if that is
how it must be done.  There is Louise (Rebecca DeMornay), the
story's love interest, who starts off as a villain but by film's
end has found out something about herself that changes her way of
life.  For that matter, almost everyone in the film experiences
changes.
Pretty straightforward for most of the film, it suddenly takes a
surrealist turn when Joey (Frank Waley) enters the casino with
blazing gun looking for Philip.
The movie is based on the stage play, A DARKER PURPOSE, by Wendy
Riss who also wrote the screen version.   It is in part the story
of Las Vegas, where everyone arrives with great expectations but
whose dreams are almost always dashed to pieces.
Ably assisting the film are cast members Richard Edson, Saverio
Guerra. Delroy Lindo. Michael Madsen and SLING BLADE's own
Billy Bob Thornton.

Title
Review for Wild Bill (1995)
        The Wild Bill (Jeff Bridges) we are seeing is Hickock but he
is now in the latter part of his life.  Not quite the hotshot he was
when he justly earned the appellation "Wild Bill," and his eyesight
not as focused as it once was, he is still not anyone with whom one
would want to tangle, unless you include the kid Dave Arquette (Jack
McCall) who would like a shot at Hickock who long ago killed Dave's
father.
        Along with Wild Bill we get Calamity Jane (Ellen Barkin).
She may be one tough woman but the keyword is woman and she, among
others, loves Hickock.   Just about everybody loves old Bill.
        One thing you have to say about Hickock:  he knew his Wild
Bill days were over but he would never back down when challenged.
What else could you ask of a man?  Or woman?
        Included in the film for no good reason I could discern are
some pretty good actors in pretty crummy roles:  John Hurt, Diana
Lane, Christina Applegate, Bruce Dern, Marjoe Gortner (as a
bible-thumping preacher; type cast?) and Keith Carradine as Buffalo
Bill Cody.
        Despite everyone's trying real hard to make something of the
film, and Directed by William Hill it gets:

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
It has happened before and will happen again.  Nevertheless, it
seems always to come as a surprise when a film that boasts such
fine actors as Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, and Samuel L Jackson,
can be so ordinary.
Although Michael Crighton's book was a best seller, it must have lost
a lot when it was brought to the big screen.   This Science Fiction
story is of a something wicked that resides  deep in the ocean.  It
can read your mind; it can capitalize on your worst fears so that you
behave differently than you ordinarily would let anyone see.
Dr Norman Goodman (Hoffman), a psychologist, gets a mysterious
summons from the government and taken to somewhere in the Pacific
Ocean.   There he is met by an old girlfriend, Beth Halperin,
(Stone) a biochemist and Harry Adams (Jackson), a mathematician .
In charge of the mission is Barnes (Peter Coyote). Their mission, as
they used to say on Mission Impossible, is to investigate a huge
spaceship that appears to have been lying on the ocean's floor for
some 300 years.
Equipped with massive bathyspheres capable of descending into the
ocean's depths, the members of the team begin their explorations..
As is de rigueur in filmmaking these days, the special effects play
a large part in the film.   Unfortunately, they are rather on the
dull side.  For that matter, so are the non-special effects.
Inside the spaceship is a large sphere whose meaning no one seems to
fathom.  But once under the surface, their latent fears
(claustrophobia and subconscious terrors) make their appearance,
With the oxygen supply running low, there is an urgency to find out
what the sphere is all about but in their confusion and haste the
scientists begin to do battle, to rebel against their
fellow-explorers.    Despite Barry Levinson, the film seems to go
nowhere.

Title
Review for Heavenly Creatures (1994)
     One of the things that makes HEAVENLY CREATURES a standout film is
that all concerned with the making of the film were aiming for
authenticity.  The movie not only tells the story of a horrifying
occurrence in Christchurch, New Zealand, some 40+ years ago but it
brings you right into the story as you watch, fascinated, what now
appears to be an inexorable series of events that lead to its climax.
     Long searches for the exact actors to portray the characters,
research into photos and newspaper articles on the atrocity, selection
whenever possible, of the actual homes and gardens and schools , add to
the richness of the finished product.
     Back in 1952, in the city of Christchurch, New Zealand, Pauline
Parker (Melanie Lynskey) goes to school where as a bright but plain
youngster she leads an uneventful life.  Things change for her when
pretty, brash,  Juliet Hulme (Kate Winslet), just arrived from England,
enters the same ninth grade class Pauline attends.  Opposite in many
ways, there is nevertheless an attraction.  When they discover that
they both like to write, that they both have great imagination, the
friendship deepens to the exclusion of all the other students.
     Because of a series of incidents, the parents of both girls become
aware that the friendship has become more like an obsession.  As
Juliet's parents, the Hulmes,  (Diana Kent and Clive Merrison) are
about to get a divorce and Mr. Hulme is returning to England, they
decide the best way to break up the relationship between the two girls
is to have him take his daughter, Juliet, to live with relatives in
South Africa.  Juliet insists that Pauline absolutely must go with
them but Pauline's family uses the excuse of not allowing their
15-year-old daughter to leave the country. Those are some of the
occurrences that lead to the tragedy, much of it documented in a diary
Pauline had been keeping.
     Scary, intriguing, well acted; what else could one ask?
     Peter Jackson directed and co-wrote the screenplay with Frances
Walsh.

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
Catholic Northern and Protestant Southern Ireland have been engaged in
a monstrous killing civil war for longer than one can remember. (Some
800 years!)  Northern Ireland wants to be separated from England but
the latter is not about to allow that and so have supplied troops to
quell the guerrilla warfare in which the North is engaged.  It is
difficult to reconcile that both antagonists are Christians and yet
hate each other to the point where they kill without qualms.  Frankie
McGuire (Brad Pitt) is a Northerner responsible for the death of many
British soldiers as well as Irish citizens. How the British would love
to capture him!  Frankie's whole life has been devoted to killing as
many of the enemy as he can.  As a youngster, he saw his father shot
to death at the dinner table just as he had finished saying Grace.
Back in New York City lives Tom O'Meara, an honest, dedicated cop
whose mission in life is to make  New York City a peaceful place and
who believes he himself must practice peace in order to live up to his
credo.  When someone recommends that he take in as a boarder a young
newly-arrived Irish immigrant he does not hesitate nor does he inquire
about his background. .  . The young man is Frankie who has taken on a
new name, Rory Devaney.  He is in NYC to get money from supporters so
that he can buy bigger and better weapons to smuggle back to Northern
Ireland.
Tom and Rory hit it off immediately.  Tom has never had a son, only
daughters: Bridget, Morgan and Annie (Julia Stiles, Ashley Carin and
Kelly Singer.)  Sheila (Margaret Colin) is his lovely wife;  Edwin
Diaz (Ruben Blades) is his sidekick and chauffeur in the police car..
Billy Burke, (Treat Williams) is a vicious arms dealer.
When Tom's home is invaded by masked gunmen, where he and his wife
seemed about to be killed, the gunmen suddenly leave.  Tom, looking
over the torn upholstery, the open drawers, realizes the invasion was
because someone was searching for something. . . and he discovers the
something is money in a bag belonging to Rory.  He now realizes Rory is
not who he thought and a confrontation takes place.
The film is a dandy thriller.  What I did not like is that it takes
sides rather than letting the movie speak for itself.  I am reminded
of the excellent BATTLE OF ALGIERS, with the Algerians trying to drive
out their French imperialists.  When the leader of the guerrillas is
caught, he turns out to be a cultured person.  "How," he is asked,
"could you let women carry bags with bombs into theaters, dance halls,
ice cream parlors?"  To which he replies, "If we had your planes, your
bombs, your army and navy and tanks, we would not be using ladies,
either."  That is what this film fails to show and that is its
weakness..

Title
Review for Last Seduction, The (1994) (TV)
     If you like black comedy (film noir), this one should be right up
your alley.  It's mostly about an unbelievably monstrous conniver,
Bridget Gregory (Linda Fiorentino) who from the very first scenes is
obviously a woman to avoid.  She has sent her husband, Clay (Bill
Pullman), out to make a drug deal with some very unsavory characters.
No sooner does he return with the briefcase full of bills than she
takes off with the money, leaving him to face the mobsters who expect
their cut.
     Aware that her husband is going to do everything to find her, she
holes up in a small town where she seduces Mike (Peter Berg) a nice
nobody she meets at a bar.  He is tired of this mall town life and
would like to branch out and Bridget, he believes, can help him out.
Has he got the wrong number!  Bridget has her own agenda about how she
will use Mike; her plotting keeps the moving reeling along.
     Like with much of black comedy you have to ignore the many things
you are expected to believe which you would not accept in a
straightforward drama.  But given that, this one is quite entertaining
with Fiorentino great as the femme fatale.

Title
Review for Before Sunrise (1995)
     Put aside reality and put on a cloak of romantic make believe.
Pretend that everything that happens in the film could really occur and
then sit back and look at Jesse (Ethan Hawkes), the handsome American
traveling on Eurail.  Nor will you have any problem keeping your eyes
on French student Celine (Julie Delpy), perhaps the loveliest face in
movies today, who sits opposite him in the train.
     It takes only a few moments of idle conversation before he tells
her that he is leaving for the U.S. tomorrow and how would she like to
postpone her trip back to Paris and school and spend the next fourteen
hours sightseeing with him?  After a slight (ever so slight)
hesitation she agrees.
     The camera follows them through Vienna and other cities until the
following morning when, at the railroad station, it is time for them to
say "Goodbye."  Does that mean forever?
     If such an adventure could happen to anyone (and people do have a
tendency to leave behind some of their conventional behavior when they
are traveling many miles from home) Jesse and Celine would be the
ones.  What a handsome, lovely pair they make.

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
This is a film you will either loathe (The title tells it all) or
love.   Put me down for the former.  Despite being based on Hunter
S. Thompson's very popular 1970s book that swept through all the
colleges, Terry Gilliam erred in trying to make it into a movie. The
results are disastrous.
In the 1970s, bad things were happening all over our country;  our
students were in a turmoil.    Drugs were in.  Even respectable
professors told their students that LSD was harmless and would broaden
their lives, give inspiration to artists.  So it was that many got
stoned and stayed that way for years with dropping out of school
becoming a frequent occurrence.
This film is about that era and about two who lived through that period.
The film's problem is that every scene is nothing more than a
duplicate of what went before: drugs taken to excess, the effects
never allowed to wear off, disgusting uninhibited behavior by both
principal characters.    To indicate that would have been fine; to
show every moment of their miserable lives, in detail, becomes too
obnoxiously boring.
I have been an admirer of Johnny Depp as an actor since first seeing
him in the wonderful "WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE" (the same film that
had Leonardo di Caprio in a great performance as a retarded young
man).   Here Depp is Raoul Duke, a sportswriter.   Depp is outlandishly
terrific as the stoned writer but after an hour of the same, the
excitement he engendered began to pall.  There is a limit to how much
one can take of repetitive acting with only changes in the scenery,
the location.
Duke rides to Las Vegas with his fat-bellied attorney, Dr. Gonzo,
(Benicio del Toro) to Las Vegas.   Again, what starts out as weirdly
funny soon slows to a halt.  Is Dr. Gonzo, belly protruding through
his open shirt while he lies clothed in a water-filled bathtub, funny?
I think not.
Director Terry Gilliam has made some very entertaining films (Time
Bandits, The Adventures of the Baron Munchausen, The Fisher King, 12
Monkeys . . . and more) but Fear and Loathing In Las Vegas is not one
of them.

Title
Review for Seven Years in Tibet (1997)
At the time the movie was being made, the filmmakers were unaware
that Heinrich Harrer, had been a member of the Nazi Party; in 1933
he joined the SA (Sturmabtelung) and then the SS (Schutzstaffel) in
1938.   This was revealed  by STERN Magazine after principal
photography had been completed.   When the film- makers learned the
news they added some voice-overs mentioning Harrer's  Nazi
connection.
Harrer (Brad Pitt) was a famous mountain climber.    When asked
about his Nazi association, he claimed that it was to enable him to
have more freedom to travel and engage in mountaineering.   For the
movie's sake, let us assume that it is true.  From what the film
tells of his character, it is likely that what he said is true.
It is known that Harrer was interested only in himself and in any
glory that would accrue to him from his expeditions.   In fact, he
left his wife who was in the last months of pregnancy, giving us a
good idea of how self-centered he was.   As the film opens, he and a
fellow-Austrian,  Peter  Aufschnaiter (David Thewlis) are leaving
Austria to set out to climb one of the highest peaks in the
Himalayas, Nanga Parbat.
When WWII breaks out, he and Peter are captured by the British and
put in a prisoner of war camp from which they later escape.   After
two years of impossible trekking in snowy mountains and through
India they arrive in a land that is very strange to them: Tibet.
This was a time of much trouble in Tibet, their ongoing rebellion
against China's rule.   The filming site was actually in the Andes,
in the Chile-Argentine borders where there were lots of mountains
and snow, both very much needed.
The film shows the change that takes place in Harrer when he meets
the young Dalai Lama whom he teaches about the Western world.  At
this time the Dalai Lama was a mere 14-years-old.  As he grew to
adulthood, he and Harrer, according to Harrer's book on which the
film is based, became fast friends until the present.   By film's
end, Harrer is a changed person from what he was when he left
Austria and his wife.
The crawl at film's end tells us that China, determined not to let
Tibet secede, was responsible for the death of a million Tibetans
as well as for the destruction of many thousands of monasteries.
Little wonder that China has banned the film from being shown in
China.
Beautifully filmed and acted, this is a superb movie.  In addition,
the photography is awe inspiring in its breath.    And bringing the
camera down to earth we are shown the beautiful Tibetan people
lovingly photographed by Robert Fraisse.
Brad Pitt, with a great Austrian accent does a magnificent job as
does David Thewlis. Others, in supporting roles, are B D Wong, Mako,
Danny Denzongpa, Victor Wong. Ingeborga Dapkunaite, Jamyang Jamtsho
Wangchuk, Lhakpa Tsamchoe and Jetsun Pema.

Title
Review for Bulto, El (1991)
     What happens to a man when he awakens after having been comatose
(a sort of Rip Van Winkle) for 20 years?  What changes have taken place
that he is expected to comprehend?  Future Shock for him is already
here.
     Lauro Cantillo (Gabriel Retes), a communist who is a
photo-journalist in the 1970s, is beaten into a coma during an
anti-government riot.  For twenty years his family has refused to have
"the plug" pulled on him.  Daily his children, now grown up, have come
to the hospital to exercise his limbs and massage him.  Little by
little as they become accustomed to the situation they find a little
sour humor by referring to him as El Bulto, "The Lump."
     During that period, his wife Alba (Delia Casanova) has
remarried.  The children of Lauro and Alba, while one day at the
hospital notice eye movement by their father.  Doctors are called in
and little by little Lauro begins to improve to the point where he can
live at home with the aid of a wheelchair and eventually a crutch.
     But that of course is the physical part.  He must get used to
changes in the world, everything from a Walkman, his son's shaven head,
the new morality.  Most traumatic for him is when he learns from an old
comrade who is a newspaper editor, that "there are no more communists.
There is no USSR.  All the things you and I fought for are now the
domain of the materialistic.  Idealism has fallen by the wayside."
Even his once communist brother-in-law has turned into a wealthy man,
owner of three cars and a beautiful house.
     Day after day, Lauro learns he must adjust to this new world that
has changed so much in a scant twenty years.

Title
Review for Relic, The (1997)
It is early January and for the most part, those films that were not
expected to be Oscar-nominated because they were so miserable, are now
brought to light.  One such is RELIC, a science-fiction film ridden
with cliches.
There is hardly a well-lit scene in the entire film.  Making dark
scenes and using green ominous lighting to denote fear and terror are,
of course, old tricks of the trade.  Another is sudden LOUD sounds. It
seems that every scene-change was accompanied by a very loud crash that
had nothing to do with the scene on the screen. One noise that is
supposed to scare is a cat knocking something over.  Give me a break.
The film has no science worthy of the name but a good deal of fiction.
"The basic premise," says Douglas Preston, who along with Lincoln Child
wriote the book on which the film is based, "is that a virus can
introduce genetic material into your own DNA which produces a hormone
that can produce dramatic physical changes.
There are many examples in the animal world, such as a tadpole turning
into a frog."  Hardly the same thing.
In the film, there is an animal on a rampage of murder.  Because of the
lighting we barely see the creature until it is on fire and dashes thru
the passageways.  That is the only bit of special effects worth
mentioning.  OTOH, there are other special effects such as Dr. Margo
Green (Penelope Ann Miller) an evolutionary biologist (sure!) who goes
through hell without hardly a hair out of place.  She is even given the
opportunity to wear a tightly-fitting black sheath dress that also
remains almost pristine.  I think one shoulder strap slid a bit off her
shoulder.
When all hell is breaking loose in the Museum, with people running out
into the street and police spurring them on to leave quickly, police
and ambulance sirens shrieking, Dr Green and Dr Frock (defrock?) (James
Whitmore) are in the lab joking and carrying on a friendly conversation
while waiting for the results of something they are testing.  HELP!
Also lending his talents, as Detective Lt. D'Agosta are Tom Sizemore
and Linda Hunt as Dr Cuthbert, the head of the museum.

Title
Review for Broken Arrow (1996)
     If you get turned on by action, explosions, train derailments,
planes crashing and practically no dialogue, BROKEN ARROW is the film
for you.  For my part I cannot help but wonder why the newly
rejuvenated Travolta would be in a film so senseless that its whole
plot can be summed up in one sentence:
     A pilot on a B-3 Stealth bomber carrying two nuclear warheads
decides to blackmail the U. S. Government for millions of dollars or he
will blow up the bomb and put millions of people's lives in danger.
That's it.  That's the whole story.  Not what one would call subtle.
(Broken Arrow refers to the lost nuclear missile.)
     John Woo, who directed Van Damme in HARD TARGET, and has made many
action films, is just the man for this kind of film but you have to
like that kind of mayhem or you will find yourself laughing in the
theater's darkness at the utter absurdity of the stunts and action
happening up on the screen.
     John Travolta is the villain, Christian Slater is the hero,
Samantha Mathis is a park ranger who gets involved.  A lot of talent
wasted.

Title
Review for Commandments (1997)
A story I've never heard before which should have given rise to a
unique film.  Instead. . . well, just bear with me.
Almost everything bad that can happen to a nice person such as Seth
(Aidan Quinn) does.  Seemingly, there is no reason for these bad things
to have occurred.  While he is on the beach, his beautiful wife goes
for a swim and drowns.  At work, (he is a doctor), he gets fired with
no explanation.  His house burns down and his dog is killed.  Wait! A
bit of luck you may think when Seth is told the dog survived.  More bad
luck: the dog has a broken leg.  NOW, Seth is really angry with God.
No more Mr. Nice Guy.
Seth wants to know why a supposedly just God is picking on him. Do not
try to tell him that this streak of daily bad luck is more than mere
coincidence.  How come good people have bad things happen to them? If
you think Seth is going to let God get away with that kind of behavior,
you do not know Seth.
Are you familiar with the Ten Commandments (a quick version of them
follows here)?  Seth is going to break every one of the Commandments
one at a time and let us see how God likes that!
Most of the above are easily handled by going into church, cursing,
ridiculing a statue of Jesus, etc.  But when Seth goes up on the roof
of his house to shout at God he gets hit by a bolt of lightning and
ends up in a hospital.  More bad luck.  More of God picking on him.
Seth's sister-in-law, Rachel, his deceased wife's sister (Courtney Cox)
invites him to stay at her house with her and husband, Harry (Anthony
LaPaglia), a pretty disgusting, crooked, weasel. No explanation of how
sweet Rachel came to marry a reprehensible character such as Harry.  So
far, so good.
Where, then, does the film fall apart and badly?  For one thing
(probably the most important reason) is that the dialogue is so badly
written as if by an amateur.  This in turn means that the actors, all
of whom have been seen in good films where they were very capable, are
here unable to act because they cannot mouth the words they are
supposed to say without appearing hammy, ridiculous.  (Seth,
brandishing a gun), "I have now reached the point in my life when I can
kill."  Goody!
Suffice it to say, Seth breaks all the 10 Commandments, including
number TEN, the latter with Rachel.  Rachel has been having trouble
with Harry's infidelity and anyhow, Seth IS/WAS her deceased sister's
husband and that is only one step away from going to bed with him.  Add
to that that the ending wanted by the director could only be achieved
through unbelievable contrivance . . .
All that good acting capability wasted.
Written and Directed by Daniel Taplitz

Title
Review for North (1994)
     This could have been an enjoyable movie.  Rob Reiner, who has
given us one excellent film after another, really blew it on this one.
Even the great cast were not utilized to their fullest, most being on
the screen for a few minutes at a time.  Was he just snowing us with
big names?
     North (Elijah Wood) is eleven years old.  His dad and mom
(Seinfeld's Jason Alexander and Julia Louis-Dreyfus) are totally
oblivious to him; at the dinner table he can't get a word in.  And that
is sad because everyone else loves the kid.  He is tops in school
grades, best hitter and pitcher on his baseball team and even does a
great Tevye in his school's "Fiddler On The Roof" play.  Every parent
holds him up as an example to their kids: "Would North do that?"
     Every kid has a place where he likes to be by himself and think
about his life.  North's is a chair in a department store in a mall.
Passersby would think he was just a young boy waiting while his parents
are shopping.  But along comes someone dressed as a bunny.  (Bruce
Willis ... who also does the narrating).  The bunny works at the
store and is on a break.
     The bunny hears out North's sad story and gives him some options.
North brings his parents to court where a judge (Alan Arkin) rules in
his favor, allowing him to seek out some parents he would prefer to his
own.  The courtroom scene with the crazy judge is funny.
     The stipulation is: find parents you want by Labor Day or you will
be sent to an orphanage.  North sets out to various places around the
world looking for parents with whom he would be happy.
     Where did the movie go wrong?  In a couple of places.  The
"adventures" become repetitious and the 88-minute film drags.  But the
worst and most incredible part, given Reiner's history, the sub-plot
involves someone trying to murder North, actually firing at him.  What
a poor plot for a movie for children!

Title
Review for Of Love and Shadows (1994)
     To fully appreciate OF LOVE AND SHADOWS, it helps to be familiar
with Isabel Allende, on whose books the movie is based.   Back in
1973, her uncle, Salvador Allende, a Socialist who had been elected
President of Chile, was assassinated. in a coup with the assistance of
the U.S. This was followed by a military dictatorship under Augusto
Pinochet.  He was condemned by the United Nations Human Rights
Commission for his imprisonment and torture of dissidents.
     Isabel Allende, who now lives in California, has said of the
assassination, "I think I have divided my life into Before that day
and After that day."    She has been, among other things, a
journalist, a columnist, and a teacher but she is best known for her
fascinating books, The House of Spirits, The Stories of Eva Luna, and
Of Love and Shadows.    In each of the books she brings in the world
of Chile after the coup.   Her books make easy and fascinating reading
and knowing that although they are novels, they are based on real
stories make them even more interesting.
     The movie is a thriller about the underground that tries to help
the prisoners.  Francisco (Antonio Banderas)  and his brother, Jose
(Diego Wallruff) pretend to be priests as, dressed in clerical garb,
they evade the guards to visit with the victims of the government.
The brothers, and their friends, live metaphorically in the shadows of
the real life going on in Chile.   They are aided by the beautiful
Irene (Jennifer Connelly) who comes from a rich family    Living in
her mother's mansion, she could easily have ignored the world outside
the estate.  Instead, it has been turned into a home for the aged
where she looks upon the elderly as if they were her relatives.
     Gustavo (Camilo Gallardo) is the handsome army captain to whom
she is engaged. She thought she was in love with him . . . until she
meets up with Francisco, and her world changes.     As in all of
Isabel Allende' s stories, there is a touch of the mystical.  This is
true of much of the literature of South America.  In this film, Irene
goes with Francisco to visit a young woman who may have psychic
powers.   The woman is lying on a bed when she is suddenly seized with
a frantic shaking and making fires erupt outside the house.   She even
manages to make the armed guard that has arrived look foolish.
     But why tell you more?   See the film for yourself and witness
the humor and the horror that make up the wonderful film.    And
remember, it is based on the truth.

Title
Review for Miami Rhapsody (1995)
     Gwyn Marcus (Sarah Jessica Parker) is in a quandary.  She has just
said "Yes" to Matt (Gil Bellows).  She thought a marriage such as her
parents Nina and Vic have (Mia Farrow and Paul Mazursky)  is just what
she would like for herself when she begins to notice that all is not as
appears on the surface.
     First time director/writer David Frankel has come up with a nice,
pleasant comedy and if the situations are somewhat forced but you are
able to accept them as comic you will enjoy the film.  For instance,
everyone, Gwyn discovers, is having affairs.   Her own sweet mother and
Antonio (Antonio Banderas) are meeting regularly, romantically.   He is
the young male nurse who is taking care of bedridden Grandma.
Meanwhile Dad is having a longtime fling with his travel agent.  In
fact the movie leaves no one out;  with the exception of poor innocent
Gwyn, everyone is doing it.
     Is this what Gwyn wants from marriage?  Is this what will be her
fate, too?   This being a movie and this being a comedy all ends
well ... or pretty well.
     The cast carries the story nicely: Mia Farrow is light-hearted
(unlike in Woody Allen films), Antonio Banderas is handsome, Gil Barrows
makes a nice boyfriend for Gwyn, and Sarah Jessica Parker continues to
do well as she has in her last half dozen films.

Title
Review for Speed 2: Cruise Control (1997)
If you are looking for some follow up, a sequel to
SPEED, forget it. Other than Sandra Bullock there was no
legitimate reason to include "Speed" in the title; all
other principals and the film's locale are different
 , . . but hey, that's showbiz.
The excitement that was engendered in the original SPEED
is here not present until the last half hour when the
cruise ship heads for shore.   Frantic, yes; exciting,
no.   Annie Porter (Bullock) is very hyper when she is
careening thru Venice, CA., behind the wheel in a
driving test being given by  Dept of Motor Vehicles' Mr.
Kenter (Tim Conway . . . funny but doing his usual
befuddled routine).  In the film's subsequent scenes
aboard ship  Bullock continues her frantic behavior,
probably trying to stir up the excitement that is not
there.
Alex Shaw (Jason Patric) is the capable, daring hero.
He is also Annie's betrothed.  Because it is the late
1990s it is no surprise that he does not tell his
fiancee the truth, in this case about his job. Instead
he says he is in some kind of law enforcement where he
arrests young pickpockets who frequent the Venice Beach
area when in fact he is on a SWAT team. Conveniently
(for the story), while Annie is careening around town
with one near miss after another she spies Alex crashing
his motorcycle in a chase after a criminal.
Annie is upset about Alex's dangerous job but he gets
around her by telling her what they need is a quiet,
relaxing 6-day cruise to the Caribbean.  Annie readily
forgives him.  That the cruise is anything but relaxing
comes as no surprise.    Aboard ship is John Geiger (as
in "counter") (Willem Dafoe) who is a former employee of
the cruise line where he was the computer expert. Geiger
is more than a little annoyed at having been fired.   He
is maniacal.    He grins maliciously, his eyes roll in
their sockets, and he looks like a caricature of a
crazed villain.   How best to get revenge on the cruise
line than by programming the engines and rudders and
anchors and whatever else it takes to have the ship ram
into another ship and sink
Fortunately, Alex is there to take on the evil genie.
All of the above, it seems to me, may sound more
exciting than the movie.    Where the film became of
interest to me was when the special effects come into
play and we see, with camera low to the ground and
pointing up to make the most of the ship's height, what
appears as an irresistible force (the ship) approaching
its doom with nothing to stop it.  Quite effective.

Title
Review for Forget Paris (1995)
     It is springtime and romantic comedies are in the air.  By far
the best this season is the utterly hilarious FORGET PARIS written by
Billy Crystal, Lowell Ganz, and Babaloo Mandel, among the finest comedy
writers.  It comes then as no surprise that almost every remark is
witty regardless of which of the cast utters it.  And what a cast!
Director Billy Crystal has assembled a superb group to tell this
romantic story about marriage not being quite the same as a
honeymoon.  In addition, the novelty of the film's presentation is a
unique and delightful way to tell a story.
     Andy and Liz (Joe Mantegna and Cynthia Stevenson) are in a
restaurant at a large table awaiting the arrival of friends who will
soon be joining them.  Andy and Liz are engaged to be married.  To pass
the time until the other guests arrive, he tells her the story of
Mickey and Ellen (Billy Crystal and Debra Winger).  As each couple
arrives,  Craig and Lucy, (Richard Mazur and Julie Kavner), Lois and
Jack (Cathy Moriarty and John Spencer), each adds a bit to the
Mickey-Ellen story.  What they tell is seen in flashbacks.
     Mickey is a top referee in professional basketball.  His love life
consists of the cheerleaders.  When his father dies, a cantankerous man
whom no one likes, his body in a casket is shipped to France as that
was his last will, to lie alongside his wartime buddies.
     Mickey sees the casket put aboard the plane's baggage dept but
when he arrives in France, the casket (and Dad) are nowhere to be
found.  Sad?  Not at all.  That is how Mickey meets Ellen who is the
American VP for the airline in Paris.  He falls madly and instantly in
love with her and a few days later, proposes.  At this point she tells
him she is married but "separated."  By the way, Dad is finally found
and buried.
     The film, with every moment funny, tells of their relationship.
Does she give up her great job in Paris, get divorced and come to the
U.S.?  Or should he give up the job he loves as the pro referee and
come to France to live?  The movie, always maintaining its comedic
side, tangles with this and the many other questions that arise.  It
is a beaut!
     In real life, Billy Crystal has been married to the same wife,
Janice, for 25 years.  They have two children.  Crystal has wanted for
a long time to make a film about what real marriage is like and he has
succeeded brilliantly even if real marriage is not as funny as the
film.

Title
Review for Misérables, Les (1998)
       ********************************************************
Victor Hugo's classic epic has been brought to the screen magnificently.  Aided
by a top-notch cast, the film will surely be considered come Oscar time.  In
1812, Jean Valjean (Liam Neeson) is the convict who spends 20 years in jail at
hard labor for having stolen a loaf of bread.  His pursuer, Javert, (Geoffrey
Rush) is nothing less than malicious as he relentlessly tracks him.
When Valjean seeks food and shelter at a house several days distance from his
jail, it is the home of a Bishop.   He is allowed in to have dinner and to have
a good night's sleep.   However, the many years of hard labor as a convict have
taken their  toll and Valjean will do anything to survive: steal, lie, cheat.
Amazed that the Bishop will allow him to spend the night there, he cannot help
but ask "How do you know I will not kill you?" To which the Bishop replies, "And
how do you know I will not kill YOU?"
Nevertheless, the 20 years in jail overcome Valjean and before he leaves the
house he steals some silverware and, when the Bishop enters the room and
discovers the theft in progress, Valjean bludgeons him and runs away.   Shortly
thereafter the police find him because being poor he looks like a suspicious
character.  The silverware is found on him and he is returned to the Bishop.
The gendarmes are told that Valjean told them the truth when he said the Bishop
had given him the silverware, and the astonished police release him.   If the
police are amazed, Valjean is even more so,  that after having stolen  and
physically hurt him, the Bishop did not turn him in.    At the Bishop's urging,
Valjean promises to turn over a new leaf.
Fast forward 10 years to 1822.   Valjean is not only prosperous but is also the
quiet, honest Mayor of the small town of Vigau.    All would have been well had
not Javert happened to come to town and recognize Valjean as a former prisoner
who after being released had not reported to the authorities which the terms of
his parole required. Thus begins the  chase.
In the town, there is a poor, sick  woman named Fantine (Uma Thurman) who has
had a baby  out of wedlock.   Before she dies, Valjean promises to raise her
daughter, Cosette (Claire Danes) as if she were his own.   To evade the pursuing
Javert, the two take refuge in a convent.   Eventually, as Cosette matures into
a beautiful young lady she persuades Valjean they must leave the convent.  She
wants to see the outside world.
It is now 1832, with young revolutionaries challenging and wishing to unseat the
government.  Among the leaders of the revolution is Marius (Hans Matheson) a
young handsome man with whom Cosette falls in love when she sees and hears him
urging revolution to a crowd of bystanders.   More trouble ensues when, shades
of Tien An Men Square, the army kills and routes many of the young
revolutionaries.
But the main story is that of Valjean and Javert who, in the film's several
climaxes, encounter each other.  What takes place between them in each of the
tense meetings as well as the final one could only come from the pen of a genius
such as Victor Hugo.
Both Neeson and Rush are superb in their roles.  There is nothing about
Schindler in Neeson, nor is there the slightest resemblance to SHINE's David
Helfgott in Rush's malevolent, unsmiling, vindictive Javert.   A fine film with
Screenplay by Rafael Yglesias and excellent music by Basil Poledouris.

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
It has been quite a while since we have been treated to a couple of
young women as ditzY as Romy (Mira Sorvino) and her even flakier
friend, Michele (Lisa Kudrow).  Based on Robin Schiff's play, LADY'S
ROOM, which also starred Kudrow as Michele, and adapted by Schiff for
the screen, the film is a delightful romp.
Romy and Michele have been living together since they graduated from
Tucson's Sagebrush High School ten years ago. Their lot has not
improved any since those school days while time has flown by.  Romy is
a clerk at a car dealership while Michele is unemployed at the moment.
Not very exciting. When they learn about their school's ten year
reunion which they want to attend, they realize they will present the
same "nothing" appearance they did when they went to high school.
Everyone else is probably a TV anchorwoman or something equally
glamorous.  If the 2 young women are to attend the reunion and not
look as stupid as ever, they must invent something about themselves
that is exciting.  How about being the inventor of  Post-It?  That
ought to get the snooty girls at the reunion to now look up to them.
And so they are off to the reunion.  Romy hopes to meet the guy she was
in love with when they were in high school but who never gave her a
tumble. Michele has even less ambition. She just wants to have fun.
Everything is going well at the reunion for them when each announces
(to separate people) that she is very rich, having invented Post-It.
All the other women are duly impressed until their story is blown by
the very weird Heather, (Janeane Garofalo).
What the story behind the story is that Romy and Michele say whatever
comes to mind, going from hesd to mouth without stopping to think; and
their friendship is everything because they do enjoy each other's
company.  There is not enough of that in real life.
Mention should be made of the four-letter language (so leave the little
ones at home) as well as advice delivered by Heather to a cowboy that
includes something about "a sheep or your sister."  Very funny.
This may be a good time to mention that Kudrow should now be looking
for other types of roles lest she be typecast as strictly ditzy.
Others in the cast include the snooty Christie (the beautiful Julia
Campbell), boyfriends played by Alan  Cumming,  Vincent Vantresca, the
Cowboy played by Justin Theroux.
This is a no-brainer but quite, quite entertaining and what more could
one ask for?

Title
Review for Jude (1996)
     Director Winterbottom says of Thomas Hardy's classic novel, "I
think the most impressive thing about Hardy is that he takes very
ordinary people in very ordinary circumstances, puts them through the
most extraordinary experiences and transforms them into heroes and
heroines. "
     When Jude Fawley was a teenager (Ross Colvin Turnbull)) his
ambition was to go to a good college.  This was encouraged by a
professor Phillotson (Liam Cunningham) .  (As an adult, Jude is played
by Christopher Eccleston.)   This was in the eighteen hundreds when a
good education was looked upon as the way out of one's humdrum life
which, in the case of Jude, was that of a stone mason.
     As nothing ever goes smoothly, Jude is seduced by Arabella Donn
(Rachel Griffiths), the daughter of a local pig farmer.  He and
Arabella, with whom he really has nothing in common, marry. . . and
the marriage ends in failure.   Jude decides to leave for
Christminster, a prestigious school, where he can study and still earn
some money as a stone mason.   There he meets a cousin, Sue Bridehead
(the lovely Kate Winslet) and he falls for her charm, wit and beauty.
     That should have made everything wonderful for them but Sue loses
her job and Jude makes the big mistake of introducing her to
Phillotson in the hope that he will employ her as an assistant in his
school.   But soon Sue and Phillotson are seeing a lot of each other.
Although she really loves Jude, when he tells her that he had been
married it puts a crimp in their relationship.  Remember this was not
the 1960s and thereafter.  What follows  is the story's tragic
denouement and a real tragedy it is..
     Fine acting all around.  Directed by Michael Winterbottom.

Title
Review for Wilde (1997)
In an electrifying performance that has "Oscar" (no pun!) written all
over it, Stephan Fry brings to life Oscar Wilde in this new film about
this most remarkable (again, no pun) man.   Fry's portrayal will come
as no surprise to those who remember him for his performances in COLD
COMFORT FARM, A FISH CALLED WANDA, I.Q., PETER'S FRIENDS, as well as
his unruffable Jeeves.   In this version of Wilde, we see the many
facets that brought Wilde to the attention of the world.
Despite  a most flashy style of dress and demeanor that was shown to
his admiring public, in private life his manner was that of a devoted
family man to his  dearly beloved wife, Constance (Jennifer Ehle) and
his two children.   In a weak moment, however, a young guest seduced
him, making him  aware of his homosexuality that had been kept in
abeyance since his school days when he first became conscious of it.
When later, at the age of 38,  he met the very handsome Lord Alfred
Douglas, a 22-year-old Oxford graduate, he entered the path that in a
Victorian age with its strong anti-gay bias could only lead to his
downfall.   When his new friend introduced him to "rent boys," male
prostitutes, it inevitably lead him further to neglect his wife and
children and culminated in a disgracing jail sentence for "lewd
conduct" with men.
Despite the passion for his male friends and his new life, he remained
a most popular author and wit.   Some of his better-known works
included books and plays: LADY WINDERMERE'S FAN, THE IMPORTANCE OF
BEING EARNEST,   THE PICTURE OF DORIAN GRAY .    Among his many
witticisms, perhaps the best known are: "In this world there are only
two tragedies.  One is not getting what one wants, and the other is
getting it."   "To love oneself is the beginning of a lifelong
romance."   "We are all in the gutter but some of us are looking at
the stars."   "There is no sin except stupidity."   "The only way to
get rid of a temptation is to yield to it."
The film story of Oscar Wilde is beautifully brought to life  because
of its excellent cast.    With Jude Law, Vanessa Redgrave, Jennifer
Ehle, Gemma Jones, Judy Parfitt, Michael Sheen, Zoe Wanamker and Tom
Wilkinson doing the honors of supporting Fry, the film is sheer
perfection.

Title
Review for George of the Jungle (1997)
Remember George when he was a mere cartoon back in the 1960s?   He
is now alive and well in this boisterous, most enjoyable, laughable
version interpreted by Brendan Fraser. George is just short of being
dimwitted but then, how would you be if every time you swung from a
jungle vine you went crashing into a huge tree?   Despite that,
George keeps on grinning, happy with the jungle friends, the wise
ape whose name is "Ape" (voice of John Cleese),  the drum-playing
chimps, the lion, the toucan and George's own pet dog who just
happens to look exactly like an elephant but, it must be admitted,
does behave like a dog.
So this inept Tarzan-more-or-less-clone loves his home.   We know
this because there is a narrator's voice (Keith Scott)  with a great
sense of humor, who fills us in on anything we ourselves may not be
aware of.  There is Ursala Stanhope (Leslie Mann) who is on safari
in Africa.   When George, who has never seen a woman, first meets
her he wonders what kind of "funny-looking fella" is this?   I told
you he has been hit on the head just a bit too often,
George takes the willing Ursala to his 2-storied home while Lyle Van
de Groot  (Thomas Haden Church), her ostensible sweetheart and
safari-companion worries that the giant ape they are seeking may
have carried her off.      George gives up the jungle to return with
Ursala to the "civilization" of San Francisco (as exemplified by
Ursala's mother Beatrice Stanhope (Holland Taylor) who informs
George that if he does not give up Ursala, Mother will see that
George will no longer have a need for  wearing a loin cloth.    (One
of several bits of adult humor.)   As it happens, George has to
return to Africa (with Ursala) because poachers are after his
friends.   Before George leaves San Francisco, he has some hair-
raising adventures atop the Golden Gate bridge (Joey Preston is the
stuntman).
Expecting another Disney film suitable solely for younger children,
I was most pleasantly surprised to find myself laughing from
beginning to end at this live and lively version of George, suitable
for adults as well as kids.   To top it off is the beautiful take
off of The Lion King which I will not describe.    Go see for
yourself; it is one funny, slapstick movie.

Title
Review for Safe Passage (1994)
     Susan Sarandon, as Mag, turns in another of her many wonderful
screen portrayals.  Directors and producers cannot go wrong when they
choose Sarandon.  Here, in SAFE PASSAGE, she is the mother of seven
grown sons.  Her husband, Patrick (Sam Shepard) chooses to live at the
office but that is okay; they are still very much in love.  With all
the sons now out of the house, except for fourteen-year-old Simon (Nick
Stahl), Mag is thinking of being free at last of household duties.
     Just as Mag wants to pursue her dreams of mingling in the working
world outside of home, word comes that Percival (Matt Keeslar), who had
joined the Marines to get away from family pressures, may have been
among those blown up in a surprise attack of a barracks in the Middle
East.
     Now the family begins to come together to sweat out the vigil.
There is the scientist, Izzy (Sean Astin), Alfred and his girlfriend
Cynthia (Robert Sean Leonard and Marcia Gay Harden), athlete Gideon,
(Jason London), twins Merle and Darren (Philip and Steve Ross) ... and,
of course, the dad, Patrick.  Although each has his own life, this is a
time when they have to get together and listen to skimpy news.
>From official reports they get nothing concrete.
     News reports could mean Percival was among the dead or missing.
And they talk.  They talk about old times and about things they never
before had revealed to each other and they talk about how their parents
raised them and how the sons affected the parents as well.  And all the
time the tension escalates.
     The acting by all the sons is faultless.  The plight of the family
gets you in its grip.  And, again, Susan Sarandon, (much as in
LORENZO'S OIL) is a mother fighting.  A great performance.  Let us not
overlook Sam Shepard's role as the father.  Fine acting all around.

Title
Review for Strange Days (1995)
     We are now into computer movies.  Suddenly, chips and virtual
reality have hit Hollywood.  We can expect more of the same and even
wilder films involving more than the present state of the art; the
state of a screenwriter's imagination.
     STRANGE DAYS hinges on a chip (they call it a "clip") which
records what a person is seeing, or thinking, or experiencing.  This is
caught on a digital contraption known as "the wire."  Put it on your
head and you experience what the person did.  Want to know what it is
like to be a woman?  A man puts the wire on his head and instantly
experiences what one woman did, saw, experienced.  Anything goes and it
happens, where else, but in Los Angeles on December 31, 1999,
incorrectly called the end of the Millennium.  (The Millenium ends
12/21/2000.)
     Lenny Nero (Ralph Fiennes, quite unrecognizable) is the most
prolific seller of these clips.  As he tells his customers, "This is
not TV; this is real life you will be experiencing."  And he has clips
of every sort from sex to murder.  This is the drug that has replaced
the old heroin.
     This would all be fine for those into this new genre but the film
gets bogged down in murder and the story gets wilder and wilder.  The
sound track, from beginning to end, is the loudest, most annoying noise
of any film I can think of.
     Helping Lenny in one way or another are MACE (Angela Bassett) who
is a friend.  She drives an armor-proof limousine as she chauffeurs the
wealthy and powerful around town.  MACE, in her way, loves Lenny but
Lenny loves Faith (Juliette Lewis) who no longer loves him.  Faith
dances at night clubs and does a mean wiggle; she never looked that
good before.  Max (Tom Sizemore) is an ex-cop, a friend of Lenny.  But
stirring them around in this film leads only to eventual boredom.  How
about waiting for the videotape?

Title
Review for Mad Love (1995)
     The big shocker in MAD LOVE is not that it is so bad (which it is)
but that it was directed by the same Antonia Bird who made the
wonderful film PRIEST.  How a talented director could sink so rapidly
from one film to the next is difficult to comprehend.  From the taut
PRIEST to this nonsense is quite a leap.
     Ever since I saw Chris O'Donnell in SCENT OF A WOMAN, I knew he
was destined to greater roles.  In MAD LOVE, it is not his acting that
is at fault, it is the ridiculous story.
     Matt (O'Donnell) is a bright high school senior who falls madly in
love with a cookie young woman, Casey (Drew Barrymore).  He is so madly
in love with her that he gives up his intention of going to college and
instead takes off with her for parts unknown.
     When Casey steals a car and they ride off together he begins to
have  some small thoughts that she may not be right in the head.  But
other things should have warned him much earlier;  he would have to
have been an idiot not to have noticed.  However it is not until almost
the film's end that her parents tell him she needs psychiatric help and
asylum confinement until she cane be "cured."

Title
Review for Anna Karenina (1997)
Everything about the film is lush and beautiful.  From the wonderful
photography that enhances every bit of film, to the breathtaking decor
in the ballroom and on the skating rink, to the well-chosen cast, the
film is a winner. Anna (The French Sophie Marceau) has a classically
lovely face.  Her every emotion, her passionate love affair with Count
Vronsky (Sean Bean)  is revealed in her eyes.   We know at once that
the affair will override losing her husband (James Fox) and risk the
loss of the child she adores,   Nothing can stop the passion  since she
first lays eyes on the Count.   Little wonder that it has always been
and still is a timeless story, one that people who love good literature
continue to read.
Tolstoy included in his story that of another marriage, the everlasting love affair of Levin (Alfred Molina) and his stunningly beautiful wife, Kitty (Mia Kirshner) to contrast the two marriages with which the film concerns itself.
The acting by all five principals, Marceau, Bean, Fox, Molina and Kirshner, are all perfection and in keeping with the era, a time only a few years before the Russian Revolution.   The movie is further enhanced by the music of
Tschaikowsky, Prokofiev and Rachmaninoff (even if some of the music was written after the time of the film).
A hint of why a revolution was inevitable (but only a hint) is seen
when Kitty is breathlessly running through the mansion room to get to
the ballroom so she can dance.   As she is about to enter, a servant
picks up the trailing skirt and hands it to her and she, without so
much as a glance at him, accepts the skirt part which she now holds in
one hand and joins the dance.  For a fleeting moment, seeing the many
servants one wonders about the Russian people who are outside, unseen,
and poverty-stricken.  None of that is allowed by the director to
intrude on the gay, happy life of those who were "in" . . . nor was it
allowed by the noblemen and women of that era.  Nevertheless, a fine
film!

Title
Review for Hunchback of Notre Dame, The (1996)
One of the more difficult tasks of writing screenplays is that of
converting a classic into a film.  When you add to that that the film
will be an animation, your work is really Herculean.  Nevertheless,
animation story/screenwriter Tab Murphy was equal to the task; as a
result we have a film which is enjoyable and enlightening for both
young and old.
To achieve this end, condensation of Victor Hugo's classic story of a
hunchback who is ugly and partially deaf, license had to be taken in
order to bring it to the screen.  The world being what it is, and
Disney under fire by Baptist Fundamentalists, the original bad guy,
Frollo, (voice: Tony Jay) who in Hugo's story was a high-ranking member
of the Church, is here made to be a secular judge.  How could they make
a movie with a Churchman having a sexual crush on the heroine, the sexy
Gypsy girl, Esmerelda? (voice: Demi Moore).
I remember well my first viewing of the Hunchback, Quasimodo, way back
in 1923 with Lon Chaney, Sr.  One look at him and I went flying out the
theater, scared out of my wits.   In 1939 I was better able to handle
Charles Laughton's great performance as the hunchback.  In the current
1996 animated version, Quasimodo (voice: Tom Hulce) is made much less
horrifying-looking and he is not deaf.  Thus while the original classic
story is retained, a few changes were made with the story to make it
more palatable and much less frightening for youngsters; at the same
time, adults will get the nuances and the message that people who look
or are "different" than ourselves should not be ridiculed or harmed.
When I saw the real Notre Dame on a visit to Paris many years ago, the
stone gargoyles near the bell tower did not talk; the movie brings them
in for a bit of humor, advice and pathos.  Other voices: Kevin Kline,
Paul Kandel.  Original score and songs by Alan Menken with lyrics by
Stephen Schwartz.
Congratulations to all who worked to make this Disney film a
wonderfully entertaining movie.
Directed by Gary Trousdale and Kirk Wise.

Title
Review for Hidden Dimension, The (1997)
The experience of seeing an IMAX film is one that no one should miss.
This is about my tenth IMAX film and at least the fourth in amazing
3D.   There is nothing quite like it.
Surrounded by state of the art sound, the picture is projected onto a
screen that is some ninety feet wide and five to six stories high.
This is about 10 times the size of a usual screen with subjects
magnified as much as 40,000 times.  For the 3D version of IMAX,
viewers  watch while wearing a very comfortable headset equipped with
special lenses which give the viewer the impression the action on the
screen is a mere 18 inches in front of one's seat. There is the feeling
that if you reach out in front of you, you will touch the scenery or
the actors. Incredibly realistic.
The latest IMAX 3D is FOUR MILLION HOUSEGUESTS, a
you-won't-want-to-miss film about the invisible lives that exist in
one's home.  With the aid of unique microscopes and filming equipment
especially designed to photograph what can be seen when looking into a
microscope, this "unseen" world is brought to life.
The story is that of  an 11-year-old girl, Elly, (Charlotte Sullivan)
who, along with her parents, is house-sitting at her grandfather's old
home situated on the bank of a beautiful serene  lake. The trees and
foliage are lush.  As Elly walks along the path to the house, we want
to reach out and touch her and say "Hello."  It is so utterly real as
if she were a neighbor.
Elly's parents are played by C David Johnson (the father) and by Gosia
Dobrowolska (the mother.)  Grandfather, although never seen but whose
voice is that of James Garner (Rockford Files, Americanization of
Emily, Murphy'S Romance, Victor-Victoria and many more), has a sense of
humor.  For Elly's amusement he has left a series of notes (clues)
which she is to follow and find the things he wants her to see.
Needless to add, Elly carefully follows the clues and is brought to see
a world she did not know existed, the minuscule world around us which
can only be seen through a microscope.   Elly finds this enchanting . .
. and so will you.
As stories go, this may be a little too deep for children under ten but
with a little explanation by their parents of what they have seen, the
children should benefit form this fine 3D film.  Older children and
adults will be fascinated with the stop-photography of mold growing on
fruit (over a period of 20 days), salt crystals, the life in water,
etc.
IMAX has been around since 1970; in 3D since 1985, and utilized color
in 1986. Find out where the nearest 3D IMAX theater is and take your
kids to see a most enlightening and innovative film.
Screenwriters: Paul Cox,  Barbara Kerr, John Larkin and Margo Wiburd.

Title
Review for I.Q. (1994)
     When I first read a small synopsis of the film, I thought it was
going to be a real dog: "Einstein acts as a cupid for a pair of young
lovers."  I was therefore prepared for the worst.  As it turned out, it
was not nearly as bad as I had anticipated.
     Einstein (Walter Matthau, looking exactly like old Albert
himself), has a niece, Catherine (Meg Ryan), a very bright
mathematician.  She is having her car fixed at a place where Ed (Tim
Robbins) works.  With her is her fiance, James, (Peter Fry who was
Peter in the film PETER'S FRIENDS ... and Jeeves on the PBS series).
     It only takes one glance at Catherine for Ed to fall madly in
love.  Ed, although a mere auto mechanic, is interested in aspects of
science and he uses "Time" to envision him being married to her and
their having 2 children.   Meg, of course, is unaware of Ed's fantasy.
     Einstein when he learns of Ed's infatuation with his niece thinks
it is a great idea, far superior to her marrying the dull Peter even if
he is a scholarly psychiatrist.  Albert and his science cronies set
about getting Catherine to drop Peter and to fall in love with Ed.
     While there are many scientific and mathematical jokes as well as
a dozen gags about "time does not exist," they are all in the first
half of the film.   The second half is devoted to how the writers would
get around to having the mathematician settle for the auto mechanic who
thinks he, too, is a scientist.  Unfortunately, the writers did not
succeed.
     Another segment that hurt the movie was the scene where Einstein
and his fellow geniuses are trying to help Ed in a test he is taking by
grimacing at him to give him the answers--an utterly childish bit of
buffoonery.
     In the cast are also Charles Durning, James Maher, Gene Saks, and
Lou Jacobi.

Title
Review for Johnny Mnemonic (1995)
     No one I have known has actually ever accused Keanu Reeves of
being able to act.  This film will change no one's mind.  Johnny
(Reeves) keeps a straight face throughout the whole film.  If we are
looking to give him credit it must be that the plot is so ridiculous,
no one could have done any better.
     The film opens with a big splash across the screen:  INTERNET.
Innocent me, I thought maybe at last they have made a movie based on
real scientific electronic know-how.  Forget it.  That is the last of
any credible science fiction.
     In the 21st Century, the most important asset is information.   To
keep things secret and unavailable to competing corporations, "mnemonic
couriers" are employed.  Johnny is a professional courier who has a
chip implanted in his brain (did I say "brain?").  Into this chip
containing thousands of gigabytes of memory, Johnny is supposed to
store the information he has stolen.  As in everything, there is a
price and the price Johnny must pay for what he gets is that his own
childhood memory is removed to make room for the chip.  Little wonder
he looks befuddled.
     Others in this mess are Dona Meyer, Ice-T, Takeshi, Denis Akiyama,
Dolph Lundgren and a mysterious ghostly Barbara Sukowa, a strange ghost
in cyberspace.  Very weird film.

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
  *******************************************
Warren Beatty directed, produced and co-wrote the very innovative
BULWORTH.   Long associated with liberal politics, he  here tears into
the political world with its frauds, with no holds barred.   This
results in a hard-hitting, way out film that is a pleasure . . . at
least most of the time . .  to watch.
As the titles appear on the screen, we are barraged with a platitude,
the political commercial, "We stand at the doorstep of a new
millennium."  Over and over and over.
Jay Bulworth is an incumbent United States Senator running for
re-election in the 1996 primaries.  He  has been campaigning hard and
is a nervous wreck. When Graham Crockett (Paul Sorvino) a crooked
lobbyist approaches to make a deal for him to vote "correctly" on some
insurance legislation,  Bulworth asks and receives a ten million
dollar life insurance policy.   He then  arranges to have someone
assassinate him, thus assuring that his daughter will be financially
secure.
No longer having to worry about what to say and act in order to be
re-elected, he goes wild with his new-found freedom of saying whatever
he wishes, however outrageous and politically incorrect it may be.  It
is this new person about whom the movie revolves, frequently in scenes
of great hilarity.    In all of this, Bulworth suddenly finds he wants
to live, especially after  having met the beautiful black Nina (Halle
Berry) and has to contact his assassin, Vinnie (Richard Scott
Sarafian)  to cancel  his murder.     That is more easily said than
done.
Bulworth visits Black churches and tells them, in rap, what they are
doing wrong, how they will never get anything they want unless they
become activists and stop supporting the black athlete who most
believe stabbed his wife.   To Hollywood VIPs he tells  that their
movies are worthless junk.  He alienates Jewish bigwigs.  In short, he
runs a campaign such as no one has nor will ever run again.
Where I got lost was when the wild Bulworth starts doing rap.   It was
just a bit too way out for me who believes "rap music" is an oxymoron.
In this case, though, the lyrics (when I could understand them) were
very good and to the point.
Many fine supporting roles but most noteworthy is that of Oliver Platt
as Murphy, Bulworth's Chief of Staff, who stays with him through thick
(but in the end) not thin.

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
There is no question about the acting abilities of Mel Gibson and
Julia Roberts.  Given that, it is unfortunate that the story jars
with reality when we have to assume that Alice (Julia Roberts), an
attorney in the Justice Department of New York City will find
enough in common with Jerry (Mel Gibson), a taxi driver who is a
crackpot on the question of conspiracies.   It just does not seem
believable Alice will see anything in Jerry that would make her
fall in love with him.
Jerry, in his cab, keeps up a running babble with his passengers,
ranting and raving and expounding about conspiracies while
maneuvering through NYC traffic.   There is nothing that happens
in the world or in NYC that does not indicate conspiracy to Jerry.
In short, he is a fanatic. Somebody out there is trying to get us.
Unlike the average fanatic, Jerry has some reason to feel as he
does: he is subject to momentary quick visuals in his brain that
are recollections but he cannot pin them down   He does not know
why but he is certain there are bad guys "out there" who would
like to kill him.   Although he has been tossed out of Alice's
office eight times, he still returns to her with  whatever
information he has been able to put together at home.  Alice is
the only one who will, at least for a little bit, listen to him.
Alice has a reason for tolerating Jerry.  Her past includes her
father, a federal judge who was murdered under mysterious
circumstances and she is not content with official explanations.
When Jerry is kidnaped by a strange government psychiatrist, Dr.
Jonas (Patrick Stewart)  who wants to probe Jerry's mind to find
out what memories it still harbors, Jerry escapes and turns to
Alice for more help.
Sadly, from this moviegoer's point of view, the story does not
ring true.  It appears to be a concocted tale and a not too
exciting one at that.    Despite Gibson's believable acting in
the role of a confused fanatic and Roberts turning in some equally
good acting, the movie goes not very far.   Truth is, I could not
picture Roberts as an attorney.  I just could not.

Title
Review for When We Were Kings (1996)
     If ever a film deserved the commendation of "It packs a powerful
punch," this documentary about the great heavyweight champion Muhammad
Ali (nee Cassius Clay) is it.   This is one great film.  Well-told,
dramatic, exciting and with wonderful picturesque descriptions by such
knowledgeable celebrities as Spike Lee,  George Plimpton.and
especially. Norman Mailer.  Mailer's description of what is going on in
the ring is a classic and should be carved in stone.
     Except peripherally, the film does not cover much of Ali's early
life; the focus  here being  the "Rumble In The Jungle" of Africa in
1974 when Ali, believed to be over the hill at age 32, had signed to
fight the most formidable fighter of his day, George ForEman. The two
had been brought together in Africa to let the black Africans see their
heroes in action and Ali gave them that and more amid shouts of "ALI!
ALI!"
     Having lived through the years when Ali was in his prime, I should
have known more about him . . . but did not.   I had seen him on TV
talk shows  but this film was a revelation for me.    It made me check
out more about his life, learning that when he refused to register for
our ill-conceived (to say the least) Viet Nam War, he gave as his
reason "No Vietnamese ever called me "nigger.'"   That really tells it
all.  That really shows the strength in the man.   For standing up
tall, his title was taken away.
     Ali was handsome, had a boyish smile, had wit and charm . . . all
revealed in the film.   His battle with Forman, why it was fought, what
others thought about his taking on the champ, are all brilliantly
shown.  Do not tell me you do not like documentaries.  This one is a
must-see!   You've heard of "edge of the seat movies?"  This one will
pull the seat right out from under you.    Go, man, go!

Title
Review for Mi vida loca (1993)
     This is a heart-breaking story of the boys and girls, the young
men and women who live in the barrios of East Los Angeles.  It would
seem like a hopeless existence with a dead end.  Their world is
tattoos, and guns and hanging around with nothing to do but get into
trouble.
     MY CRAZY LIFE shows that existence, that entrapment.  Two of the
women, best friends "Sad Girl" (Angel Avilas) and "Mousie" (Seidi
Lopez) each is pregnant by Ernesto (Jacob Vargas), a drug dealer.
Even  their names, "Sad Girl" and "Mousie" reveal that they are lost.
What do they know about rearing babies and where will they get the
money?  And what life lies ahead for their children?
     What keeps this from being a better film is that it is an apologia
for the gangs.  It is made to appear as if the gangs are innocuous,
formed to bond newcomers and friends who are harassed by other gangs
and the police.  But people get shot in drive-bys.  And there is a fear
that permeates their lives.   Even Giggles (Marlo Marron) who goes to
jail even though her man is the guilty one, ends up without hope.
When, in jail, the realization comes that she cannot depend on men;
that the men will end up wounded, in jail, or dead, she tries to learn
a trade in prison but when she gets out and looks for a job, the ads
ask where she studied, what experience does she have and has she ever
committed a felony.  No hope.
     And when the women realize they have to depend on their own wits,
the film ends tragically, negating the hope that the women can make it
on their own.
     As a film, it is engrossing, well-acted (many are first-time
actors) but perhaps it should have been an outright documentary rather
than a fictional film based on real lives.
     Written and Directed by Allison Anders who herself was a teenage
runaway, has done time in jail, and is the single parent of two
childen.

Title
Review for Keiner liebt mich (1994)
     Dorris Dorrie, who both wrote and directed this German-made film,
takes us and the heroine, Fanny Fink (Maria Schrader) on a one hour and
40 minute emotional roller coaster ride.  Fanny is pretty, dresses
nicely, and works at the airport checking luggage for anything
suspicious.  In addition, the job pays well enough to provide a nice
apartment.  What, then, is missing in that picture?   A man.
     All her friends are kind enough to keep reminding her that she is
fast approaching 30, after which she can give up on finding "THE
man."   Her best friend, and neighbor, Orfeo (Pierre Sanoussi-Blise) is
gay.  Orfeo lip syncs in a gay bar and frequently dresses in drag; not
exactly what Fanny is looking for on the romantic side.
     Fanny, beset with her problems, can think  of no one else but
herself.  Fortunately for Fanny, her platonic friendship with Orfeo
keeps Lothar (Michael von Au) the apartment house manager and a boor,
at a distance.  Despite the unhappiness that seems to hover over
Fanny, director Dorrie keeps it from becoming a downer somehow making
us feel that all will yet turn out well for Fanny.  Maybe there IS a
Man and at any moment her life may suddenly bloom.  I would like to
think that.
Written and Directed by Dorris Dorrie.

Title
Review for White Man's Burden (1995)
     About twenty minutes into the movie it became clear what point
writer/director Desmond Nakano wished to make:  What if black people
changed places with white?  What if everything were reversed and the
blacks owned the factories, that racist black cops beat up whites as
the white police did with Rodney King?   What if all the indignities
blacks frequently suffer at the hands of many whites were reversed?
     Once having gotten that understanding and, because I have always
been a fighter for racial and religious equality, I did not need a
movie to bring it into focus for me.   More importantly, would those
who are racist go see such a movie or would word of mouth tell them the
film is heavy-handed and then not go see it?  I'm inclined to think
that would be the case ... which is a pity.
     Director Nakano says that if "white Man's Burden" can jar viewers
out of their usual polarized complacency and provoke genuine dialogue
on race, then it will have succeeded in its intent.  This film is very
unlikely to accomplish that, however honorable and worthy its
intentions.
     Louis (John Travolta) works in a factory where all the employees
are white, the one exception being the executive who runs the place.
Louis is a hard worker; he does more than is expected.  When a package
has to be delivered to the factory's owner, Thaddeus Thomas (Harry
Belafonte), he volunteers to do it.  Arriving at the gated entrance to
the estate, the maid, via phone, tells him to bring the package around
to the side of the house.
     Inside the house, the family and friends, all elegantly attired,
and served by a white maid, are departing after dinner.  This is one
very rich, high society family.   As Louis is standing, package in
hand, waiting for someone to come and accept it, Thomas' wife has just
finished with her shower and is taking off her towel while standing at
an open window, at which point Thomas sees Louis and assumes he is a
Peeping Tom.  When the maid had told Louis to go to the side of the
house, she meant the other side.
     The package is accepted by the maid.  Louis, next day, approaches
his black manager and asks if he could become a foreman as the current
foreman is leaving, and "as you know, I have been a hard worker for
nine years here."  Instead, he is fired.  The explanation which Louis
ekes out is that the boss does not want Peeping Toms employed at his
plant.
     Louis is desperate.  He has not ever earned enough to support his
wife and two children and now he is being canned.  In the evening, in
despair, he goes for a walk.  He sits at the curb.  A police car with two
black policemen jump out of their car and command him to raise his
hands.  When he asks what that is all about they begin to club him even
while he is lying on the ground covering his bloody head with his
hands.  (A robbery had recently occurred and the description of the
robber fit Louis.)  [All whites look alike?]  When the police discover
he is not the robber, they say "Sorry about that" and take off in their
patrol car.
     Attempts by Louis to meet with Mr. Thomas and explain meets with
rejection.  Mr. Thomas does not want to talk with him. At this point,
the desperate Louis points a gun at Mr. Thomas in order to force him to
listen  and get his job back.  What follows is a kidnapping.
     It is quite obvious that the movie has a real, and important story
to tell but I do not think this film is the one to do it.
     Tom Bower plays Louis' homeless friend who does not want to get
involved with the kidnaping.  Kelly Lynch has the role of Louis' wife
trying to make ends meet.

Title
Review for Nuovo cinema Paradiso (1988)
Anyone who loves films and film-making will want to see Cinema
Paradiso.  Loosely based on the life of its director, it captures his
love for films when, at about 9 years old, he begins to visit the
projection room of the Paradiso Cinema in his small town in Sicily.
Philippe Noiret (it's a joint Italian-French film) is the projectionist
who teaches the young Toto how to run a projection machine.
Paramount to the story and belly-laughing funny, are the film previews
by the priest who sits in the otherwise empty theater to censor any
"pornography."  Anytime anyone on screen kisses, he rings the bell he
holds in his hand so that the projectionist can excise that part of the
film.
All the flavor of this small town is brought out, as is the people's
love for the cinema, the town's only entertainment.  The villagers
sometimes know the words by heart, having seen the film over and over,
frequently in one sitting.
Clips of old films abound in this movie; from Valentino thru Gary
Cooper and Clark Gable...and Ingrid Bergman, Greta Garbo, and Jean
Arthur.
A very satisfying and charming film starring Philippe Noiret, Jacques
Perrin, Salvatore Cascio and Marco Leonardi.
Winner of the Oscar for Best Foreign Film of 1989.

Title
Review for Indochine (1992)
There have been several films in the past that dealt with French
colonization.  ALGIERS is perhaps the finest example.
INDOCHINE starts slowly, as if it were merely the story of a French
woman, Ms. Devries (Catherine Deneuve), whose father and she own a
rubber plantation in VietNam, and who falls in love with a younger man
(Vincent Perez), a French naval officer.  She is the mother of an Asian
daughter (Linh Dan Pham) whom she adopted when the child lost her
parents.
But the film suddenly picks up its pace when it turns political, when
it shows how the French treated the Indo-Chinese as slaves, separating
families (as was done in the U.S. prior to our Civil War), how people
were weighed and examined like cattle before being sold into bondage.
Clearly, the VietNamese had enough grievances to overthrow the French
and drive them out.
The story takes another turn when the young man leaves Ms. Devries when
her daughter falls in love with him.  But the main story is the routing
of the French, the love stories being merely the vehicle to tell the
greater story of the war.
An exciting film. . . and a foreshadowing of what we encountered when
we fell into the VietNam trap from which the French had finally
extricted themselves.

Title
Review for Rainmaker, The (1997)
Based on the John Grisham novel of the same name, it is the story of
how one insurance company does not honor legitimate claims by its
policy holders.  With the exception of John Voight who is Drummond,
the insurance company's thousand-dollar-per-hour attorney, the rest
of the cast is either wasted or engages in some very mediocre
acting.
The film's hero, Rudy Baylor (Matt Damon) is supposed to be a young
hotshot lawyer trying to make it big.   As portrayed by Damon,
however, he falls very short in that role.   He never comes across
as being real, as being a real attorney who knows what he is doing.
He does not compare with John Voight as a brainy attorney.  The
film's title refers to someone who aspires to be a great attorney
and make tons of money for any company that is smart enough to hire
him; no such company has done that in Baylor's present.
Danny DeVito, as a "para lawyer" who has not passed the bar, hams it
up something fierce to the point where he comes across as
ridiculous. In more or less cameo roles, the following are wasted:
Mary Kay Place, Claire Danes, Mickey Rourke, Danny Glover, Virginia
Madsen, Roy Scheider, Teresa Wright, Dean Stockwell and others.   I
shudder when I think of all the fine films those actors have been
in; this was certainly not one of them.
     The screenplay and direction are by Francis Ford Coppala, and
that is hard to believe, too

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Matt Damon and Ben Affleck wrote the wonderfully mature and
perceptive  script while still in college.   That in itself is quite
astonishing; one does not usually find such insight in the young.
In addition, the dialog was excellent; funny when that was its
intent, on target when a point was to be made.  All of which
contributed to a most captivating film.
Will Hunting (Matt Damon) is a genius, not only in math but in just
about any other field.    With a photographic mind, he has total
recall.  He is not a "mixer," having but a few close friends,
especially Chucky (Ben Affleck).  Fame and fortune are not his bag
so that when his professor, the brilliant mathemetician Lambeau,
(Stellan Skarsgard) poses a difficult problem on the blackboard,
Will solves it quickly but leaves no name as to who had worked out
the problem.
Will, an orphan with a step-father who abused him,  does not take
guff from anyone so it is not surprising that he gets in trouble
beating up a policeman.  One scene shows this genius mopping the
floors of his school, MIT.    Eventually, Lambeau realizes it is
Will who solved the math problem even he was unable to do.   He then
makes it his mission to bring Will out of his mode of living and of
his behavior and send him to several psychiatrists, none of whom are
able to handle this genius.   Finally, Will is asked to see
Lambeau's  old school-friend, psychology professor Sean McGuire
(Robin Williams).
The whole portion of the film devoted to McGuire is beautifully
rendered with many subplots about Sean teaching at a lowly community
college whereas Lambeau has it made at MIT.  Some very  pithy remarks
and exchanges take place between the genius and the professor.  When
Will tells Sean that he has a girlfriend (Minnie Driver) whom he
loves; that both she and he are perfect, Sean replies "Neither you
nor your girlfriend are perfect but what matters most is, are you
perfect for each other?"     When Lambeau tells McGuire that Will
has the potential to be world-famous, Robins asks, is that what you
want for him or is that what Will wants?
All in all, a most involving film with Robin Williams again giving
his usual very fine performance and Matt Damon fulfilling his role
admirably.   Not to be missed.

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
Steven Spielberg knows how to tell a story that is at once gripping
and enlightening.  Here he turns his attention to the year 1839 when
the Amistad uprising took place on the high seas.   A Spanish ship
is taking slaves from a Havana slave market to somewhere else in
Cuba.  Conditions below deck where the prisoners are held are
unbelievably horrible.  When the captors discover they have
insufficient food for all their slaves, they tie some of the
most ill and debilitated  to the anchor cable and drop it overboard
where all attached to the cable drown.
The movie tells us many strange things of which we may have been
unaware. We know that the God-fearing people of the South saw
nothing wrong with enslaving other humans, ripping their families
apart and destroying their culture. It was just that point that made
me wonder at Cinque (Djimon Hounsou), the leader of the fateful
uprising, who did not remark when shown in a Bible pictures of
Jesus,  including the walking on the water, "Where was He when my
people were being drowned?"   How could he say that while the slaves
were treated badly, "others" had apparently suffered worse.    As I
do not recall that in the book on which the film was based, I wonder
why that was inserted in the film?
The film is filled with heartbreaking emotion.  The anchor incident
mentioned is one of them.   The scene of Cinque's wife and family
back in Africa; the capture and enslavement by other black Africans
is fearful viewing.
Attempting to help the slaves who are on trial for murder of some of
their captives is Roger Baldwin (Matthew McConaughey) who, at first
approaches the trial (with 7 of the judges slave-holders!)  as a
trial of humanity, only to discover that he can win only if it is
shown as a matter of property.   Were the captors legally justified
in shipping someone else's property?    He is aided by a couple of
abolitionists: Joadson, a former slave himself (Morgan Freeman in a
comparatively small role) and Tappan (Stellan Skarsgard), an
immigrant.
Prominent in the film is Martin Van Buren as a weasel who would sell
his soul to get re-elected.   At the opposite end is  the most
powerful performance  given by Anthony Hopkins in the role of  John
Quincy Adams addressing the court for some dozen spellbinding
minutes.    Now, THERE is an actor!

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
     The film begins and ends with Honey Bunny (Amanda Plummer) and her
guy, Pumpkin (Tim Roth), a couple of petty thieves who, after mulling
over the risks of holding up various and sundry types of retail
business and banks hit upon the bright idea of robbing the very
restaurant in which they are having breakfast.  Think of all the
wallets.   Thus begins the film which encompasses and interlaces three
stories of small-time crooks in a send up  of movies about that
gangsters.  There are more laughs than killings but with plenty of
each.
     Marsellus Wallace, (Ving Rhames), the boss, has instructed Vincent
Vega (John Travolta) to watch over his wife, Mia (Uma Thurman), while
he is away on business.  The last goon to have baby-sat Mia ended up
dead so Vincent is less than thrilled with his assignment.  Before that
is over, Vincent goes through a deadly series of frantic events which
for us, the audience, are hilarious.
     Elsewhere, there is Butch Coolidge (Bruce Willis), an upcoming
prizefighter being instructed to take a fall in his next fight.
Willis, it should be noted, is becoming more and more believable as an
actor.  In Pulp Fiction, he outdoes himself.  In this segment he is
helped by Captain Koons (Christopher Walken) who, with a straight face,
relates to Butch (as a child) the very weird story of how the captain
came into possession of a pocket watch which he is turning over to
Coolidge.  Fabienne (Maria De Medeiros) is Butch's girlfriend.
     There is still another story that threads its way through the
film.  This one involves Vincent and Jules (Samuel L Jackson).  While
Travolta is perfect as the crook who seems to get into all kinds of
trouble without looking for them, it is Jackson who runs away with the
film.  Last seen in FRESH, here he really takes over as the
Bible-quoting criminal who suddenly sees the Hand of God and wants
out.
     Harvey Keitel excels as Wolf in a short but very funny bit.  Eric
Stoltz is the drug dealer and Rosanna Arquette is his wife.
     While each of the stories is of the silly kind and what happens
now crisscrosses with what happened earlier, it all adds up to a most
enjoyable movie.
Written and Directed by Quentin Tarantino.

Title
Review for That Old Feeling (1997)
There are very few comedians I've admired more than Carl Reiner.
Personable, obviously a sweet man, a terrific sense of humor, he was a
wit and comedian.   His contributions to the Show of Shows and The Sid
Caesar Show cannot be topped.  But that was back some 25-35 years ago.
Of late he has given us directorial mediocrities such as Fatal Instinct
and Sibling Rivalry.   What happened to the humor in Oh God!  (1977),
The Jerk (1979),  All Of Me (1984) and the hilarious, outrageous (for
1970) Where's Poppa?
THAT OLD FEELING is a rehash of all the old "Romantic Comedies" so that
even such natural comedians as Bette Midler, aided and abetted by
Dennis Farina (GET SHORTY), can do little to spark the film. There are
some funny lines but the situations are so absurd that it is more of a
farce than a romantic comedy which it obviously intended to be. . .
and that is a pity.
Lily (Midler) and Dan (Farina)  have been divorced twelve years and
they are both happily enjoying their lives.  Lily is a movie star,  Dan
is a journalist. Lily has taken a new husband, Alan, (David Rasche)
who is an author of best-selling pop psychology while it is evident
that if anyone needs psychological help, he is a prime candidate.
Dan, too, has re-married.  His new spouse is the lovely Rowena (Gail
O'Grady).  So everyone should be happy, right? WRONG.  Lily and Dan
have a daughter, Molly (Paula Marshall), and Molly is about to marry
Keith (Jamie Denton), as boring as they come, who insists on a big,
formal wedding.  That means Molly's parents have to be invited but
when they get together they always fight and that will  play havoc with
the wedding Molly warns Keith.  And that is the setup for THAT OLD
FEELING.

Title
Review for Bullets Over Broadway (1994)
     Woody Allen is back and, in case you were wondering, he is as good
as ever.   For this double satire on gangsters and "The Theatre," he
chose the 1920s which was the height of the gangsters a la Damon Runyon
characters as well as Broadway's peak decade.
     David Shayne (John Cusack) is a playwright seeking to get his
work staged and directed by himself.   A starry-eyed writer, filled
with integrity, he is told by his potential producer, Julian Marx (Jack
Warden), that a gangster, Nick Valenti (Joe Viterelli), is willing to
be the play's angel provided his talentless showgirl moll, Olive
(Jennifer Tilly), gets a juicy part in the play.  In this case, she
wants the role of the psychiatrist.
     David, if he sets aside his principles and hires Olive, will be
able to get Helen Sinclair (Dianne Wiest), a prima donna who likes to
imbibe, as well as the money to hire Eden Brent (Tracey Ullman) and
Warner Purcell (Jim Broadbent).   No contest: David's principles
lose.
     Lest I run the risk of being a "Spoiler," allow me only to say
that Cheech, (Chazz Palminteri), the gangster's lieutenant, is assigned
to sit in at the rehearsals to see that Olive gets the part she wants,
act as her bodyguard and to keep an eye on things.  This turns into
some of the funniest scenes in the movie.   Palminteri, by the way, is
the author of that excellent screenplay, A BRONX TALE, in which he
played Sonny, a gangster.
     Also helping things along are Rob Reiner, Mary-Louise Parker and
Harvey Fierstein.   A great cast.

Title
Review for Azúcar amarga (1996)
          Writer-Director Leon Ichaso, who came to the U.S. when he
was 14-years-old, says "Every character in the film is a composite of
different people.  This is the story of many people in Cuba," . Maybe
it is and maybe it is not.
          BITTER SUGAR is an unrelenting attack on Castro and the
Cuban Revolution.  Anyone who believed that the revolution was viable,
that Castro was for the people, was a dupe.   The film's propaganda
never lets up, never mentions any of the harm that our own country has
visited on Cuba when 5 of our presidents have continued the unabated
onslaught on this tiny island in the Caribbean with embargoes and
Radio broadcasts to the island long after Castro had stopped trying to
bring the revolution to Central and South America.
          This is not to say that the condition of the people is not
bad.  Nor do I contend that Castro is not a dictator.  But a film that
wants to be fair should mention the embargoes we have visited on Cuba
so that no country, much less a tiny one, could survive, and then we
say, "Look what Castro has done to his people."  No mention
is made that millions of people in Cuba still admire, rightly or
wrongly, Castro; that illiteracy has been all but wiped out.
          What the film's main theme is that "everyone" wants to leave
Cuba and go to Miami.  No mention is made that Miami is THE most
dangerous city in the U.S.   It is presented as if it were Heaven.

Title
Review for It's My Party (1996)
     This is one party to which you may wish to bring along Kleenex.
It's about AIDS and about someone who is about to die as the fatal day
approaches.  Nick Stark (Eric Roberts) is an architect, handsome,
healthy-looking, personable and with a great sense of humor.  Unlike
most cases where the AIDS virus has withered the ill person with lost
weight, pain, etc., Nick's has attacked his brain.  His doctor has
told him that in two days his vision, already beginning to blur, will
disappear and he will go into a coma until he dies.
     But Nick is not one to succumb that easily.  He does not want
tears and heartbreak to surround his last days.  Instead he wants to
die with dignity and arranges for that day with his friend, Tony (Paul
Regina) that in two days he is to administer the pills that will put
him to "sleep" forever.  Meanwhile, he invites friends and family to
a sort of going away party.  He wants it to be uplifting, without
tears ... but of course, those who have been invited know that tomorrow
is his last afternoon, that the next day he will be dead.  Not exactly
a party but that is what Nick has opted for.  Dignity above all.
     Some of those who attend are his mother (Lee Grant) and the
father (George Segal) who is divorced from the mother and who has
never been close to Nick and is now confronted by a loving, dying son.
There is his devoted sister, Daphne, (Marlee Matlin), a friend,
Charlene (Magaret Cho). and Nick's ex-lover, Monty (Bronson Pinchot)
who had deserted Nick when he learned he had AIDS.
     Sad?  Yes.  Heartwarming?  Also yes.  This is a different
aspect of the devastation of AIDS and how some people handle their
final moments.  A film not to be missed.
Written and Directed by Randal Kleiser

Title
Review for Jungle2Jungle (1997)
This live comedy is one the kids will love.  Adults should take a grain
of salt along but, hey, if you are looking for a movie that will make
the young ones stay in their seats because they won't want to miss a
moment of what is happening on the screen, you have come to the right
place.
JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE  has all the elements found in a movie for children.
It has comedy, including of course the slapstick variety.  It also has
the exotic flavor of  a 14-year-old boy who is more at home in an
Amazon jungle than he is in the rat race of the big city where his
father lives. And there is even a touch of puppy love (but no puppies),
with pretty Karen (LeeLee Sobieski.)
Michael (Tim Allen)  is the boy's father.  Allen  is no newcomer to
Disney films as he starred in The Santa Clause and in Toy Story where
he was the voice of Buzz Lightyear.  On TV, Allen has many credits and
is  probably best known for HOME IMPROVEMENT.
Michael would like to marry Charlotte (who wouldn't?) (Lolita
Davidovich) but before he can do that he has to get divorced from his
current wife, Patricia (JoBeth Williams).  So Michael hops a plane to
the Amazon jungle where Patricia, a doctor, is currently working.
Imagine his surprise when he discovers that a 14-year-old boy, with the
adorable name of Mimi-Siku (Sam Huntington)  who wears a headband and a
native "skirt" is his son he never knew he had.  Patricia had neglected
to tell him she was pregnant when they separated.
Michael decides to take Mimi-Siku back to New York City and that is
when things begin to roll as Mimi-Siku does not readily adapt to his
new surroundings.  At this point the comedy shifts into high gear.
Helping to make the film a children's delight are Martin Short, David
Ogden Stiers, Bob Dishy and Valerie Mahaffey as well as others.

Title
Review for Donnie Brasco (1997)
If you are going to make still another film about the mafia, there had
better be another angle.   DONNIE BRASCO, fortunately, has just that in
the relationship between an undercover FBI agent, Joe Pistone, alias
Donnie Brasco, and a mafia loser, "Lefty" Ruggiero.
Based on the true story of Joe Pistone who was responsible for some 200
mafia members being charged with criminal activity, the film shows us
what is necessary to be able to accomplish that. . .  total
dedication.   Wife, children, friends have to play second fiddle to the
dangerous work to which the agent has pledged himself.   Thus,
Pistone's wife, Maggie (Anne Heche) is torn between having to see him
infrequently and worried about his undercover life. Likewise, his
children are shortchanged because he cannot be a real father to them.
There we have one facet of Donnie's life.  The other is his
infiltration into the mafia by befriending Lefty.   Lefty has been a
mafia man ever since his teens but despite having taken part in some
killings, robberies, and assorted mafia doings he never gets the
recognition he feels he deserves; others get promoted but Lefty is
always overlooked. . . . and it rankles him.   When he meets Donnie he
feels this is his chance to show the mob that he can bring young,
bright, blood into the mafia . . . and he stakes whatever reputation he
has on Donnie coming through for him.   He vouches for Donnie to the
mafia chief.   This causes the great dilemma facing Donnie.
Having associated with Lefty for so long, having Lefty  depend on him
and befriending him, Pistone is torn about how he can turn in his
friend to the FBI. Not an easy decision, he finds.
The acting by Depp is a departure from most of his films and he is very
good. Pacino, who usually tears through a film with both guns
(figuratively) blazing, here has a subdued tone, the demeanor of a
loser trying to get out of the hole he has made for himself years ago
when he joined the mob.  Dressed in an adorably crazy (pork pie?) hat,
he is a delight to watch.
While Michael Madsen, Bruno Kirby and James Russo lend their talents as
various mafia members, the film suffers from a gratuitous scene of legs
being sawed and hacked, blood running, legs with skin torn off.   When
I see that, I have to knock off Bytes.  There was no need for the
graphic violence we are shown, however small a part it played in the
entire film.

Title
Review for Mirror Has Two Faces, The (1996)
How does it feel to be very bright, to yearn for a man's love and
passion and still regard yourself as pretty close to being an ugly
duckling?  That is what Rose Morgan (Barbra Streisand), a professor of
Romantic Literature at Columbia University,  has to confront.  Has not
her mother, Hannah, (Lauren Bacall) told her, in not those exact
words, that she is a plain-looking woman?  Mother Hannah, despite her
getting along in years still has traces of her beauty and makes the
most of it.
On the other side of the coin there is handsome Gregory Larkin, a
Columbia U. mathematics professor  who has to ward off the advances of
a host of beautiful women only too eager to get him into the sack.
(We should all have that problem.)  Gregory yearns to meet a woman
whom he can love because they have things in common, because she is
bright, rather than because she is beautiful.   In desperation he
places a Personal Ad that reads "Columbia University professor (male)
seeks a woman interested in common goals and companionship.  Must have
a Ph.D. and be over thirty-five. Physical appearance not important."
With a little chicanery by her sister, Rose and Gregory meet.
Almost immediately there is that chemistry of admiration and respect
and love and Gregory asks her, to her great surprise and happiness, to
marry him.   Of course, Gregory has not so much as kissed her yet,
His love is that of the aforementioned admiration and respect variety.
Rose, for her part, agrees but she also looks forward to making
passionate love with her husband.  What happens when she discovers
that is not at all what he had in mind.  Had he not told her that
stuff about admiration and respect?  Why is she obviously angry and
frustrated?  What is wrong with women?  Cannot a husband and wife have
love without sex?  Apparently not in their case.
Based on the French film, LE MIROIR A DEUX FACES, Streisand's version
is a delightful romp as we witness the metamorphosis of a plain-Jane
into a svelte, glamorous, sexy-looking woman.  Let Gregory handle that
when he comes home from Paris after a three-month's lecture gig during
which Rose has not returned any of his many pleading phone calls.
Bridges is charmingly terrific as is Streisand.   Aided by such
experienced actors as Lauren Bacall at her best, Georges Segal, Mimi
Rogers, Pierce Brosnan, Brenda Vaccaro, the stunning Elle MacPherson,
the film is most entertaining.   This is one you will not want to
miss.

Title
Review for Man Who Knew Too Little, The (1997)
Every year there are some bad movies but they usually involve
non-stars.  That Bill Murray should be in a film that is so bad is
pitiful.  It is not alone the story; it is Murray himself who has
grown chubby in the face, looks dissipated but still tries to exude
the boyish charm and glib speech for which he has been noted lo
these many years.  You cannot keep doing that; it palls.
The story reeks of contrivance.   Wallace (Bill Murray) is a video
store clerk from Iowa.  Flying to London to celebrate his birthday
with his wealthy brother James (Peter Gallagher) he is treated to a
surprise by James who takes him to a "Theater of Life" where the
audience gets into the act and takes on a role.    Wallace takes it
seriously and is soon unable to distinguish the participatory part
of the theater with real life.   Not very funny.
When Wallace takes a phone call, it is a wrong number call which
should have gone to government-hired assassins who wants to overthrow
the current British government and start another cold war with
Russia.  Wallace becomes involved with this assassination group.
He thinks it is part of the acting he is doing.  Are you still with
me?   This is as far as I will go.

Title
Review for Unstrung Heroes (1995)
     Acting in Woody Allen films and her friendship with him have
influenced and enhanced her many talents.  UNSTRUNG HEROES is not a
Woody Allen type movie nor story.   It is totally Keaton.  However, the
perfection and intelligence she displays in making the film are
something Allen has always attempted and usually succeeded in
accomplishing.   There the resemblance ends.
     UNSTRUNG HEROES is a gripping tragic-comedy.   The tragedy is that
Selma Lidz (Andie MacDowell) early on in the film  becomes ill with
what appears to be a malignant brain tumor.    Selma is the wife of Sid
(John Turturro).  They have two children, Steven (Nathan Watt) and his
younger sister Sandy (Kendra Krull).
     Sid, the father of the family, is an eccentric inventor who has
yet to come up with something salable.   He is very bright but he talks
to his children (Danny is twelve and his sister is seven) as if they
were adults.   Nevertheless, Danny, who has a high I.Q., understands
much of what Dad is spouting.   This is a wonderful loving family that
is suddenly hit hard when the housemaid angrily blurts out that "You
know your mother is dying!"
     Others in the family are Dad's brothers, even more eccentric than
Dad.  There is Danny (Michael Richards) and Arthur (Maury Chaykin.
They provide the much needed comedy breaks.  Uncle Danny wants Steven
to be called Franz so he would be Franz Lidz (which happens to be the
real name of the author of the book on which the film is based)   Uncle
Arthur and Uncle Danny live together.  There are hundreds of stacks of
newspapers which they expect, one day, to read.  Because Steven cannot
bear to watch his mother's illness he gets permission to live with the
two uncles for the summer.
     The film has Oscar written all over it.   Its direction is so well
balanced, its photography of the 1960s and all the attention paid to
every detail, with a great cast doing fine work make this a great film
such as few others that have been released this year.

Title
Review for Browning Version, The (1994)
     The film is an adaptation by Ronald Harwood of the Terence
Rattigan play with some small changes.
     It is announced that Andrew Crocker-Harris (Albert Finney), a
classics professor for more than twenty years at the Abbey School is
resigning.  Despite his strong desire to instill in his students an
appreciation for the great works of literature, he is being let go.
Many of the students in the Lower Fifth refer to him as "Old Hitler."
     Crocker-Harris has another problem: his young wife, Laura, (Greta
Scacchi), who with little attempt at secrecy is carrying on an affair
with the physics teacher (Matthew Modine).  The hardship of living with
a young wife who despises him, Andrew now finds himself with a life
that has been wasted.   His replacement is coming in with some new
ideas about how to teach literature.
     Entirely literate, it is a touching film.  Add to that the fine
acting of Albert Finney in a somewhat different role than that with
which he is usually associated, and we have a very worthwhile film.

Title
Review for Grand chemin, Le (1987)
        Louis (Antoine Hubert) an eight-year-old Parisian boy is
taken by his pregnant mother (who has been deserted by her
husband) to her old girlfriend in the country in Brittany where
the friend can watch her son for the 3 weeks it will probably take
before her new child is born.
        The boy is very reluctant to be left with strangers but he
has no choice.  Along comes Martine (Vanessa Guedj) a 10 1/2-
year-old bombshell of a country girl to take him in hand and
explain everything a young boy should know.  "Like to see a girl's
wee wee?" she asks. "Oui, oui," he replies . . . or should have.
She takes him to a hayloft where they watch her nude sister and
fiance roll in the hay.  "Why does her sister do it?" Louis
wonders, as he listens to her moaning which he interprets as pain?
        As in MY LIFE AS A DOG, AU REVOIR LES ENFANTS,
and HOPE AND GLORY, and many many more, this movie is
 about children growing up, learning about life and having to deal 
with it as each new wonder arises, with the director telling the true
 story as he remembers it.
        Le Grand Chemin will enchant you. Every word the young girl
utters is outrageously funny; her every action (from lifting up her
dress to expose herself to the back of a priest, to her climbing
the church roof to urinate down the drain so that the gargoyle's
mouth spouts the urine onto a passing nun) is hilarious.
        The French, like the italians,  deal with their religion,
nuns, priests, church, God, heaven with humor.   Unlike in the
U.S., they feel that a priest is only a human doing his best in
his chosen field and not an angel sent by a mysterious God.  They
are more up tight about violence than they are about sex.
  Directed by Jean-Louis Hubert, the real-life father of Antoine.

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
Now that the "evil empire" of the USSR has been emasculated, writers
have had to find new villains. In Simple Simon, author Ryne Douglas
Peardon,  did not have to look beyond our own back yard.  Here the
villain is Lt. Colonel Nicholas Kudrow (Alec Baldwin) a high-up
official in the covert, secretive NSA, (National Security Agency)
who upon discovering that a top secret code had been broken by a
10-year-old kid, is out to get him even if it means killing him.
 The kid is Simon, (Miko Hughes) an autistic savant.   In an attempt
to find him, his parents are killed by NSA agents.    Art Jeffries
(Bruce Willis) is an FBI man who has been made a scapegoat in an
earlier episode, is relegated to routine work.   That suddenly
blossoms into something big when he discovers Simon and the 2
murdered parents. He decides to take care of Simon and protect him
from the NSA.
 This may have sounded exciting on paper but Bruce Willis and his
monotone voice and equally mono-expression is hardly the one to
bring you to the edge of your seat.    While actor Miko Hughes was
allowed to witness autistic children, the better to portray them,
the director allowed him to do little more than roll his eyes upward
and to the side.  That soon became boring even if in real life that
is how some autistic children behave.   This is a movie; it needs
more than that.   Much more.   Further, very little was shown that
would demonstrate he was a savant.
 The film, in addition, is very violent, with the F word tossed about
carelessly. I lost count of the number of bullets fired but it must
have been well into the  hundreds.   Very gory.   But the worst sin
is that it was boring.
 Alec Baldwin has a smallish role until the last scenes.  Tommy B
Jordan (Chi McBride) is the only government person who is a friend
of Jeffries.   McBride comes across as ready to take on some meatier
roles.

Title
Review for Nothing Personal (1995)
In Ireland, it's referred to as "the troubles."  And what a terrible
euphemism it has been and continues to be.  By this time, with a half
dozen films dealing with the subject of the Catholic IRA and the
Protestant paramilitary  (both of whom believe in the same god, Jesus),
it would seem that every moviegoer would know everything there is to
know about that small piece of North Ireland territory.  Each movie
seems to have tackled a different aspect of "the troubles" but NOTHING
PERSONAL" explains somewhat better what iS going on.
The recent, THE DEVIL'S OWN,  NAME OF THE FATHER, MOTHER'S SON, to name
but a few, have touched on the consequences but not on the root cause.
This film, while not pointing a finger, does do some enlightening.
Kenny (James Frain), Protestant and Liam (John Lynch), Catholic, were
childhood friends.  No longer;  When a pub frequented by Protestants
is blown up, all hell breaks loose.  Like the gangs in the U.S. who
hold their "turf" so dear they will kill to keep others off it, the
Catholics and Protestants have their own.  A piece of jagged metal
separates the two neighborhoods but the metal is only symbolic; a new
increased hatred is on the loose..  Anyone found wandering in the
other's part is fair game.  "Nothing personal;" that is just how it
is.  Cooler heads such as Leonard's (Michael Gambon) of the Protestant
faction arranges a truce with the local IRA leader but nothing can
stop the crazed, fanatic Kenny gang from seeking revenge.
Liam's son is missing, apparently having wandered into the enemy sector
so Liam has to find him before anyone gets shot.  But Liam gets caught
by the Kenny gang and held and beaten while being questioned.  And the
internecine war goes on with seemingly no end in sight.
A very tense film packed with powerful emotions.

Title
Review for Mille et une recettes du cuisinier amoureux, Les (1996)
As with most foreign films that are sent here to the States, the story
is simple, the pace leisurely, no guns get fired, no one is killed yet
the film holds you in its grip.  Such a one is A CHEF IN LOVE, the
Republic of Georgia's film that was one of the 5 nominees chosen for
Academy Award consideration. Georgia was once a part of the USSR.
In keeping with several other foreign films, (Babette's Feast, Eat
Drink Man Woman,  to name but two), we are treated to a gorgeous spread
while the story of the Chef, Pascal Ichac (Pierre Richard, who first
became a big star with THE TALL BLOND MAN WITH ONE BLACK SHOE)
unfolds.
In 1995, Anton (Jean-Yves Gautier), while arranging for an art
exhibition fortuitously meets a photographer, Marcelle (Micheline
Presle.)    She has with her a manuscript, unpublished, written by her
uncle, Pascal,  which she would like Anton to read.  "Is the name
familiar?"  It tells of Pascal's last adventure in a wild, exciting
life when he returned to the Republic of Georgia.    What intrigues
Anton, is that his mother, Princess Cecilia Abachidze (Nino Kirtadze)
often spoke reverently of the dashing Pascal.   The Chef had written a
book, 1001 Recipes Of A Chef In Love which Anton now recalls his mother
felt was even more important than  the Bible.
Thus begins the story.  As Anton reads, we are treated to flashbacks to
the 1920s of what Anton finds on the manuscript's pages, much of it
about food but also about his having met a most beautiful woman,
Princess Cecilia, much younger than he, and how they  fell in love with
each other in a shared cabin on a train headed for Tbilisi.    Back and
forth in time the flashbacks tell us of the revolution, and how the two
lovers are affected while Anton begins to grasp the significance of
what he is reading and who his real father may be.
Pierre Richard's performance as the Chef is a delight.
In French, Georgian and Russian with English subtitles.
Ingeniously Directed by Nana Djordjadze

Title
Review for Cyrano de Bergerac (1990)
Not surprisingly, there have been several films made of Edmond
Rostand's poignant story of unrequited love. More astonishing is that
each has been just about excellent.   In 1950, Jose Ferrer was CYRANO
DE BERGERAC and in 1987, Steve Martin acted in his own version, the
film being called ROXANNE.  The current version stars the ubiquitous
hot French actor, Gerard Depardieu.
The swashbuckling hero, Cyrano,  wants to be remembered, as he says,
for his "panache."  He is amazingly wonderful as he battles
single-handedly against 100 men.  He is even more astonishing as the
man with the soul of a poet but with a nose too large to be taken
seriously as a lover.
Just quickly, the story is that a young soldier  in love with the
beautiful Roxanne but he lacks the words to convey his love.  He asks
Cyrano to hide in the bushes below Roxanne's window and to speak for
him to his beloved. . . who happens to be a distant cousin of Cyrano
who too is in love with Roxanne and is able to "pour it on" while all
the time aware that he, with his very large schnozz has but a minuscule
chance to win the beauty for himself.
Rostand gave Cyrano such lines of beauty as would break your heart:
"And what is a kiss, when all is done?  A promise given under seal.
. . a vow taken before the shrine of memory. . . a signature
acknowledged. . . a rosy dot over the i of loving."
This version will rank high among the best Cyranos ever made.  With
Depardieu at his very finest, you will not want to miss it.
In addition to Depardieu, there is Anne Brochet as Roxanne, Vincent
Perez and Jacques Weber.

Title
Review for That Thing You Do! (1996)
          Tom Hanks says that he made the film to "protect my sanity."
He traveled all over the world promoting FORREST GUMP and it was
getting him down.  Wanting to do something different, he yearned for
"something creative" other than acting.   Having seen "The Compleat
Beatles" documentary, and being aware of the many, many band groups
back in the 1960s who had but one hit record and then disappeared, he
decided he'd like to write and direct a film about these "one hit
wonders."
          This then is a kind of compilation of many such groups as
Hanks saw them.  There is Guy Patterson (Tom Everett Scott) whose dull
life as a salesman in his father's hardware store is brightened by the
set of drums he plays after working hours.  This puts him in another
world.  When a group called The Wonders loses its drummer (remember
an ill Ringo being replaced temporarily with someone called Jimmy
Nichols?), Guy is ready to accept their offer to play the drums with
them.   Their identifying tune, "The Things You Do" shoots to the top
of the charts  and soon they are on their road to fame and fortune, or
so it would seem.
          Hanks uses some new actors to make up The Wonders.  There
are, in addition to Scott, Johnathon Schaech, Steve Zahn and Ethan
Embry.   The part of Faye, Jimmy's girlfriend, (Liv Tyler) is
portrayed by a very pretty blonde.  Guy's girlfriend, Tina, is played
by Charlize Theron.  Hanks himself has the role of an executive at a
record company (The Play-Tones) who manages the band.
       While the film is entertaining enough and does portray the
times, (the period of JFK being assassinated, of the VietNam war, etc.)
I found nothing special.  However, it does have some nice music and
it is recommended to anyone who lived through that era of the 60s.

Title
Review for Immortal Beloved (1994)
     This is being billed as "The untold love story of Ludwig Van
Beethoven."  What we are not being told is that the story is pure
fabrication, written and directed by Bernard Rose.
     Over the years I've seen a number of films about the life of
probably the greatest composer of all time, from Abel Gance's (1937)
(the same Gance who did the memorable NAPOLEON) to the 1985 BETHOVEN'S
NEPHEW but never has anyone taken the liberty, the licence to invent a
biography such as IMMORTAL BELOVED.
     No place does it say it is a documentary but to throw in
unsubstantiated nonsense as part of a biography is shameful.  No one
knows to whom Beethoven dedicated several of his pieces but director-
writer Rose let his imagination soar so that Beethoven's nephew (his
brother's son) turns out to be Ludwig's son.  Hah!  That's a new one on
me.
     That is not my only complaint.  There is lots of great music and
with Sony Digital Sound it is great.  But no one seemed to relate the
visual portion of the film to the music being played.  When Ludwig, who
had dedicated his third symphony (Eroica) to Napoleon and then
eradicated the honor when he discovered Napoleon was just another
military dictator on a land grab, the music playing in the background
is the 5th Symphony, not the 3rd, or my ears have also gone deaf.
     When the wonderful 9th is soaring, some of the visuals show kids
punching at each other on a dark street.  Was that Rose's
interpretation of Heine's lyrics?
     I cannot believe any of the above and will force myself to see it
again.  But the inane story and the poor choice of the visuals
accompanying the music are simply awful.  Maybe when I've had time to
see it again I'l review it to be sure everything I've written above is
true.
     Gary Oldman is subdued as Ludwig.  Others in the cast include
Jeroen Krabbe who tries to find out to whom Beethoven left a dedication
"To My Immortal Beloved"; also Isabella Rosselini, Johanna Ter Steege
and Velerina Golino.

Title
Review for Sour Grapes (1998)
  Without a doubt the most hilarious film in many a year.   And why
not?   Written and directed by one of the funniest, most talented
persons in the business, Larry David, who co-created, wrote, directed
and produced many of the SEINFELD shows, has come up with a farce to
end all farces.   How would you like a belly laugh every 30 seconds?
This film is where you will find that.
  A simple story.  No point in complicating things as the comic moments
all come naturally as well as fast and furiously.    This is one film
you do not want to see end.
  Evan (Steven Weber) is a brain surgeon.   His cousin Richie (Craig
Bierko) is a designer of soles for sneakers.   The two cousins and
their girl friends Joan (Karen Sillas) and Roberta (Robyn Peterman)
take off for a gambling spree in Atlantic City.  As the evening is
about to come to an end with all having lost all but a few coins, the
two men sit at adjoining slot machines.   Down to his last quarter,
Richie asks Evan to give him a couple of quarters for his last try at
the machine that takes up to three quarters. . . and Richie comes up
with a winning jackpot of over $400,000.
  In an expansive mood he treats the four to dinner and talks of
hiring a limousine and chauffeur to celebrate.   Evan, it is obvious,
is not happy.   It does not take a genius to recognize that he feels
he is entitled to at least half the winnings as it was his two quarters
that enabled his cousin to get the jackpot; you do not win  a jackpot
with one coin.    In fact, as it was Evan's two coins to Richie's one,
Evan feels, although he will not press the point, that he really is
entitled to two thirds.
  When he finally mentions that to Richie it sets off a whole series of
comic events as Ritchie does not see it Evan's way.    It was HIS
machine that one.   Finally, to keep the peace he offers Evans $1000
which Evans promptly rejects, tearing up the check.   The ante is later
upped to 3% and that paltry amount is also rejected.
  The girlfriends disagree about the sharing of the money with Evan.
This, too, leads to some funny moments.   One who does not think Evan
is entitled to anything is Richie's  mother, Selma (Viola Harris)  who
gives a great performance as a "smothering" mother to the nth degree.
  Too many gags, (and who wants to reveal them all?)  involve an Xray,
an attempt to frighten Selma to death as she cannot live without her
son should anything happen to him.   There is still another Xray which
accidentally is put up to the light backwards so the healthy appendage
is removed from Danny Pepper, (Matt Keeslar) an actor and a character.
A little incident with a man in the hospital elevator who allows the
door to shut so Richie cannot get on leads to more comedy.  In fact,
everything, however small and seemingly of no importance, takes on
new meaning in the next scenes and all good for great laughs.
   Warning:  You have no one to blame but yourself if you miss this
wonderfully entertaining film.   I can't remember when last I laughed
as hard and often in a movie.

Title
Review for Crumb (1994)
     Remember, way back in the 60s, when everywhere you looked you saw
the cartoon, "Keep On Truckin'. . .?"  That was the work of the
"underground cartoonist" Robert Crumb; this documentary is not only
about Crumb but his mother, his artist brothers, his wives; they make
for an odd lot despite their obvious talent.  In addition, there are
interviews with current top underground artists.
     The second most famous of his work was something he did for Janet
Joplin's Cheap Thrills.   Robert Crumb was also famous for Fritz the
Cat which Ralph Bakshi made into the first x-rated animated feature.
Time Magazine's art critic, Robert Hughes, compares Crumb with the 16th
Century Brueghels.  While I have seen many Brueghels, I don't know
enough about art to see the resemblance that Hughes finds.
     Over a period of about six years, Director Terry Zwigoff, did
interviews with Crumb, his wives, his family and other cartoonists.
What emerges is a film of a very talented and entirely uninhibited
artist.  In all the film, he wears his hat and his smile while all the
time he is sketching in pen and ink.  The ease with which the pictures
take shape is a marvel to behold as the pen seems to be scratching away
with a will of its own..
     An appreciation of underground art is helpful in enjoying and
understanding Crumb and all those with whom he associated.  ZAP Comix,
for instance, is one of his.  While here in the U.S. he has cult fame,
in Europe and Japan his artistic work is more readily seen as "real"
art.   If you do not mind admiring the work of an artist who, at age
five,  was sexually attracted to Bugs Bunny, you will get a bang out of
the film ... even when Crumb goes way beyond tilting with what today
is considered PC.

Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
Born and raised with two strikes against him, Francie Brady (Eamonn
Owens), with a drunk for a father, Benny (Stephen Rea), and a
mother, (Aisling O'Sullivan) slowly going mad because of that and
their abject poverty, the one thing Francie needs but is denied him
is understanding and love. The consequences of being shunned are
horrendous.
 Based on the novel by Patrick McCabe and beautifully directed by Neil
 Jordan whom we all remember from The Crying Game, the film is taut,
 tense with our knowledge that there can be no happy ending for young
 Francie.
 Francie's only friend is Joe (Alan Boyle) who together enjoy a world of
 comic books and imaginative play.   Later, even Joe opts for friends who
 are more stable, leaving Francie further alone and devastated.  One of his
 biggest enemies is the gossip, Mrs.  Nugent (Fiona Shaw) who takes a
 great dislike to Francie, blaming him for all the troubles he experiences.
 When Francie returns from reform school, he finds employment in a
 slaughterhouse, (hence, the film's title) hardly the right place
for a pre-teen, especially one with Francie's problems and
disposition.   Perhaps the last place where he should be working  is
where animals are hacked up and blood is all over the place.
 Both his parents die.  Despite his having had nothing to do with
either, having received nothing from them, he is further alienated.
He latches onto an imaginary Virgin Mary icon (Sinead O'Connor) who
"talks" with him.   However, eventually all of these hardship descend
upon the child and he explodes in a rage of violence.
 Despite the seriousness of the subject, there are, surprisingly,
moments of laughter.  As Shakespeare well knew, you don't  keep
everyone on edge without relieving the tension every now and then.
 I have one caveat: the movie should have subtitles.   I've said it
before of other films made in Great Britain.  In particular, this
film is laid in a small out of the way village and the accents are
rough on the ears.  Despite being able  easily to follow the story
without understanding every spoken word, I felt I was missing
something by not hearing everything uttered.  When are those in
charge going to realize that some English-speaking films do require
subtitles?

Title
Review for Bad Company (1995/I)
     This a film about espionage.  That used to mean countries spying
on each other.  But about ten years ago, with the end of the Cold War,
the need for spies was no longer as urgent and on one day the CIA laid
off a hundred of its employees.  As most of us know, being unemployed
is not a good situation in which to find oneself and the former CIA
spies had to look for other work.  What else did they know but spying?
     Fortunately, for them, there are still lots of spying jobs
available except now it's within our own country with corporations
spying on each other and on their own employees.  The new head of the
CIA has claimed that economic espionage is the hottest current topic in
the Intelligence field.  And in April 1993 the FBI's industrial case
load leaped from ten to five hundred in only nine months.  So the film,
Bad Company, is not entirely a work of Ross Thomas' imagination.
     Nelson Crowe (Laurence Fishburne) is a CIA agent who is in
disfavor because he said he turned over some X millions of dollars to
"someone" as ordered by the CIA but he has no receipt and the "someone"
claims he never got paid.  Sounds like the Iran-Contra fiasco.
     The Agency tells Crowe to get a job with The Grimes Corporation,
get the goods on them and get back his own good standing with the CIA.
The Grimes Corporation does all sorts of spying and frequently uses the
information it gains to blackmail and pick up a few extra millions for
itself here and there.  (You cannot trust anyone these days.)  That,
you will agree, could give spying a bad name.
     All would have been well for Crowe who did start out to do an
honest job of infiltration but along the way he got a bit greedy
himself.   This was not entirely unexpected because the President of
the Grimes Corp, Vic Grimes (Frank Langella) has as his right-hand
"man" an unscrupulous and pretty woman, Margaret Wells (Ellen Barkin).
     The dialogue is good, the action moves nicely, the actors are
first-class but somehow the film does not come up with that necessary
"something" to set it in a class by itself.  Maybe it is the number of
fornicating scenes and that they seem to go on so long that the
tendency is to laugh.  That will kill an espionage film in a hurry.
Whatever.  It could have been a better film.

Title
Review for Mother Night (1996)
          This has been a bad week for me as far as screenings go.
MOTHER NIGHT was one of two films which made me leave the theater
before the film was over.
          MOTHER NIGHT is from a book by Kurt Vonnegut.  As a film, it
was extremely unreal and slow-moving to the point where my patience
was put to the test and failed.  I left.
          Howard W Campbell, Jr. (Nick Nolte) is in an Israeli prison,
accused of being a kind of Tokyo Rose for the Hitler regime.  Campbell
is given a typewriter and he writes the story of how the Americans
asked him to pretend to be an admirer of the Nazis so he can spy for
the U.S.   His radio broadcasts around the world from Germany are full
of vitriol for the Jews and Americans in general.
          Campbell throws himself into the spy business with such
force that we never really know whose side he was really on.  Of
course, he has been told that if he is found out, our government will
deny any complicity. (Why?  Were we not allowed to have spies in
Germany with whom we were at war?)
          When the war is over and Campbell comes back to the U.S., he
assumes another identity but after a while he feels it is safe and
goes back to using his real name, a name the whole world reviles, that
of Howard W Campbell, jr.  Why would he be so stupid?
         Others wasted in the cast include Sheryl Lee, (Twin Peaks),
Alan Arkin, David Strathairn, Kirsten Dunst, Frankie Faisan and Arye
Gross.

Title
Review for Au revoir les enfants (1987)
The locale is the countryside outside Paris in a Catholic boarding
school for young boys.  The time is that period in World War II when
France was occupied by the German army.   To the school where a priest
is the principal are sent three Jewish boys where they can be hidden
from the Gestapo.   Teachers and principal are in the Resistance and
risk their lives by keeping the Jewish children in their school.
Louis Malle directed this semi-autobiographical look at the school, the
students, the staff, the nuns, the German soldiers, and the Gestapo.
This film is right up there with the best films ever made.
The last lines of the movie as the final screen credits appear is a
real clincher.
French with English subtitles.  An award-winning film. 

Title
Review for Bound (1996)
          Exciting? Yes.  Good story?  Yes.  Then what is my
complaint?  It is the gratuitous gore.  Do the directors really have
to show a pair of scissors, such as is used to cut twigs or small
branches, while the gangsters cut off the fingers one by one of a
suspected cheat?  His head is in the toilet and the blood is gushing
all over the place.  I could have done with that.
          Too bad because the story is a good thriller.  Two women
(Gina Gershon and Jennifer Tilly), in an attempt to outwit the male
Mobsters makes for an exciting film. The two, who happen to be
Lesbians, against the gangsters tosses in another angle in mobster
films.   But the film kept bugging me with all the shooting and blood
and the aforementioned scissors and kept me from enjoying the film's
story more.
          An odd thing was the acting of Ceasar (sic) who seemed to
be doing an imitation of Jack Nicholson right down to the whites in
his eyeballs whenever he looked upward, a distinct Nicholson
affectation.
          I don't know whether or not I liked the film well enough to
overcome the violence.  If that kind of mayhem does not bother you, you
will enjoy the rest of the film.

Title
Review for Terminal Velocity (1994)
     David Twohy, who co-wrote THE FUGITIVE, had a "new" idea for a
screenplay.  "What if a woman arranged a sky-diving incident in order
to fake her own death?"  Sounds interesting.   All it needed was a
little better story and better execution, neither of which the film
got.
     Chris Morrow (Nastassja Kinski) comes into the office of
sky-diving instructor, Richard "Ditch" Brodie (Charlie Sheen), saying
she wants to learn how to sky-dive.  And she is in a hurry.  Wants her
first lesson immediately as well as her first jump.  She tells him she
is not athletic but she is determined.  "If I don't do it right now I
may change my mind and never do it."  Ditch says "Okay."
     They get into a plane and take off.  While up in the air, Morrow
diverts Ditch's attention for a moment by saying she sees another plane
nearby.  He goes up front to ask the pilot if he has seen anything; he
has not.  Ditch returns to the back of the plane and finds it empty.
Looking out the open doorway he sees her hurtling to her death below
with the parachute not having opened.  The FAA blames him for
carelessness, for perhaps not having secured the parachute properly,
etc.
     As this is the star, who is supposed to have been killed early in
the film, it should be obvious that whoever hit the ground, it is not
Morrow.  That leaves only one person whom it may have been and the
audience should easily guess who.  Ditch smells a rat and tries to find
out what really happened.
     The movie has several important goofs and suspensions of disbelief
so that it becomes nothing more than hundreds of so-called
"thrillers."  Exciting parachute jumps happen frequently in the film
and there is even a high aerial act (unbelievable) where Ditch
transfers from the wings of a bi-plane onto another plane and crawls in
through the open back.  Sure.  An attempt to mix banter and thriller
does not help the movie.
     Deran Serafian (DEATH WARRANT and BACK IN THE USSR) is the
director.  In addition to Sheen and Kinski, the cast includes James
Goldofini (whom you may recall was Geena Davis' jilted boyfriend in
ANGIE) and Christopher McDonald who was in QUIZ SHOW and GRUMPY OLD
MEN.

Title
Review for Romeo + Juliet (1996)
     It was just 60 years ago that I saw my first ROMEO AND JULIET,
and loved it even though (or perhaps because) the leads were played by
Leslie Howard and Norma Shearer who were, respectively, age 39 and 36.
But what did a kid know?  They were two of my favorite actors and
I adored the film.  The music was by Tschaikowsky and that did not
hurt one bit.   I recall that when Romeo spent the  first night with
Juliet, the camera panned up over the balcony, into the sky and over
the trees and when it came down to earth it was morning.  How
beautiful it was!  How this teenager ate that up!
     Somewhere around 1958 I saw the Russian filmed ballet version
with Ulanova and with the great music of Serge Prokofiev and I went
wild about the film and especially the music.  Since then I have seen
the ballet (Bolshoi) a dozen times and nothing can surpass the ballet
version.
     In 1968, there was Zeffirelli's wonderful production starring the
15-year -old Olivia Hussey and Leonard Whiting who was a mere 17,
which was more in keeping with the original play by Shakespeare.  And
now we are approaching the millennia with Baz Luhrmann's
interpretation of that great work.
Four hundred years ago, Shakespeare wrote:
     The current version opens with a TV broadcast by an anchorwoman
(Edwina Moore) reporting a shoot-out between two rival gangs, the
Montagues and the Capulets in Verona, Florida.  The TV camera takes us
to
the scene where the gang members are firing revolvers at each other. 
Among them is Tybalt (John Leguizamo), a Capulet and Mercutio (Harold
Perrineau) a Montague  who is Romeo's best friend.
     My first reaction to this scene was "This movie is going to
bomb!"  I felt a small revulsion at the desecration of a great writer.
But shortly, thereafter, I was caught up in the film, with the nice
touch that the characters spoke Shakespearean English.   The
appearance of Romeo (Leonardo DiCaprio. whom I correctly chose to be
nominated for  Best Supporting Actor in WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE?
and that of Juliet (Claire Dane, who won an Emmy nomination in MY
SO-CALLED LIFE, and followed that with LITTLE WOMEN, HOW TO MAKE AN
AMERICAN QUILT and TO GILLIAN ON HER 37TH BIRTHDAY) moved the film
into another dimension).  Both DiCaprio and the very innocent-looking
Dane gave the film  a feeling of young love at first sight.  There
could not have been better casting.
     A couple of quick complaints.    Was it really necessary to make
Mercutio into a cross-dresser?  Was it really necessary to have Juliet
blow her brains out with a revolver . . . or was that supposed to be
in keeping with the modern crazy world of guns?  I would have much
preferred had she finished the deadly potion Romeo had just taken.
     Anyone upset that I have committed "a spoiler" by revealing that
both Romeo and Juliet die?   You have to be kidding, right?
     Other notables in the cast are Pete Postlethwaite (as Father
Laurence) who absolutely knocked me out as the tragic father in that
wonderful film, IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER as well as his appearances
in many other fine films . . . and Brian Dennehy as Ted Montague as
the head of the Montague clan and Paul Servino as Fulgencio Capulet,
the patriarch of the Capulet clan, Diane Venora as his wife Gloria
Capulet.   Paul Rudd is Paris, Juliet's suitor; and let us not forget
Juliet's nursemaid, played by that fine British actress, Miriam
Margolyes, who here has a Spanish accent.

Title
Review for Clerks (1994)
     Made on the very meager budget of under $30,000, by a dropout from
film school, CLERKS is one of the funniest, good-natured and vocally
raunchy movie in a long, long while.  Originally slapped with the
dreaded NC-17, on appeal it was given an R rating.
     Dante Hicks (Brian O'Halloran) is a clerk at the Quick Stop
Groceries, in New Jersey, a convenience store where the nuttiest
customers in the world seem to frequent.  There is, to cite but one
example of many, the elderly man who asks to use the employee restroom
but who then requests to borrow one of the porn mags on the shelf to
take with him into the toilet.
     "Working" in a miserable video store next door, where he treats
the customers with utter disdain, is his friend, Randal (Jeff
Anderson).  Throughout the film, where every other word consists of
four letters spoken in a most offhand relaxed manner, are the customers
with whom the two have to contend, each of who is odd in his own way.
Randal is of the belief that every customer should be insulted.
     Writer-director Kevin Smith who himself worked on and off in a
convenience store does a masterful job in this his first film.  But
this is much more than a mere recounting of his experiences as a
register jockey.  This is one funny film.
     Also starring are Marilyn Ghigliotti (as Dante's devoted
girlfriend, Veronica) and Lisa Spoonauer (as Caitlin, the high school
ex-sweetheart who has just announced she is getting married).

Title
Review for Simple Twist of Fate, A (1994)
     If you read George Eliot's SILAS MARNER when you were in school,
you will recognize the story has been used as the basis for this film
written by Steve Martin and updated to 1984.
     Michael McCann (Martin) is a cabinet maker who leads a quiet life
as a recluse.  When one day a woman with a small child is near his
secluded home, the woman falls and freezes to death.  When the cabinet
maker goes out to investigate a noise he heard, the young girl toddles
into his home through the open door ... and McCann's life changes
forever.
     McCann is everything a father should be to the baby, who he names
"Mathilda,"  unaware that John Newland (Gabriel Byrne), a local
politician, is the biological father.  However, Newland, who is
wealthy, intends one day to get her back.  When that happens, the court
must decide if the biological father, who can afford to bring up his
daughter in style and send her to an Ivy League school when she grows
up, should get custody or should the poor man who raised her.
     The cast includes Stephen Baldwin as Newland's thieving brother,
Laura Linney as John Newland's wife and five young girls who are
Mathilda at various ages.  Alana Austin is Mathilda at age 10 and a
great little actress she is!

Title
Review for Ed Wood (1994)
     Edward D. Wood, Jr. was in love with filmmaking.  He flourished,
if that is the word, in the 1950s through 1961.
     Wood, unfortunately, had no talent for directing,  Too bad he was
unaware of it, making one miserably inept film after another.  These
are the titles: BRIDE OF THE MONSTER, GLEN OR GLENDA, JAIL BAIT, THE
SINISTER URGE, NIGHT OF THE GHOULS, and the one he thought would bring
him fame, PLAN 9 FROM OUTER SPACE.
     Three of his films starred Bela Lugosi who himself had begun to
confuse his real life with that of his film roles as the eerie,
sinister Dracula.  Eventually, Lugosi died of drug addiction. The one
reason to see the film is Martin Landau's interpretation of Lugosi.
Beautiful.
     Director Tim Burton says of Ed Wood, "There's something beautiful
about somebody who does what they love to do, no matter how misguided,
and remains optimistic and upbeat against the odds." I would argue that
it is far from beautiful and that insane asylums are filled with people
who cannot face reality.
     Burton adds, "We're not making fun of Wood (a cross-dresser) nor
of his transvestitism.  I really care about these people."  All well
and good but just showing Wood's utter ineptness in making films and
walking around in women's clothes is making him the subject of
ridicule.  I do not think that making fun of someone, who is already a
pathetic figure, is tasteful, despite the protestations.
     The film surprisingly ends up-beat, omitting that Wood eventually
ended up making porno films and becoming an alcoholic.  Johnny Depp
(WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE. BENNY AND JOON) does well enough as Wood
though he could have been a bit more quirky.
     Bill Murray has a small part as Bunny Breckenridge who is thinking
of getting a sex change.  We could have done without Murray.  Again, it
is Martin Landau's performance that stands out.  Sara Jessica Parker is
Wood's girlfriend.

Title
Review for Waiting to Exhale (1995)
     The good things to be said about WAITING TO EXHALE can be summed
up in a few words:  it has given employment to many black actors as
well as a black director.  Having said that, there is little else good
that merits more than 2 Bytes.
     For instance, of the four starring actresses, three of them are
beautiful in the sense that white people look upon beauty.  I suspect
that blacks look upon them as white beauties with dark skin.  Further,
while it is not written in The Ten Commandments that every film about
blacks should be meaningful in the sense that films by Spike Lee are,
it would still be nice if the film did not have 4 women who, whatever
the reason, smoked, drank, went to bed with men after a slight meeting,
held conversations that were always sexual and whose lives seemed to be
devoted only to finding "a man."
     Where, I kept asking myself, are the role models which the blacks
need?  For years, Savannah (Whitney Houston) has been asking God to
send her a decent man.  Then there is Bernadine (Angela Bassett) whose
husband announces he is leaving her to marry his white secretary.  How
does she deal with it?  She sets his fancy car and clothes on fire.
Robin (Lela Rochon) is business-wise but man-stupid.  Lastly, we have
Gloria (Loretta Devine) who is on the heavy side, the most sensible of
the lot.
     All the women are well-dressed, live in beautifully decorated
apartments.  One wonders how the average black will relate to these
characters?   The normal looking men have the supporting roles:
Gregory Hines, Dennis Haysbert, Mykelti Williamson, Michael Beach and
Leon.
     There is no question that the acting rings true and the directing
is on target but the story . . .

Title
Review for Lugar en el mundo, Un (1992)
     This film was disqualified for nomination for a 1993 Best Foreign
Film because it was a joint Uruguay/Argentine production.  In any case
it was not the best of those that were nominated.
     Ernesto (Gaston Batyi) as a young man returns to the village where
he grew up to see what the place looks like today.   His mother, Ana
(Cecilia Roth), was a doctor, and his father, Mario (Federico Luppi), a
former university professor who now taught school, went to Spain where
Ernesto was born.  His parent had fled the dictatorships that
flourished in Argentina.  Ernesto, in flashbacks, relives some of the
events of his youth.
     Using flashbacks, the film relates how the family returned to
Argentina, carrying on their struggle for the working class by actually
working with poor shepherds.   Mario tries to persuade the landowner's
foreman to let his daughter, an illiterate, attend his school but the
father refuses, saying it is unnecessary for a girl to be able to read
and write.  Ernesto takes on the task of teaching her without her
father's knowledge and ends up falling in love with her (Lorena del
Rio).
     Any number (too many) subjects are tackled by the director so that
there are some lulls.  Overall, it is well intentioned and does have
lots to say about the politics of Argentina.

Title
Review for Feast of July (1995)
     When you see the words "A Merchant Ivory Production," you can be
forgiven if you expect the very best in filmmaking.  Remember A ROOM
WITH A VIEW and HOWARD'S END, among others?  It is therefore with
regret that I have to report that FEAST OF JULY does not live up to
their usual work.
     The film opens with Bella Ford (Embeth Davidtz whom you will
remember from SCHINDLER'S LIST) trudging across a barren wasteland in
England.  This scene should have been edited to half its length.  Bella
falls or sits down and suddenly there is blood as she gives birth to a
dead baby.  Bella buries the child and continues walking, searching for
the whereabouts of Arch Wilson (Greg Wise), who after fathering the
child, abandons Bella.
     When Bella finally makes it into town, the man who lights the
street lamps (Ben Wainwright) sees her, and invites her to stay with
his wife (Gemma Jones) and their three handsome sons, Jedd (James
Purefoy), Matty (Kenneth Anderson), and Con (Ben Chaplin).  As one
would guess, the three sons are immediately enchanted by Bella and are
determined she will be theirs.  When harvest time arrives they sit down
to the Feast of July; hence, the title.
     Just as Bella finally chooses Con to be her fiance, tragedy
strikes the family with the arrival of Wilson, the man who had
abandoned Bella.
     What detracted greatly from the film was the ending.  Somehow Paul
Bradley, the screenplay writer, or perhaps it was Ms. Davidtz, failed
to elicit any sympathy for Bella.  Without the sympathy the film ends
on a bad note.

Title
Review for Fresh (1994)
     Writer-Director Boaz Yakin, in his first full-length film, has
come up with a searing, terrifying movie about life in the ghetto for
both blacks and Hispanics.  It's the story of twelve-year-old Fresh
(Sean Nelson), without a mother, who lives with his aunt in a crowded
apartment with his sister (a junkie) (N'Bushe Wright) and almost a
dozen cousins.  His father, (Samuel L. Jackson), sits in the park and
takes on all comers playing chess to earn himself a few dollars, so
essentially, Fresh is also fatherless.
     To earn some money, hoping one day to be "The Man" (the head of a
dope ring), he sells cocaine and delivers smack for a couple of
dealers, one black, the other Hispanic.  In this ghetto of Hispanics
and blacks, young Fresh keeps socking away his money for when he is
older and can be his own drug boss.
     Almost every other word spoken in the film is a cuss word except
when one really wants to use a pejorative on someone (black or white),
the vilest name they can think of is "Nigger."
     Fate steps in when his school girl friend is fatally shot on a
playground by a drug dealer who has gone momentarily berserk over a
basketball game in the school yard.  At this point he realizes that the
drug dealers are a curse and must be destroyed.  How he goes about
doing that makes for a very exciting film.
     Young Sean Nelson is perfect in his role as the sullen kid with
his missions; at first, to grow up and takeover, later to seek
revenge.
     What is missing in the film is any mention of what brought the
blacks and Hispanics to their plight.  What about good schools, jobs
and decent affordable housing?   It would have been a better film if
that had been included.

Title
Review for Gravesend (1997)
It has been many years since I rode through the Gravesend area on a
street car.  Not far from the famed oceanside playground of Coney
Island, Gravesend was even then a miserable Brooklyn neighborhood.
Today it is inhabited by poor Italians, their children without
goals, everyone "hanging out."   The film is a depiction of a
hair-raising night in Gravesend when four friends, obviously losers,
whose combined intelligence is less than that of an ant, find
themselves with a dead body on their hands.
One of them, Zane (Tony Tucci), had been playing with a gun and as
guns have been known to do it went off, killing the brother of
Ray (Michael Parducci).  What are they going to do?   Along with
friends Chicken (Tom Malloy) and Mikey (Thomas Brandise) they mull
over their very limited options:  Do they call the police and
explain it was an accident or do they try to get rid of body.
Zuane, who fired the gun, is not about to take a chance on the police
buying their accident alibi.  Instead, he and the others try to
enlist the aid of a drug dealer who is known to be able to dump
bodies.  That's JoJo the Junkie (Macky Aquilino in a beautiful
performance).  In addition to $500 he wants a thumb. (sic.)  Before
long the friends have to dispose of another body.
The story of how the film was made (on a rumored $5000) is as
interesting as the movie itself.  Salvatore Stabile, only 22, wrote
and directed this tense, revealing film.  Just about singlehandedly
he set about visiting those in Hollywood who could get the movie
produced.   Luckily he hit on Oliver Stone and others who were
impressed with "Sal's" crude, first film, gave him money to upgrade
it and get it shown.
If this is not a 100% professional film, it certainly is a good
start.  DREAMWORKS SKG, Steven Spielberg's company, has tapped young
Stabile to a 2-picture deal.

Title
Review for Circle of Friends (1995)
     Chris O'Donnell, the male lead in the film, is handsome, young
(24), and at the top of my list for a long and fruitful career as an
actor.  Remember him in SCENT OF A WOMAN where he played opposite Al
Pacino, winning a Golden Globe nomination for Best Supporting Actor and
the Chicago Film Critics award for The Most Promising  Actor of the
Year?   His charisma hits you instantly.  In CIRCLE OF FRIENDS he plays
Jack Foley, the star of the rugby team at the college he attends in
Dublin.  (O'Donnell, by the way, is the only American in the film.)
     There are friends and there are friends and not always do they do
the expected.  In 1957, Benny (Minnie Driver) and her friend Eve
(Geraldine O'Rawe) leave their small town of Knockglen to attend
college in Dublin where they run into another friend, Nan (Saffron
Burrows).   While Nan is a blonde beauty and Eve is a beautiful
brunette, Bennie is the "plain Jane."  It ia interesting to note that
Driver, who plays Benny is a beautiful TV star in the UK who had to put
on thirty pounds to give her a somewhat dowdy look.
     The story, written by best-selling author Maeve Binchy, is of the
goals, the hopes and dreams of the three small-town women who are now
on their own and of Jack who sees in Benny the goodness and inner charm
that more superficial men had failed to notice.
     Conflict and deceit intrude among the friends in the circle;
nothing in real life goes smoothly forever.  Director Pat O'Connor
superbly brings all of that to life in this very lovely film.

Title
Review for Crimson Tide (1995)
     Almost the entire film takes place aboard a U.S. submarine
equipped with long range nuclear missiles.  What the film makes clear
is that a nuclear war is a nuclear holocaust for the whole world; there
would be neither winners nor losers of such a war.
     When the Nationalist Russians tangle with the rebellious Russians
as to who will have control of Russian nuclear missiles, the U.S. fleet
is put on alert.  At all costs, the rebels, who have already declared
the U.S. an enemy, must not be allowed to get control of the missile
site.
     Captain Frank Ramsey (Gene Hackman) who has been the commander of
the sub, the Alabama, for many years, and his very intelligent but new
Executive Officer, Lt. Commander Ron Hunter (Denzel Washington) are in
charge of the sub.  When an Emergency message comes over the wireless
to get missiles ready if they have to be fired should the rebels take
over the missile site, everyone on the sub realizes what could lie
ahead for the world.
     The Navy rule is that both the Captain and the Executive officer
have to be in agreement before the missiles can be fired.  At that
point another message comes through saying (paraphrased) "Have the
missiles ... " but the radio is down and the rest of the sentence
does not come through.  It is at this point that the Captain and
Executive officer get into a fierce disagreement which turns to
mutiny.  The Captain wants the missiles to be fired; the Exec officer
wants to wait until they can read the rest of the message.  What if the
message read "Have the missiles taken off the ready.  There is no
longer a crisis"?
     Mutiny, encounter with a Russian sub that is firing at them while
both subs spot each other under the water, and the radio out of
commission, all make for a thrilling film.  If it were not that in 1981
I had seen another submarine film, the German DAS BOOT (which was many
times better), I would give CRIMSON TIDE a higher rating.  In addition,
some of the CRIMSON TIDE's crucial endings are predictable.
     My suggestion then is to see CRIMSON TIDE but be sure to get a
video of DAS BOOT (The Boat), preferably in German with English
subtitles.
Others in the cast include Matt Craven, George Dzundza, Viggo
Mortensen, James Gandolfini and others.

Title
Review for Death and the Maiden (1994)
     There are three main characters in this extraordinary film that is
based on the play by Ariel Dorfman.  Far more important than the story
that unfolds is a universal theme that the film explores so very well.
     Unlike most films where bits and pieces that take place in one
location are shot and later spliced to make the movie flow, Roman
Polanski opted to film DEATH AND THE MAIDEN chronologically.   Taking
advantage of the fact that most of the movie takes place in one room,
Polanski shot the film as the story would have really unfolded.
     "Somewhere" in Latin America, at a lonely beach house, the
gripping adventure begins on a stormy, dark night.  Paulina Escobar
(Sigorney Weaver), is at home when her husband, Gerardo (Stuart
Wilson) is dropped off at their home.   With them is a stranger, a
Dr. Roberto Miranda, who has given her husband a lift when Gerardo's
car broke down.  He is invited into their home, thanked and given a
drink to help him warm himself and dry up.
     This unspecified Latin American country, long a dictatorship, had
just recently been overthrown.  Paulina's husband, an attorney, has
been appointed to head a commission to find those who had worked on
death squads for the dictatorship, and now to bring them to justice.
As Dr. Miranda is exchanging small talk with the host and hostess,
Paulina suddenly becomes aware that the doctor is the one who 15 years
ago had raped her in jail, had applied live electrodes to various
sensitive parts of her body as well as to other women prisoners.
     Paulina gets Gerardo aside and tells him who Dr. Miranda is.  He
tells her it happened fifteen years ago and she cannot be sure.  As the
one appointed by the new government to find the culprits, he certainly
does now want to engage in the same flimsy tactics the old regime used
to inflict on their prisoners.
     The cast is superb.  Wilson as the very reasonable lawyer-husband
who tries to reason but not help his wife without absolute proof; Ben
Kingsley as the apparently shocked and bewildered man now bound hand
and foot to a chair, is helpless.  He says that at the time of the
incidents described by Paulina, he was in Scotland studying at a
university and nowhere near Latin America.   Paulina, for her part, is
ready to shoot him.  She recognizes his features full well.  She
remembers the taste of the skin on his neck when she tried to bite him
off ... but she cannot at this point convince her husband to help
her.
     The film is a nail-biter.  The ending is even better.  You will
not want to miss this one. Polanski has proven once again, if proof
were needed,  that he can make a movie with the best of them.

Title
Review for Sling Blade (1996)
>From the opening scene in an asylum for the criminally insane to the
film's inevitable end, we are caught up in a marvelously
tense film that moves inexorably to its climax.  While the story is
grim but fascinating, the great performance of Billy Bob Thornton as
Karl Childers is worthy of Oscar nomination.
Karl Childers is slightly retarded, enough so that his slack-jawed
expression never changes. Before he speaks you can see the wheels in
his head turning and mulling over what he is about to say.  And when he
has spoken, his sentence is punctuated with a kind of grunt as if
getting the words out was difficult..  Add to his facial expression
that he walks with a slight forward stoop as his feet seem to pound the
very ground he walks on, and you have an unforgettable character and
one wonderful acting performance that is sustained throughout the
entire film.
Childers is in the asylum because he caught his mother and the town
bully nude in bed. Believing that what they were doing was wrong,
wrong, wrong, he kills them with a whack of his sling blade.  As the
film opens, he is sitting near a window with another inmate, Charles,
(J. T. Walsh) as Charles expounds on some of his deeds.  This is
greeted with utter silence by Childers.  Now it time for Childers to be
released from the asylum.  He has served his time of 25 years and is
now declared "cured" and must leave despite his not wanting to go into
the outside world.  But the law is the law and the law says he cannot
legally remain in the asylum.
The story now takes on new dimensions.  Karl is a talented mechanic
who, with the warden's help, gets a job.  Karl meets the youngster,
Frank, (Lucas Black) who befriends him; a first for Karl who is
accustomed to always being judged.  Frank talks his mother, Linda,
(Natalie Canerday) into letting Karl live with them but a problem
arises in the form of a frequently drunk and vicious boyfriend of
Linda's, Doyle (Dwight Yoakam).  Vaughan Cunningham (Jack Ritter) is
Linda's best friend, gay, who is attempting to live unobtrusively in
Bible Belt country; not easy, especially with the abusive Doyle around
to upbraid him for his homosexuality.
Karl witnesses everything that is happening in the house and one of his
fears is that the young Frank will be beaten by the drunken Doyle,
Without saying a word, Frank's thoughts are conveyed to us and we know
that things will shortly take a new turn.
Everyone in the film does more than justice to their role but Billy Bob
Thornton is phenomenal. Star of the film, writer and director,
Thornton has turned in a great film.  This should not be entirely
unexpected as, although this is his directorial debut in a full-length
film and the first film he has written by himself, he co-authored with
Tom Epperson the excellent A FAMILY THING.

Title
Review for Intimate Relations (1996)
No one could be more the model of a decent, upstanding wife and
mother than the fiftyish Marjorie Beasley (Julie Walters).   She,
her husband Stanley (Matthew Walker), and their 14-year-old daughter
Joyce (Laura Sadler)  live in a small town in England.    Who would
dream that hormones are raging uncontrollably in Marjorie's blood?
Her husband, a WWI veteran who lost his leg in the war, is treated
by Marjorie like so much dirt, to the point where she does not share
a bedroom with him.  Instead he has been relegated to a cubicle.
The bedroom now belongs to her and Joyce. In other times, Marjorie
would not have married Stanley but this was after the war when men
were in short supply.
Based on a real event that shocked the nation, (99% of the facts are
true according to the writer)  the film opens with Harold (Rupert
Graves) a young man with an unhappy childhood and  just out on
parole answering an ad for a lodger.  Once ensconced in his bedroom,
Harold quickly discovers what Marjorie meant when she advertised bed
and board.   Dressed in curlers and an old bathrobe she enters his
room and pleads for a little "cuddling.".  Surprised and reluctant
at first, he soon succumbs.  Harold had spent all of his young life
in institutions and lacks the will or ability to say "No."
Marjorie, in her perversity, and now having what she wants and
loving it,  gives him no rest.
The film turns even blacker as daughter Joyce (in a fine bit of
acting by Sadler)  joins in by demanding that she be allowed in bed
with Harold and Marjorie; permission is granted.   Even when husband
Stanley becomes aware, he is too browbeaten to make a fuss.   Thus,
behind the lace curtains that look out on the quiet street, some
weird antics are going on which can lead to no good; someone is going
to get badly hurt.
The very title speaks of euphemisms.   The newspaper articles on
which the story was based never used the word "sex."    The English
of that period used catch phrases; hence "intimate relations."

Title
Review for Family Thing, A (1996)
     It has been only two days since the Oscars were awarded and
already I am certain that the film I saw last night,  A FAMILY THING,
is going to be one of those nominated for the 1996 Oscar's Best
Picture, Best Actors and Best Supporting Actress.    This is a film
with an original story , written by Billy Bob Thornton and Tom
Epperson.   This one will get to you.
     Earl Pitcher, Jr. (Robert Duvall) who is in his sixties, lives in
a little town in Arkansas. Very soon after the film opens, his aged
mother dies.   Several days later he is given an envelope by a trusted
friend of the family who had been instructed by the dying woman to
give the envelope to Earl when she died.   Upon opening the envelope,
Earl is in for the shock of his life. He discovers that the woman he
thought was his mother and who had raised him was not his mother at
all.   Some sixty years ago, his father had "slept" with a young,
pretty, black woman and she became pregnant.  When the child was born,
it was white.   Earl's father's wife decided she would raise the
child.
     The letter speaks about a half-brother, gives his name , Ray
Murdock (James Earl Jones) but is vague as to his whereabouts
somewhere in Chicago.    Earl confronts his father, Earl Sr.. (James
Harrell) and  the guilty look is evidence that the story is true.
Earl sets out for Chicago to try to find the truth of what happened,
who his blood family really is.   Before the film ends he learns a lot
about  "life" and about blacks and mostly about himself.
     The film's direction is perfect with pathos and hilarity vying
with each other every moment. Beautiful support is given by Ray's
Auntie (Irma P Hall), a blind, old lady who does not give an inch as
she raises her nephew and his son, Virgil (Michael Beach) to be decent
human beings. No attempt is made to soften the "bad" sections of the
black area.  Everything about the film rings true.    You will be
talking about it long after you have left the theater.  Excellent.

Title
Review for Dead Presidents (1995)
     Although the movie's story is hardly new, it still is able to
create anger and arouse emotions.  It is about Vietnam  and it is about
the Black situation told with a straightforward inevitability.  We can
see it all coming.
     We have a Black family living in the Bronx, NY in 1968, with
father (James Pickens, Jr.) and mother (Jenifer Lewis), concerned
parents sitting around the kitchen table.  Anthony Curtis (Larenz
Tate), eighteen, is announcing that he will not go to college upon graduation
from high school.  His brother is an attorney.  Anthony says he is
joining the Marines along with his two best friends, Skip, (Chris
Tucker) and Jose (Freddy Rodriguez).  In addition to his family whom he
will be leaving, he also leaves his girl friend, Juanita, (Rose
Jackson).
     In the Marines, he and his friends are sent to Vietnam where they
find themselves placed on reconnaissance patrol, about as dangerous as
missions can get.  While the war pictures are like those we have seen
many times before in other films, it serves to remind us of what it was
like (as much as a movie can do) and also serves to show us how
heroically Anthony performs under fire.  A few months after his arrival
in Vietnam he learns that he has become a father; Juanita has given
birth to a baby girl.
     Fast forward to 1972 and Anthony, with sergeant stripes, returns
home only to find that not only is he not greeted as a hero, but he is
berated for having fought "the White man's war," and that he cannot
even get a job that will support his family.  Black revolutionaries
urge him to join with them but he does not see that as a solution.
     Juanita, meanwhile, keeps harassing him to do something to change
their financial situation.  In desperation, he and friends decide to do
a heist of an armored truck that picks up "dead presidents" at the Post
Office to take to Washington DC for burning.  For those (like me) to
whom the term is new, it refers to the pictures of Washington, Lincoln,
etc. on our paper money. Despite his upbringing he succumbs to the
temptation to turn his life around with this one robbery ... which
it does.
Directed by the fraternal twins, The Hughes Brothers, (Allen and Albert)
from some real life events.

Title
Review for Ghost and the Darkness, The (1996)
          Michael Douglas, who with Steven Reuther, is one of the
producers of the film, said: "It's an incredible thriller based on
events that actually took place.  It recounts the struggle of a man
attempting to control the environment and the dangers of a culture
trying to impose itself on another.  In many ways it is a reflection
of what is going on today."
          East Africa, about 1886.  The British are trying to build a
bridge to carry their rains.  The product they and other countries are
trying to get is ivory.  Putting a large crimp in their plans are two
seemingly uncanny lions who attack the workers wherever they may be
and despite the traps that are laid to catch them.  To the natives it
seems very strange that the lions seem to know the plans of those who
would kill them and they strike different areas.  This is why the
workers have dubbed the lions "The Ghost" and The Darkness."
          The film's best asset is that it sticks as much as possible
to what really happened back in 1886,  Knowing this is a true account
adds greatly to the enjoyment of the film as we watch bridge- builder
engineer John Patterson (Val Kilmer) and wild game hunter, Remington
(Michael Douglas) set out to kill the lions and get on with the job of
building the bridge.
          Here we have an exciting story with the kings of the animal
world vs. Man, set in Africa with one hair-raising scene after
another.  Nothing like those two eerie lions has happened before or
since according to writer William Goldman.   Samuel, (John Kani, who
is an actor, director and playwright) is the African contact who
assists  Patterson and Remington as they try to seek out the lions and
destroy them.
         The film is well-acted, the music (Jerry Goldsmith), is
excellent and the scenes of the wildlife of Africa are beautiful.

Title
Review for Jury Duty (1995)
     When Alexander Pope, way back in the early 18th Century, used the
expression "Hope springs eternal in the human breast" he may have had
in mind Pauly Shore.  Why anyone (in this case TriStar) would want to
make a film starring Mr. Shore is a mystery.  Of all the inane films I
see each year, Jury Duty ranks at the top.  I use the word "rank"
advisedly.
     The screenplay writers (Neil Tolkin, Barbara Williams and Samantha
Adams) attempt to show the craziness currently involved in the hysteria
of people who follow trials such as that of the O J Simpson, Heidi
Fleiss and the Menendez brothers.  It purports to show the media
madness as well.  Unfortunately the film misses its mark by a long
shot.
     Tommy (Pauly Short) is unemployed and unemployable when he
receives a notice to report for jury duty.  At the urging of his mother
(Shelley Winters in a cameo role) he accepts.  Before we know it he is
on the jury in a murder trial and is voted jury foreman.  Tommy, unlike
the other jurors, is sequestered in a very posh hotel which fact makes
him unwilling to have the trial end and have him sent back to his
poverty home.  So, despite eleven jurors favoring a verdict of "Guilty,"
Tommy refuses to go along; he is not going to give up his free soap and
hair shampoo that readily.
     There is more but I will forbear.  Let us just say that the
writers, the director (John Fortenberry) and sundry producers should be
arrested before being allowed to make another film.
     Abe Vigoda has the role of the judge.  Beautiful Tia Carrere is
one of the jurors.

Title
Review for Okno v Parizh (1994)
     This is a fairy tale that, despite moments of comedy, illustrates
the life in Russia now that the USSR is a thing of the past and
everyone is on his own.  The current Russia is compared with the
outside world ... and vice versa.
     In a no-frills apartment house in St. Petersburg an old woman has
recently died.  A young man who is a music teacher, Nikolai (Sergei
Dontsov), rents the room which is part of Gorokhov's (Victor Mikhailov)
apartment where he lives with his family.  One evening, after a night
of drinking, Nikolai and Gorokhov, in a "Through The Looking Glass"
scene, discover that behind a closet in Nikolai's room there is a
window which leads on to a roof.  Climbing down a fire escape ladder,
they head for the nearest bar to do more frolicking. Morning reveals to
them that they are in Paris.  The window that led to the roof, they
discover, leads to the rooftops of Paris.
     On the Parisian side, an almost similar situation is unraveling.
Here lives Nicole (Agnes Sorall) a taxidermist whose skylight faces the
same rooftops of St Petersburg.  Although Nikolai falls in love with
Nicole, the Russians are more in love with the merchandise they are now
able to get while Greed takes over.
     This could be the greatest deal if it were not that they discover
that the magic window closes every twenty years and that date is just
about to show up on the calendar.  What now?
     Director Turi Mamin takes careful aim at both sides of the newly
opened world as he shows what we already know: people are people and
that is where the world's trouble starts.  "Neighbor" means not only
someone who lives near you; it also means someone to whom you should be
kind and helpful.  Director Mamin leaves that small option up to you.

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
During the seven years the movie covers (1977-1984), Los Angeles was
a busy place: pornographic films, drugs and disco were the rage.  It
was during those same years that one film maker of porno films made
an attempt to legitimatize the genre and raise it to respectability.
Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds) is one such who gives it a try.   What
happens next is what this film is all about, the ups and downs of
all whom the pornographic industry touched.
BOOGIE NIGHTS, under the watchful eye of its 26-year old director,
contains frontal nudity; despite this, at no time is there a single
frame that can be thought of as erotic.  Quite a feat.
All the characters in that industry want to be loved.  All have an
astigmatic view of the genre and their part in it.  There is the
story's star who changes his acting name from a simple Eddie Adams
to Dirk Diggler (Mark Wahlberg), a name he feels is in keeping with
the kind of roles he plays, someone who can put on a simulated (and
not so simulated) act of making love any time he wishes.  He is
young and dashing and invincible, etc. etc. . . . or so he thinks.
Everyone loves him; he has more money than he ever dreamed existed
as well as women all around him.  What more could an innocent,
untalented, uneducated young man want?
As the industry grew, Jack Horner became a kind of father to everyone
around him.  At the same time he is well aware that Freud would have
had a ball with any of them; in some way they are all sick or
deficient but none can see it.   They think they are just as good
actors as in legitimate films.   In his role as the "father" and
film maker, Reynolds does a superb bit of underlaying.
Amber Waves (Julianne Moore) wants to be a star, to be adored and
never stops to consider what is necessary to give up in order to
achieve stardom in porno films.   Then there is Rollergirl (Heather
Graham) an innocent who all picture long moves on roller skates,
lacking the intelligence to see the idiocy of that.
There are many more characters in the film, each meticulously drawn
to show the era, the madness and finally the disillusionment.  Fine
acting helps make the film very real.  There is Don Cheadle who
keeps changing his wardrobe in attempts to find out who he is.  Little
Bill is played by William H Macy.
For one fleeting second during the period covered by the film, some
thought that the film industry and the public would finally realize
that porno films was a serious, real art form;  that never happened.

Title
Review for To Die for (1995)
     As Jimmy Durante used to say, "Everyone wants to get into the
act."  TO DIE FOR is the story of Suzanne Stone (Nicole Kidman) who
wanted the limelight so bad she let nothing stand in her way ... and
by nothing, we mean just that.
     Suzanne is married to Larry (Matt Dillon) and live in a small
town.  He is madly in love with her, as who would not be; she is
absolutely beautiful.  On the other hand, Suzanne's desire to be
"somebody" moves into an obsession and Larry has become an obstacle.
     Managing by coyness, aggressiveness, and her beauty, she talks a
local TV station into giving her a job as their weather-person.  From
there she embarks on the making of a documentary at a school where the
high school students hear her speak about the world of TV and the
opportunities available to anyone who wants to really go for it.  The
purpose of her talking to her students is in fact to select some losers
to do her a favor: get rid of her husband.
     I must say that I was surprised by Nicole Kidman.  That she was
pretty was obvious but in the film, when she turns on all her sexual
charms, she is stunning.  Her acting in the film is right on target.
That, in addition to the screenplay by the brilliant Buck Henry, make
for a very entertaining film.
     The students Suzanne inveigles into her scheme are played by
Joaquin Phoenix, Casey Affleck and Alison Folland.

Title
Review for Priest (1994)
     This is the film that is being bashed by the Catholic heirarchy
despite their not having seen it.  Boycott of advertisers, Miramax and
Disney have been declared.  For me, it was a fascinating film which I'd
like to recommend.
     Liverpool is one of the more difficult cities for the Church to
work in because of its impoverished parishes.  Father Ellerton (James
Ellis) has found it too much for him; Young Father Greg Pilkington
(Linus Roache) is sent to replace him.  Pilkington is a sincere,
devout, ethical Catholic.  Before long he is beset with problems he,
too, is unable to handle.
     For one thing, he is astonished and disturbed when he finds that
Father Matthew Thomas (Tom Wilkinson) has given up on his vows of
celibacy and is sharing the bed of his housekeeper, Maria (Cathy
Tyson).  In the confessional, where the priests are not permitted to
divulge what has been told to them by the "sinner," a fourteen-year-old
Lisa (Christine Tremarco) reveals she is being sexually abused by her
father.  How is Father Greg supposed do deal with that?
     Among the many other questions Father Greg must face is that of
homosexuality.
     PRIEST is a film about honesty and toleration of others' actions,
of compassion for those for whom desire outweighs the behavior the
Church would espouse.  Beautifully done.

Title
Review for Fresa y chocolate (1993)
     This is a beautiful film from Cuba, based on a short story by
Senel Paz, "The Wolf, the Forest, and The New Man."  What makes it so
wonderful is that it is a story of tolerance.  Some people like
Strawberry and others like Chocolate.  Whatever turns you on.
     There is David, (Vladimir Cruz) a political science student,
quiet, loyal to Cuba.  Then there is Diego (Jorge Perugorria) who is
just the opposite; very outgoing, friendly and, unlike the straight
David, he is gay.
     Nevertheless, the two become very good friends but when David
confides in his friend Miguel (Francisco Gatorno), another student,
that he is friends with a gay man, Miguel wants David to find signs of
subversion so that Diego will be imprisoned.
     Lastly, there is Diego's neighbor, Nancy (Mirta Ibarra), who is
busy finding a man for herself.
     One of the funniest scenes is after David loses his virginity to
Nancy, he has a perpetual grin.  He tells Diego, "There is nothing like
doing it with a woman."  Diego's response cracked me up!
     The film, a beauty, is a collaboration between the Cuban Institute
of Art and Film Industry, the Mexican National Film Office, Tabasco
Films, Telemadrid and S.G.A.E. and was filmed in Cuba, Mexico and
Spain.  Maybe this is an indication that the Cuban government is
becoming more tolerant of homosexuals.
Directed by Tomas Gutierrez Alea and Juan Carlos Tabio.
The film has won awards at the Berlin Film Festival and the
Latin American Film Festival in Havana.

Title
Review for Happy Gilmore (1996)
     It is quite possible I suppose that a golf enthusiast might find
Happy Gilmore (Adam Sandler) funny.  Not being a golfer, it seemed like
pure slapstick.  The big joke being that Happy is a hockey player of
sorts who discovers that with his hockey stick he can slam a golf ball
over 400 yards.  Golf is where the money is so Happy switches to golf
much to the horror of the sedate golfers he meets on the various
courses.
     Happy does a weird kind of approach from about 5 feet away from
the golf ball before he wiggles and takes a swipe at the ball.  The
camera immediately pans up into the sky as the ball disappears into the
wild blue yonder only to land a few feet from the cup.  Once in a while
he gets lucky and his 400+-footer gains him a hole in one.  On the
occasions when he gets only close to the cup, he can take 5 small puts
before he finally sinks the ball.
     Happy would have liked to be a pro-hockey player but he lacked one
essential: he could not ice skate.  Fortunately, skating is not a
requirement for golf.  Unfortunately, it takes more than the film's
story to make a good comedy.
     Others in the cast include Virgina Venit (Julie Bowen), the golf
tournament's PR person who is assigned to handle him.  Happy has a
one-handed coach (Carl Weathers) and a homeless man he engages as his
caddie.  And so on.

Title
Review for Star Kid (1997)
It was indeed with great expectation that I looked forward to seeing
this newest version of Dickens' classic story.    In the past there
have been several films that with varying success tried to capture
that great work.  52 years ago, with a great cast consisting in part
of John Mills, Alec Guiness, Valerie Hobson, and Jean Simmons, David
Lean directed perhaps the best of all..   In 1988, BBC did an
admirable TV version.  A year later, there was an excellent
mini-series made in Britain that starred Anthony Hopkins, Jean
Simmons, John Rhys-Davies, Ray McAnally,  and Kim Thompson, directed
by Kevin O'Connor.  Pretty much of a disaster was the 1983 animated
version directed by Jean Tych. ThE 1987 GREAT EXPECTATIONS ---THE
UNTOLD STORY was the worst of all.
 We come now to this new attempt..   Perhaps taking a cue from the
modern Romeo and Juliet of 2 years ago,  the well-known producer Art
Linson decided to make an updated GREAT EXPECTATIONS.  A big
mistake.    Too many changes had to be made in the plot so that it
no longer resembled the Dickens work. Despite that the credits list
"Based On The Charles Dickens classic" or words to that effect,.
Dickens would have been horrified with the result.
 Perhaps the only element common to both the book and the current
film scripted by Mitch Glazer,  is that both rely on the themes of
trying to obtain respect, the aspect of coincidence, and wanting
things one could not have.   While the Dickens story is very much
concerned with the conflict between the rich and the poor, the
commoner and the aristocracy, Glazer opted to delete that part
"because it didn't have to be about that at all."    Really?!?
As screenwriter Glazer did not want to do a literal remake of the
novel (Then why use the book's name?  Why say "based on the book by
Dickens?)  he even changed the names of all the characters except
for Estella.   One of the charms of reading  Dickens  is  the unique
names he gave his characters.  Glazer did not think "Magwitch" and
"Miss Haversham" were suitable names for this version.
 The story, you will recall, is of an 8-year-old, Finn Bell
becoming a man (Ethan Hawke), his life being changed by three
people.    They are convict Lustig (Robert De Niro) and Ms. Dinsmoor
(Anne Bancroft) and Estella (Gwyneth Paltrow.)
 When the young Finn (Jeremy James Kissner) meets the beautiful
Estella (Raquel Beaudene), they are both 10-years-old.   Ms.
Dinsmoor warns Finnegan that Estella will break his heart and even
if he is warned, he will pay no heed.  And that is what happens.
She runs off with someone else; he turns to painting and becomes
famous.   The film ends in a corny and unbelievable scene.
 De Niro is the one redeeming feature.  Others in the cast include
Hank Azaria, Chris Cooper, Josh Mostel, Kim Dickens.

Title
Review for Fast, Cheap & Out of Control (1997)
This documentary is unique in its presentation and, for that matter,
its subjects.   From the opening titles of circus and elephants and
wild animals the film has never a dull moment. Interspersed between
the interviews with the documentary's subjects are other scenes that
appear to have no bearing on what the persons on screen is saying
but it soon becomes apparent that these seemingly disparate scenes
are very relevant. Throughout the film there is excellent
complementing music by Caleb Sampson.
The subjects themselves, though quite varied, have one big thing in
common:  they are 100% engrossed in their activity, never worrying
about what anyone else will say or think.   Dave Hoover is a lion
tamer who believes he can understand what goes on in the minds of the
lions he tames.  This is the kind of thing Clyde Beatty propounded
when he was the most famous wild animal trainer in the 1930s.
Hoover not only wants to be "like" Beatty; he wants to "be" Beatty.
Rodney Brooks works at MIT where he is an expert on robots,
particularly those that perform like insects.   By the time he adds
"eyes" for the robot to sense what is before it; adds "arms" and
"hands" to reach out and grasp, the robots begin to look quite
human.  The uniqueness of these robots is that they move and
maneuver without human guidance.
There is George Mendonca who became a topiary gardener when he
started cutting privet and trees into animal shapes.    This became
his life's work.
Ray Mendez devotes his whole life to the study of mole-rats.  As a
child he belonged to an entomology club where members dreamed that
one day they would find a world where people live like insects . . .
whatever that means.   When mole-rats are threatened, they are
willing to let one of their group die if it will save the rest.
With that kind of behavior, what chance do humans have of ever
besting them; very little, it would appear.
Fascinatingly directed and edited, the thread that ties the segments
together is that all four are about animal life and the different
approaches each of the subjects took to fulfill a dream.

Title
Review for Mediterraneo (1991)
This is a most entertaining, charming anti-war film that willenchant
you with its simple story and its beautiful photography.
A decrepit Italian warship is sent for no apparent good reason (during
WWII) to an insignificant Greek Island to capture it.  When the ship
arrives with its crew of ordinary, unwarlike Italian young men, they
find the island deserted. . . or so they think.  When their one radio
gets broken, their only contact with Italy and the outside world, they
have no way of knowing or caring about what is happening elsewhere.
Happily, they have discovered the island does have inhabitants.  The
young men of the island have been removed some time ago by the
Germans.  Only the women and some old men remain.   From this simple
premise the director has made a most delightful film which without
being preachy demonstrates the folly of war.  A real winner.
The film stars Diego Abatantuono, Claudio Biagli, Giuseppi Cederna and
Claudio Bisio.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Is it really the critic's province to concern himself with how much it
cost to make a movie and/or what is the likelihood the film will turn
a profit.?  I am inclined to think not.  Let, in the instance of
TITANIC, 20th-Century Fox and Paramount worry about it.  It is not as
if they did not know of James Cameron's reputed perfectionism.  Before
he was tapped to direct, they knew that how the movie turns out is
Cameron's one and only concern.  Based on that, I would say they and
viewers got their money's worth.
>From the opening scenes of the round "submarines" (built in Russia and
manned by real-life Russians) as they entered the openings in the
ship's hull, the barnacles and eroded parts of the ship bringing the
disaster close, it was obvious that Cameron was giving us some
excellent special effects with the 90% to scale of the original
Titanic.  And later, when the ship goes down like a monstrous whale
diving beneath the surface, more magnificent footage.
What the explorers entering openings in the hull were seeking was the
safe which surely contained untold wealth as the ship's passengers (in
First Class) were in the multi-millionaire class.  To capture the safe
would be a treasure.  As it turned out, Brock Lovett (Bill Paxton) was
in for a great disappointment when the safe which was brought on deck
of the mother ship revealed nothing but soggy papers.  Not exactly,
though.  There was also a photo of a young woman, Rose (Kate Winslet)
wearing what looked like a valuable locket with a blue diamond When
the picture was shown on TV news, the real Rose, (Gloria Stuart) , now
101-years-old, came forth to say it was she in that picture taken a
long time ago, just before the Titanic, billed as "unsinkable," hit
the iceberg and sank in the icy waters of the Atlantic Ocean on April
15, 1912.
This is the thread on which the script hangs.  As the aged Rose starts
to describe the fanfare and excitement of the boarding of the ship and
what transpired until the disaster, director Cameron allows us to see
that about which she is talking.  It tells of how the young and
beautiful Rose met Jack, (Leonardo DiCaprio) a "nobody" with an
artist's soul and fell in love with him to the great dismay of her
social-climbing mother (Frances Fisher) who worries that Rose will
lose her very wealthy fianc, Cal Hockley (Billy Zane ).
Great effort went into the ship's interior with its dining room and
ballroom and the wealthy patrons on upper decks living it up as if in
a grand hotel.  Drinking and dancing away the days and nights, waited
on hand and foot by the stewards, oblivious to the disaster that lay
ahead.
When it became obvious that the ship was going to sink, it was the
first class "women and children" who were lowered into boats
. . . about which there were insufficient number . . .followed by the
men.  Those in steerage were not allowed into the boats until all the
first class passengers had been evacuated . . . if indeed there were
still boats left for them.
The film brings out that the ship was going at a faster than safe
speed because the Captain (Bernard Hill) was prevailed upon to set a
record.  It was J Bruce Ismay (Jonathan Hyde), a newspaperman who
urged "The maiden voyage of the Titanic must make headlines."  It sure
did!
One bit of carping.  The film implied that the two lookouts on the
forward deck were diverted by Jack and Rose kissing on the deck below.
Had they had there eyes searching the darkness ahead, perhaps they
would have seen the iceberg sooner and been able to alert the helmsman
to veer away.  After trying so hard for verite, Cameron should have
skipped that bit of make believe.
In any case, a most significant and entertaining film.
Others in the cast included Kathy Bates as "The Unsinkable Molly Brown." 

Title
Review for Rich Man's Wife, The (1996)
There has been very little worth seeing at the movies these
past couple of months.   Many of them look so much alike you would
have difficulty telling them apart.  I am talking about the gore, the
shooting, the psychos. . . the so-called "thriller."
In RICH MAN'S WIFE, Tony (Christopher McDonald) is "the rich
man."   Josie Potenza (the beautiful Halle Berry) is his wife whom he
neglects though it is hard to know why.   Instead he is deep into his
many business deals but finds time to be unfaithful.  When he gets
murdered, Josie is the natural suspect as she has the most to gain,
his wealth.  First she tells the police one story and then she
promises to tell the truth.  What are the cops to believe?
Josie turns to Jake (Clive Owen) for "comfort."  A bad move
as he is a friend of a psycho, Cole, (Peter Greene).  Cole wants not
only to have Josie but to also blackmail her.  Things get real
complicated but stay boring as the film has nothing new you have not
seen many times before.  Only the names are changed to protect the
innocent actors.
Halle Berry is beautiful and Peter Greene is slimy and
vicious.  It takes more than that to make a good movie.
Written and Directed by Amy Holden Jones

Title
Review for Nick of Time (1995)
     There are very few films that are shot in "real time," the term
meaning that if the action shown on-screen is supposed to occur over a
two-hour period, the film will be a two-hour film.  NICK OF TIME was
shot with that intent.  It is unlikely that the general audience will
be aware of it.  In any case, NICK OF TIME has little else to
distinguish it from the never-ending number of films that are turned
out each day.
     Like so many other action films, there is a certain amount of
suspense ... but not very much.  This one is about an ordinary man,
Gene Watson (Johnny Depp) who with his daughter, Lynn (Courtney Chase)
are kidnaped by a Mr. Smith (Christopher Walken) and Ms. Jones (Roma
Maffia).  Watson is told that his daughter will be held hostage in a
van until Watson shoots and murders the Governor, Eleanor Grant (Marsha
Mason) who will be appearing at a re-election rally that day.  Watson
gets the usual cautionary talk about "no tricks" or your daughter is
dead.  And that in essence is the movie's plot. We are indirectly asked
what we would do under such circumstances and with little time to come
up with a feasible plan to thwart the kidnapers.
     If anything saves the film from the rest of this year's action
films, all of which contain the good guys vs. the bad, it is that the
acting here is somewhat better than most films of that ilk.  Johnny
Depp and Christopher Walken are the principals involved in most of the
action.  An important role is played by Huey (Charles S. Dutton) as a
shoeshine man who aids Watson's try to thwart the villains.
     However, the rest of the cast, even those important to the story,
are on the screen only for very short times.  Marsha Mason, Brendan
Grant (as her husband) and even Roma Maffia are only in the film in
short takes, perhaps to keep the film in the "real time."

Title
Review for City of Industry (1997)
A favorite storyline for movies is the one about a criminal who wants
to go straight . . . but only after one more heist that will fix him
financially for life. Most recently there was ABSOLUTE POWER.
Fortunately for CITY OF INDUSTRY, it is a bit more believable. It also
has a powerful performance by veteran Harvey Keitel as  "Roy," the
elder brother of "Lee," (Timothy Hutton.)  The two help elevate what
would be pretty much an ordinary story and bring it up a notch or two.
Lee, as criminals are rated, is small potatoes, never having struck it
big in his chosen profession.  He wants to go straight, start life
anew.  But first he needs the one big one that can set him on "Easy
Street" for life.  For this he plots a Palm Springs jewelry store
robbery as his way out of crime and into "normal" life.
Lee induces his brother, Roy, who has been more successful in his
criminal life and has escaped into the unknown Midwest, to go along
with Roy on this last adventure.  Against his better judgment, he
agrees.  (I have seen enough movies to know he should have just said
"No.")  In addition to the two brothers, they need a good getaway
driver and they find him in Skip Kovich (Stephen Dorff).  Anyone else
would have noticed that Skip is touchy, spontaneous and not exactly
reliable but Lee never notices that; all he knows is he is a great
driver and Roy goes along with the choice even if he is not happy with
it..  Rounding out the crew is Jorge Montana (Wade Dominguez) who is
recently out of jail and could easily be back in if he is caught
violating his probation.  Jorge has a wife and children who worry
about him . . . with good reason.
Hardly does the film get rolling when brother Lee is killed.  That
caught me by surprise because stars such as Hutton are not usually
disposed of so early in a film.  However, that is the motivation for
brother Roy to seek out the someone who betrayed them . . . and Roy
wants revenge.  Hence this exciting film-noir.

Title
Review for Designated Mourner, The (1997)
To say that this film is not for everyone is an understatement.  If you
enjoyed MY DINNER WITH ANDRE, there is a good chance you may very well
like THE DESIGNATED MOURNER in which the main character, Jack (Mike
Nichols in an exceptional acting perfortmance in his first film),
almost immediately says "Christ, you know, I remember so clearly the
moment . . . when was that?  . . . years ago . . . when someone was
saying, 'If God didn't like assholes, he wouldn't have made so many of
them.'"
In 1996, the play on which the film is based, was first performed at
London's National Theater.  The play (and film) were written by Wallace
Shawn.  There is a total of three characters; they speak directly to
the audience except with very rare exceptions when they address each
other.
Jack is the main character.  There is his wife, Judy (a radiant Miranda
Richardson) and her father, Howard (David de Keyser).  These three, in
a sort of disjointed "stream of consciousness" tell us what they are
thinking about themselves and each other.  There is no indication of
what prompts each new declaration, an unburdening of one's life.
Jack's first words are:  The designated mourner.  I am the designated
mourner. I have to tell you that a very special little world has died,
and I am the designated mourner.  Oh, yes, you see, it's an important
custom in many groups and tribes. Someone is assigned to grieve, to
wail and light the public ritual fire.  Someone is assigned when there
is no one else.
This pretty much sets the tone of the film.
Jack complains about his father-in-law, a liberal, a literery snob and
poet.  Jack further complains that he (and others) have to pretend they
like poetry; that is one of the things that distinguishes the so-
called highbrow from the lowbrow.  Who is going to admit that he
really enjoys lowbrow entertainment?
Judy complains of Jack:, "The one thing he never would say  . . . the
word he couldn't stand: love.  I love you."
Howard did not like son-in-law Jack.  "Sometimes Howard would pick on
me to play the role of idiot---well, I guess he ALWAYS did--ha ha ha--
and that was really quite fun in a way. "  "And after the knife had
gone in, he would just continue."
Jack was always wondering what we were waiting for.  "The appearance of
the Messiah?  Was all this nothing?"  What is life?  His greatest
pleasure was "the sweet, ever-changing caress of an early evening."
Looking for something different?  Try THE DESIGNATED MOURNER.

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
 Despite the interesting, true stories of the exploits of the four
Newton Brothers with their career of robbing banks, the film never
gets any real excitement.  It comes across as a poor imitation of
Bonnie and Clyde.
 The Newton brothers, Willis, (Matthew McConaughey),  Jess (Ethan
Hawke), Dock (Vincent D'Onofrio), and Joe (Skeet Ulrich), whose
robberies spanned a period mostly from 1919 to 1924, during which
they robbed over 80 banks from Texas to Canada, never killed anyone.
That is unique, especially when it includes America's biggest train
robbery.
  The "Boys" considered themselves businessmen, not killers. Most
outlaws became notorious because of the number of killings in which
they took part . . . but not the Newton Boys.   Oddly, too, they all
lived to a ripe old age with one of them  appearing on the Johnny
Carson show to tell about some of the brothers' exploits.
 This should have made for an exciting thriller but unfortunately it
appears to be little more than a recounting of the facts, omitting
that certain something needed to get it off the ground.

Title
Review for English Patient, The (1996)
     An international group of archeologists is engaged in making maps
in the previously uncharted desert in Egypt.  The leader is Almasy
(Ralph Fiennes), a Hungarian, and his explorer partner, Peter Madox
(Julian Wadham.)  Also prominent is a  newly married English couple,
the Clintons.  Husband Geoffrey (Colin Firth) is interested in
aviation;  his wife Katharine (Kristin Scott Thomas) is an outspoken
fearless  woman, well educated as well as being a painter.
     Without having planned it, Almasy and Katharine suddenly fall in
love, hopelessly and erotically.  When World War II breaks out, this
international group of friends and co- workers find they are now also
nationalists; more so than friends.  Add to this that Geoffrey
discovers his wife is being unfaithful with Almasy,
     The movie moves back and forth in time.  Hana, a French-Canadian
nurse suddenly loses a close friend when that nurse steps on a land
mine.   Hana is filled with a feeling that  anyone she touches is
getting the kiss of death.  As the convoy of wounded moves along she
decides she will devote her life to a badly burned soldier, to make
what are surely his last days as comfortable as possible.  When the
convoy passes a bombed-out monastery, she has them unload the patient
(henceforth referred to as The English Patient as they do not know his
name) and has him taken to the monastery and settled into a bed she had
just cleaned..
     Here the film ask the viewer to make judgments.  The patient's
only possession is a Greek history book with some personal letters,
photos,  drawings and maps in the book.   Hana reads to him and what
she reads jogs his memory which we see in flashbacks that give the
viewer an idea of who The English Patient is (or may be) and what he
had experienced, including a plane crash that resulted in  burns over
all of his face and body.
    There is more.  There is Kim, (Naveen Andrews) young and handsome,
a Sikh bomb-defusing expert, There is Caravaggio (Willem Dafoe) who has
had his fingers cut off for refusing to give the Germans any
information.    All of these people and their stories are woven into
the film as each plays a role with the others in a tense, dramatic film
that will make you think long after you have left the theater.

Title
Review for Boot, Das (1981)
Ever wondered what it is like to be in a submarine during wartime?
This film brings it home like none other.
During World War II, only one out of 10 of the 40,000 German
submariners survived. The film shows the terror, the claustrophobia of
those in the submarines as the depth charges drop all around them.  It
also shows the sailors as young human beings, not as Nazis Storm
Troopers; young kids in a most miserable situation.
A tense, magnificent film, ranking with some of the best movies ever
made.
Available in dubbed English but try to get the German version with
English subtitles.

Title
Review for Boot, Das (1981)
This review is about the new (1997) Director's Cut but will of
necessity be mostly about the original film which we saw in 1982.
Originally, the 1982 film was shown on German TV in a six-hour
mini-series.  It was then released in about a 2-hour version and
arrived in the United States . . . but not without a lot of trepidation
on the part of director and producers.  Here was a film with German
subtitles. Subtitles take a beating with the U.S. public.  Even more
worrisome the film was about German submariners, the enemy that
torpedoed many an Allied ship and convoy.  How would that be received?
It turned out to be THE all-time biggest box office hit of any foreign
language film.
To those of us who saw the original, that was not a surprise.  I cannot
recall a more intense film ever among the thousands of films I have
attended.  The acting was superb, the claustrophobia was palpable, the
fear that these young, mostly 17 to 18-year-old sailors would drown was
immense.  Who would have expected that any film could make us root for
the survival of German submariners on a mission to blow up Allied
ships?  That is proof of the strength of this most powerfully emotional
film.
It is 1941 when the Allies have finally gotten the upper hand in the
air and in reversing the havoc their ships had experienced until now.
Germany now had few planes, and few ships.  In a bar in port, there
are many sailors enjoying their last night before sailing.  Everything
goes.  Drunkenness and women.  Tomorrow, who knows?
A Captain of a sub enters, almost dead drunk.  He makes a speech and
toast to "our wonderful Fuehrer who knows everything including all
about submarines."  This is obviously sarcasm.  In the film, there is
only one officer who is political and believes that Hitler is right.
The rest are there because they were drafted.  They want to do their
tours of duty and then get back home to their loved ones.
The film is about the submarine U-96, its Captain (played heroically by
Jyrgen Prochnow), and his crew.  They are on a mission to sink British
ships but the Captain knows that the British destroyers are now
equipped with Sonar devices that can locate with deadly accuracy the
whereabouts of submarines and when they drop their depth charges, they
know how deep they must go before exploding and destroying the subs.
Almost everything that can happen to a submarine takes place on this
one and it is nail-biting time almost from the start until its
surprising finish.
Which brings us back to the Director's Cut.  The film has had better
sound added (digital) and extra footage. This additional footage
lingers more on the sailors and tries to show more of what they are
experiencing.  There is no question that the new sound and footage are
beneficial, although the original was itself sheer perfection.
Now then, the down side.  The original DAS BOOT kept us in a sweat
precisely because we did not know what was going to happen next.  Could
the bolts that were popping from the severe pressure be replaced so the
water could be stopped from drowning the ship and crew?  Could the
ship be raised when it dives way down to avoid the depth charges?  How
will they make out when the ship is ordered to pass thru the narrow
Straits of Gibraltar where there are hundreds of Allied ships on the
lookout?
That is what gets lost in this new version if you have seen the
original.  If you have, you know what happens next, you know how the
film ends, so I would question if there is a real value in seeing the
3-hour-plus Director's Cut.  If, of course, you have NOT seen the
original, you had better get to this one; a most marvelous, exciting
film, ranking with THE most anti-war films ever made.
The cast of supporting actors, all wonderful, consists among others, of
Herbert Grshemeyer, Klaus Wennemann.

Title
Review for Ochi chyornye (1987)
        A brilliant, wonderfully enjoyable romantic comedy, DARK EYES
is a beautifully photographed, absolutely riveting film.
        Several of Anton Chekov's short stories form the basis for this
charming film about Romano Patroni (Marcello Mastroianni) who relates a
love story to a Russian passenger on the same cruise Romani is taking
and who listens with rapt attention to Romano's story.
        Romano, who is really an odd silly sort, relates in a series of
flashbacks, that he had left his wealthy wife and beautiful home to
visit a spa.  There he fell in love with a Russian woman who has been
having marital problems and he follows her to Russia.  His astonished
listener hears how Romano then returned to Italy, intending to divorce
his wife and marry his Russian love.
        Directed in a joint venture of The Soviet Union and Italy.
The stories are blended into a single simple sad yet humorous story.
There are scenes of comic invention intermingled with sadness, beauty,
and infidelity.  There is even a plug for our planet's health from a
local Russian veterinarian who is against the building of a factory
because it will mean cutting down the forest, polluting the waters.
"You just don't live in your own home," he says, "your home is part of
the countryside which is part of the rest of the world."
       Directed by Nikita Mikhalkov who is also the man
behind CLOSE TO EDEN and BURNT BY THE SUN.

Title
Review for Big Night (1996)
     BIG NIGHT comes across as if it were a foreign film with all the
delightful nuances we frequently find in films made outside our
country, in this case, Italy.  This has all the delicious pathos
without overwhelming us with undue sadness.  One leaves the theater
knowing one has seen a wonderful film.
     And what is its story?  Nothing big.  No one is shot.  Just the
story of the American Dream and of two brothers who dare to believe in
it.  Primo (Tony Shalhoub) is the chef at the Paradiso restaurant
which he and his younger brother, Secundo, (Stanley Tucci) own.
Secundo manages the restaurant but unfortunately it is not doing well
despite Priimo's dedication to preparing the best meals in a small
town in New Jersey.  Their customers are spaghetti and meatball
eaters; what do they know of fine, delicate food?
     Just across the street is a popular Italian restaurant, Pascal's,
which is always crowded despite the fact that prices are high and the
food does not begin to compare with that found at the Paradiso.
Pascal's is owned by the prosperous  Pascal himself (Ian Holm).
Secundo knows the secret to success:  give the public what it want,
not what you would like them to want but  Primo cannot lower himself
to do that.
     But one wonderful night they are told by Pascal that Louis Prima
will be at their restaurant.  That is just what the Paradiso needs, to
have a big name enjoy his food at their restaurant.  In a last
desperate effort to save their business they put everything they have
into making that night a BIG NIGHT, the best and biggest they have
ever attempted.
     While the food and the restaurant are ostensibly what the film is
about, like BABETTE'S FEAST, it is about something quite different.
Love.  Family. Truth.
     Minnie Driver is Secundo's lovely girlfriend.  Cristiano, the
chef's assistant is played by Marc Anthony.   Primo's heartthrob is
played by Allison Janney. The always lovely Isabella Rosselini is
Gabriella on whom Primo and Secundo have a crush. . . as who would
not?
     The son of George C Scott and Colleen Dewhurst, Campbell Scott
directs his first film.  He previously had been acting in several
films and has a small role here. Don't miss this tasty morsel of a
film.

Title
Review for Madame Butterfly (1995)
Puccini's opera has never had a more beautiful, more loving, more
touching production than Martin Scorsese's presentation, directed by
Frederic Mitterand.
It is the late 1800s when the tall, handsome American, Captain
Pinkerton (Richard Troxell), arrives in Japan on the warship, the
Abraham Lincoln.   He rents a house in Nagasaki for 999 years as it
cannot be sold.  However, as he remarks to the American consul,
Sharpless (Richard Cowan), the lease can be broken at any time.    This
comes to mind when Goro (Jing-Ma Fan), a matchmaker, arranges a
marriage between Cio-Cio-San and Pinkerton.   Apparently, marriages can
as easily be broken.    In the end we see that Pinkerton thought of his
lovely bride as if she were a delightful toy.
The lovely Chinese actress-singer, Ying Huang, brings to the screen all
the hope and heartache that is experienced by Cio-Cio-San,   Ying's
every emotion, every smile, every movement of her face signals her
feelings.  It is we, the audience, who are so moved because we know
that she will be enduring great disappointment as her hopes are dashed
when Pinkerton, after 3 years back in the States, returns to Japan with
his American wife . . . while I had all I could do to gulp and keep
back my tears even though I have heard the opera many times.
This Madame Butterfly is a great movie.  Every character, including the
maid, Suzuki (Ning Liang), is perfect.  All are known in the world of
opera for their fine voices.  Unlike in most operas I have seen on the
stage, these singers can also act up a storm . . . and they do.
Ying Huand is a graduate of the Shanghai Conservatory of Music and has
performed in many cities of the world.  Richard Troxell, too, is world
renowned, as are Ning Liang and Richard Cowan.

Title
Review for Dolores Claiborne (1995)
     Looking for a suspenseful thriller with psychological overtones?
You will find it all here in this adaptation from a Stephen King
best-selling novel.  Screenwriter Tony Gilroy took Dolores Claiborne's
long monologue in the book and changed it for the film by replacing
some of it with an adult character only referred to in the book, the
daughter, Selena St. George (Jennifer Jason Leigh).
     Dolores Claiborne (Kathy Bates) has been charged with the murder
of a rich society matron, Vera Donovan, (Judy Parfitt) for whom she
worked and, as everyone knew, she hated.  Detective John Mackey
(Christopher Plummer) is determined to get a guilty verdict against
Mrs, Claiborne who once before was accused of murder.  That time it was
her abusive husband (David Strathairn) but she got off "not guilty"
that time.  Now, Mackey thinks he has several sure-fire motives for the
killing of Mrs. Donovan and he will nail her.  There is, however, much
more Mackey (and the audience) cannot guess while the film moves back
and forth, revealing hidden events.
     Kathy Bates turns in a first class performance.  No surprise there
although she has to age some twenty years during the film.  Jennifer
Jason Leigh, as the daughter who has been estranged from her mother
since the father's death, is induced to come home and face her own
hidden past.  Ms. Leigh, with no surprise here, either, is also
excellent.  Between Bates and Leigh, the film brings real life to the
tragedy and mystery.  Both should be Oscar contenders.

Title
Review for Gridlock'd (1997)
You could have fooled me.  Not being a fan of either most rock or rap
music, I was bowled over by the tragi-comedy that is GRIDLOCK'd.  I
laughed at the absurdities I heard coming from Spoon (Tupac Shakur) and
Stretch (Tim Roth).    They were saying very funny things but all
contained more than just a bit of the truth. "Life,"  sang Cookie
(ThandieNewton) "is a traffic jam, " and it certainly held true for
those three members of a nightclub band.
The first time I saw Thandie Newton was in the beautiful 1992
Australian coming-of-age film, FLIRTING, where she was a lovely
teenaged innocent in love with a white boy.    Adorable.  Here, in
GRIDLOCK'd, she is a spaced-out junkie. Thandie is utterly believable.
Tim Roth is a fine, versatile actor, his latest film being Woody
Allen's EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU.   In GRIDLOCK'd, he has a
terrifically funny scene with a couple of policemen whom he latches
onto because there are a couple of drug dealers who are nearby and who
would like to kill him.  "How do you become a policeman?" his
spaced-out character asks one of the baffled cops.  "I've always wanted
to be a policeman," he says with his stupid grin.
Sadly, Tupac Shakur was only 25 when he was killed only a few months
ago.  Watching his antiocs on the screen, seeing the goodness in the
man come through, one could not help but see the irony in his death.
In this film, he is the more sensible of the Stretch-Spoon duo, always
rescuing his friend from the predicaments he keeps getting into. Their
color-blind friendship flows so naturally.
The story that carries the film is about trying to get into a hospital
when you do not have insurance; the bureaucracy, the indifference of
the employees to the plight of those who must come to them for help.
And all of it presented in a hilalrious, witty series of exchanges.
Hey, If *I* liked this film, you are going to love it!
Directed with a sure hand by Vondie Curtis Hall.

Title
Review for Twelfth Night: Or What You Will (1996)
     The use of twins as a tool for a plot in farce or semi-farce is
not new.  It goes back before Shakespeare who some 400 years ago
employed it in the most popular of his works, TWELFTH NIGHT.   While
this is a comedy, like all good comedies there is a lot of truth in
it.  In this case Shakespeare examined the man that is in most women
and the woman who is in most men.
     And here is how he did it:  Look-alike twins Viola (Imogen
Stubbs) and her brother Sebastian (Steven Mackintosh)  are separated
when a ship on which they are cruising is wrecked off the coast of the
imaginary country of Ilyria.  Coming ashore, Viola is convinced that
her brother must have drowned.
     Viola discovers that she is near the home of a young countess,
Olivia, (Helena Bonham Carter) who has sworn not to have anything to
do with men for seven years because both her father and brother
recently died.   Duke Orsino (Toby Stephens) is in love with her but
she rejects any of his advances.
     Alone and unknown in this new country of Ilyria, Viola changes
her name to Cesario when she decides her safety lies in disguising
herself as a boy, which consists not only in wearing a fake mustache
but in learning how to ride a horse, fence, smoke and play billiards.
The truth is her disguise would not have fooled anyone except in a
comedy where it is OK to suspend reality.  "He" then gets himself a
job with the Duke Orsino where his first assignment is to woo the
countess on Orsino's behalf. . . but Olivia gets a bit of a crush, to
her surprise, on the slender boyish-looking Cesario, as Viola falls
for Orsino . . . while the plot thickens.
     Let us not forget that twin Sebastian is not dead and shows up
one fine day to further complicate that triangle of Cesario, Countess
Olivia and Duke Orsino.  All this time, the Countess' household is
having its own love battles as Malvolio (Nigel Hawthorne, whom you will
remember as the king in THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE) and, others are
involved in their own chicanery.   Throughout all of this, there is a
strolling minstrel, Feste, played to perfection by the amazing Ben
Kingsley who has enthralled us ever since he hit the screens as GHANDI
way back in 1982 when he won an Oscar for Best Performing Actor, as
well as everything else he has been in since.   This performance
should get him a Best Supporting nomination.     This being a comedy
we must expect that all's well that ends well.

Title
Review for Chacun cherche son chat (1996)
Paris. The present. Chloe, (Garance Clavel), a young woman, is fed up
with her life which seems to be at a standstill.   She lives with a
jet-black cat she calls Gris-Gris, even if it does mean "grey-grey",
and with Michel (Olivier Py) who is gay.  To get away from it all, she
takes off on a vacation by the sea but not before insuring someone
reliable will take care of her cat.   She finds her in the person of
Mme. Renee (Renee Le Calm) who is a bit batty and who has many of her
own cats.
While ostensibly about a lost cat, that thread is only to tell the
story of an ever- changing Paris, here personified in Chloe and the
many people with whom she comes in contact when on her return from her
vacation she learns that Gris-Gris has disappeared . . . wandered
off.   Mme. Renee has called on everyone she knows to help in the
search.    One of the volunteers in the search is a young Arab, Djamel
(Zinedine Soualem) who has a somewhat diminished I.Q. but makes up for
it in his crush on Chloe and devotion to the search.
Everyone joins in the hunt:   Mme. Renee's elderly friends; a
long-haired drummer, (Romain Duris) who seems to oddly show up wherever
Chloe just happens to be;  and Carlos, (Simon Abkarian) the
neighborhood know-it-all.
Just as Paris is changing, adapting to the new ethnic groups now found
in every country,  trying to deal with the new youth and their
lifestyles as well as the elderly who still reside where they always
have. . . .  so, too, is Chloe adapting and finding out about her life
and which way she ought to go and how to deal with her loneliness.
The film moves quickly with no wasted effort, much of it in an
improvisational manner by the writer/director.  Although actress
Garance Clavel  has had little film experience she was chosen for the
role because she exuded both fragility and the toughness necessary to
survive.    Renee Le Calm plays herself as do those in  some of the
smaller roles for which the director chose non-actors.   All in all an
enjoyable film.
Written and Directed by Cedric Klapisch

Title
Review for Antonia (1995)
     Filled with almost a dozen of the most fascinating characters who
comprise the story of this utterly intriguing film, Antonia's Line does
not waste a moment as it moves from its beginning to its conclusion
when Antonia (Willeke Van Ammelrooy) dies.  The story, in parts, is
narrated by Sarah, (Thyrza Ravesteijn ). Antonia's great-granddaughter
who, with family and friends stand around 88-year- old Antonia's bed as
the old woman says that today is her last day of life.  Before she
dies, she reflects in her mind's eye on her long and full life and,
through one long flashback, we see that life and the people whom she
encountered on the way to this fateful final day.
     All of these people have experienced their own lives, most of them
filled with excitement, passion, hard work.  Here we have one
beautiful fairy tale.  There is Antonia's longtime friend known as
"Crooked Finger " (Mil Seghers) . . . and Olga, the Russian (Fran
Waller Zeper) whose three jobs consist of cafe-owner, undertaker and
midwife.  There is Farmer Daan, (Jakob Beks), the chauvinist landowner
who believes women have no other purpose in life than to breed.  He
has a retarded daughter, DeeDee (Marina De Graaf).  The town has other
retarded inhabitants such as Loony Lips (Jan Steen). and poor Mad
Madonna (Catherine Ten Bruggencate) who, because she cannot marry the
love of her life (Paul Kooij) as he is a Protestant, howls at the moon
at night.  The Village Priest (Leo Hogenboom) is fire and brimstone
but has his own fire burning within him  And there is Bas (Jan 
Decleir),
a farmer who despite having lived in the town for 20 years is still
considered a "newcomer."
     Marleen Gorris, who wrote and directed the film, maneuvers the
film's characters like a virtuoso juggler, never for a moment missing a
beat.  Not to be missed.

Title
Review for Wagons East (1994)
     Too bad that John Candy's last film should be such a poor,
one-joke movie.   All the Westerns are about the trek West, the
hardships, the Indians, the U. S. Cavalry, the circling of wagons when
attacked.  Here, they form a square.  This one is just the opposite.
Even the exclamation point in the title will not help create any
excitement or laughter.
     When the people of Prosperity have had it up to here with boredom,
primitive living and the dangers of the West, they think the
unthinkable: What are we doing here?  Let's head back East.
     James Harlow (John Candy) is the inept wagon master who will lead
the wagons that want to return East.  The first joke is that when he
gives the signals for the wagons to start moving and he shouts
"Eastward, Ho!" he leads in the wrong direction, West, where they are
captured by Indians.  That's typical of the inane humor.
     On paper it may have seemed like a good idea: The Indians will
help them get out of the usurped territory, the Cavalry and the land
barons are the bad guys.   The wealthy landowners have invested lots of
money and if a trend were started to go back East, it would ruin them.
The Eastward-heading wagon trains must be stopped.  But the movie from
its very beginning is unfunny and hackneyed.
     Also in the cast are Richard Lewis as a surgeon, his wife Melinda
Culea, Ricardo Picardo as a banker, and Ellen Greene, a working girl
... all tired with the West and ready to return to civilization.

Title
Review for Mallrats (1995)
     With a name like MALLRATS what kind of a dumb movie would you
expect?  That's what I thought, too, until I noted it was written and
directed by Kevin Smith who did the delightfully offbeat CLERKS, and
that while CLERKS was made on that proverbial shoestring, this one had
some money to back it.  It was worth every cent.
     Like the wacky CLERKS, MALLRATS is way out.  It is also full of
surprises that are as raunchy, to use a mild term, as anything you have
ever seen.  Somehow, none of it can be characterized as "porno."    As
an example, one of the young men puts his own feces on his hand, talks
his girlfriend's father (Michael Rooker) into eating it by telling him
its his favorite chocolate-covered cookie, and then shaking hands with
him so that the remainder will stink for days on his hand.   While one
weird occurrence follows another at a rapid pace, the feces one is the
most outrageous (but among the most hilarious). Director Kevin wanted
to go all out and he did.
     The film takes place in a mall where 2 young men who have lost
their girlfriends (little wonder) spend the entire movie trying to win
them back.  On the way they visit a nude psychic (from the waist up)
who, to their surprise, has three nipples.  And on and on as the action
becomes fast and furious but remaining funny.
     Smith reprises his role of Silent Bob (in Clerks).  Others in the
cast are Brandi (Claire Forlani), Ivannah, the psychic (Priscilla
Barnes), a host (Art James) at a game show at the mall, Brian
O'Halloran (who was Dante in CLERKS) as well as Rene (Shannen Doherty)
among others.
     Teenagers will howl with delight but adults, too, should find it
very entertaining and ... different.  Leave the little ones at home.

Title
Review for Switchback (1997)
The script for SwitchBack was written when Jeb Stuart was in
college, long before he wrote DIEHARD and THE FUGITIVE.   There is
no question about his talent.  Still, the story for SwitchBack
reads like a million others, convoluted and unnecessarily
complicated.
Essentially, it is the story of a serial killer, Bob Goodall,
(Danny Glover) who is being tracked by an FBI man, Frank LaCrosse.
We are never told why Goodall is engaged in his killings, only that
he has killed some 16 people.   Not only has he thrown the police
off his track, he has managed to make them look for someone else.
However, he has not fooled LaCrosse.   When Goodall becomes aware
of that, he kidnaps Lacrosse's  seven-year-old son in the hope that
the father will lay off.  On the contrary, this incites the father
to double his efforts.
Early in the film, Goodall meets up and saves the life of Jared
Leto (Lane Dixon) a medical student dropout who has become a
drifter.  For the rest of the film they hang out together.   The
other interesting character is that of Sheriff Olmstead (R Lee
Ermey) who originally is antagonistic to the FBI stepping in on his
case but eventually becomes an ally.
What value the film has is almost entirely in the spectacularly
beautiful photography of the snow-covered Rocky Mountains with the
train snaking through. That is the magnificent work of Oliver Wood.
In addition, there are some hair-raising fights with both Goodall
and LaCrosse battling it out on some kind of snowplow that swings
perpendicularly away from the train.  Still, the film does not lend
itself to any great acting and so everyone is quite adequate
without particularly having to shine..

Title
Review for Village of the Damned (1995)
     There have been several movie versions of John Wyndham's stories,
none of which I have seen.  Director John Carpenter thought the film's
story would be improved if it were made more current. I don't much like
the genre of spooky films but I must say this one has a somewhat better
twist than most of that type.
     There's a little town of Midwich where nothing exciting ever
happens.  Every now and then a cloud, accompanied by ominous sounds,
passes over the town, and strange thing begin to happens.  Dr. Chaffee
(Christopher Reeve) finds he is being besieged by an inordinate number
of women who have become pregnant. He then becomes aware that the
conceptions took place on the same day, the day of a school outing ...
and that the cloud had passed over the town.
     Suspicious that something odd is going on, Dr. Chaffee calls on
the Federal Government to send someone to investigate this new
phenomenon.  The epidemiologist they send is Dr Susan Verner (Kristie
Alley) who, by the way, is a chain smoker.  Has no one told her about
the dangers of smoking?
     Of the ten children who are born, nine survive, apparently
healthy.  They all look very much alike with piercing eyes and whitish
blond hair which gives rise to the reasonable assumption that they were
all sired by the same "father."  As the boys and girls grow, they
begin to display weird, un-childlike behavior.  If they focus their
eyes on you (in a strange color), you will be involved in a fatal
accident very shortly.  Everyone soon realizes that these kids are not
to be antagonized or thwarted.
     That's pretty much the basis for the film.  What the children do,
what Dr. Chaffee and Dr. Vermeer do to try to stop what is happening is
what makes up the film.  Incidentally, there have, according to Dr.
Vermeer, been similar incidents recently in other parts of the world.
OoooooHHHHHooooo!.
     Others in the cast include Linda Koslowski, Michael Pare, Mark
Hamill and Karen Kahn, among others.

Title
Review for Hoop Dreams (1994)
     Most of the movie-going public shies away from seeing
documentaries ... and almost three hours?   They want nice,
fictionalized stories.  Those are going to miss out if they do not go
see the very exciting, thrilling, at times heartbreaking, story of two
real inner-city Chicago junior high school athletes whose dream was to
make it one day into the NBA.
     What makes the film so wonderful is that three filmmakers, Steve
James, Frederick Marx and Peter Gilbert, followed and filmed the two
young men, William Gates and Arthur Agee, for almost five years.  While
ostensibly about basketball ... and there is lots of footage showing
practice and games ... the story is really of the hope that motivated
William and Arthur, and about their fathers and mothers and what
happened to each during all the years it took to make the movie.
     More gripping than the basketball scenes are the relations with
the coaches, (one of whom is suing for having been pictured as a kind
of monster), and the personal lives of the young men and their
families.  Fortunately for the filmmakers, if not for the people in
the movie, much takes place that they could not have foreseen but which
enhanced the film with even more drama.
     This is one documentary you do not want to miss even if you do not
know a basketball from a ping-pong ball.

Title
Review for Timecop (1994)
     In the world of Science Fiction. it is "known" that you cannot
witness future events by going ahead in time.  However, it is also
"obvious" that you can go back and witness events that have happened in
the past.  And if you can do that, you can change an event so that what
follows will be changed, too.  If you go back and kill a grandparent of
someone you know in the present, that person will then not be born and
you have changed the course of events.  In that manner, traveling to
the past and altering events would allow for a new kind of criminal.
     Max Walker (Jean-Claude Van Damme) is a timecop in the year 2004
who works for the Time Enforcement Commission that prohibits going back
which by that time had become a reality.  When Senator McComb (Ron
Silver) goes back in time to change events and become rich and enable
him to run for president in the present, It is Walker's mission to
prevent McComb from changing the past.  Going back in time with him is
Sarah Fielding (Gloria Reuben). who also works for the Time Enforcement
Commission.
     When Walker travels to the past, he meets Melissa (Mia Sara) who
in the present was his wife but who was murdered.  Now Walker realizes
he can change the events that led to her murder and they can thus live
happily ever after.  (Still with me?)
     As in all the action films, this one is filled with shootings and
gore.  The only difference is that it has time-travel as its gimmick.
No matter how you slice it, it is still an action film and it is still
Science Fiction.

Title
Review for Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle (1994)
     It was with great anticipation that I looked forward to the
screening of this film about the Algonquin Round Table of the 1920s
with its extraordinary group of wit and talent.   Who could forget
Robert Benchley, Harold Ross, Alexander Woollcott, Edna Ferber, Deems
Taylor, Will Rogers, Robert Sherwood, Heywood Broun, Neysa McMein,
George S. Kaufman, Marc Connelly, F. Scott Fitzgerald, Harpo Marx, FPA,
Donald Ogden Stewart ... and the many more who made that period a
memorable one?   Among the leaders of that superb pack was Dorothy
Parker herself who was (and is) probably quoted more often than anyone
but Shakespeare.
     Many of the actors looked like those they were portraying which
was fun to spot.  But even those, like Benchley (Campbell Scott) who,
tall and slender, did not resemble the more rotund Benchley, gave some
of the finest performances.
     Where the film loses out is that Jennifer Jason Leigh, playing
Dorothy, chose to use some weird accent so that aside from sounding
like the proverbial marbles in the mouth, the witty words she spoke
were often lost.   Having read Dorothy Parker's verse, stories and
one-liners for lo these many years, I was able to recall the punch
lines but I fear that most in the audience missed many of the gems.
     Mrs. Parker's life should have been the most glorious because she
was a unique and talented personality.  Instead, her private life was a
mess and this the film does explore to the end.  How sad that a woman
who wrote better than most of the men of that period (all famous), as
well as drink them under the table, should have been such an unhappy,
lonely soul.
     Whatever makes the film worth seeing is due to the many witticisms
that flew across the table, and the rest of the cast which includes
(among many, many others), Matthew Broderick, Sam Robards, Martha
Plimpton, Stephen Baldwin, Wallace Shawn, Keith Carradine, Nick
Cassavetes and Peter Benchley.

Title
Review for Cutthroat Island (1995)
        In the "good old days" we had Douglas Fairbanks, Jr. and
Senior and later Errol Flynn.  They did the swashbuckling, the
fencing, the leaping from balconies.  We are now in the mid-nineties
and Renny Harlin is directing CUTTHROAT ISLAND with his wife, Geena
Davis as the prancing, leaping, fencing lead in the film.  In
addition to the above, a new bit has been added which, to put it
politely could be called "kick them in groin."   And Geena does just
that at least 20 times, with her feet or with her knees and the men
fall like, well, flies.
        Geena is aided by Matthew Modine while Frank Langella plays
her uncle, the villain.  All in vain.  The story is as old as
movie making with a bit of RLS' Treasure Island thrown in.    There
is a map that tells of buried treasure but, sad to relate, Morgan
(Geena Davis) only has part of the map.   And, what's more, it's in
Latin.  Luckily, at a slave auction of prisoners, Morgan spots
William Shaw (Modine) handsome and educated, so she buys him.  That
is not all; his education includes the ability to read Latin.
        Dawg (Langella), with shaven head and constant snarl, has
the other part of the map, so we are in for some great battle
scenes as "hand to hand" the frigates fire cannon at each other
while everyone leaps and waves swords (and do not forget the
"kneeing".)  When the battle is over, Morgan has a slight smudge on
one cheek but her clothes look newly laundered.   And so on.
        I almost forgot to mention that this great story took 4
persons to write (Michael Frost Beckner & James Gorman and Bruce
A Evans & Raynold Gideon.)  Screenplay by Robert King and Marc Norman.

Title
Review for Carried Away (1996)
     It is a small town which a passerby, if he gave it any thought
at all, would imagine to be like the thousands of small farm towns
that dot our country.  For the most part it would be true. It is the
little things that make the difference between one place and another.
     There is  Rosealee (Amy Irving), a war widow and there is Joseph
Svenden(Dennis Hopper).  Joseph had been a good friend of Rosealee's
husband before the war.  Over the years since the war ended, Rosealee
and Joseph have struck up a close friendship that became more than
that, much like husband and wife without an actual marriage and each
having a separate home.  Rosealee has a teenaged son, Robert
(Christopher Pettiet) while Joseph has an aging, dying mother (Julie
Harris).  Hal Holbrook plays her doctor.
     Both Joseph and Rosealee teach at the small local school.  When
the county extends its jurisdiction to include the school it is found
that all these years Joseph had never had a license to teach. . . and
the school is closed down.
     Although both Rosealee and Joseph have had sexual relations these
many years, the passion for each other has diminished in time.
Nothing exciting happens until the arrival of a beautiful, blonde, 17
year-old student and her father.  Joseph cannot help his eyes from
following this new student, Catherine (Amy Locane).  When her father
asks if Catherine can board her horse at Joseph's stable, he readily
agrees.  One day when he is in the stable but does not see Catherine,
he climbs the ladder to the hay loft where she is lazily lying.
Almost before he knows it, despite his being in his late 40s and she a
mere 17, she strips and the movie takes a new turn. For one thing, Amy
Locane has a stunning body and it is exhibited for a good part of the
film. Frontal nudity by Amy Irving and Dennis Hopper, as well as Amy
Lucane, make this a most sensual film.  No point in pretending
otherwise.
     Once this new relationship becomes known to practically everyone
in the village, the fireworks begin and the film takes on a new
aspect.  What do each of the characters do in this situation?    What
does the film's title, "Carried Away" mean if not that you have but
one life to live and you had better live it now.?

Title
Review for Absolute Power (1997)
Given that the cast of ABSOLUTE POWER consists of some of our best
actors; and given that Clint Eastwood  turned out some fine films in
recent years, we have to wonder why this film is so bad.   Is Clint a
victim of the adage, "You can't win them all?"    Or is it the
improbable story of a President of The United States murdering a woman
with whom he is having a rendezvous and then having his aides involved
in a coverup? Whatever. The results are not good.
Luther Whitney (Clint Eastwood) is an expert thief, a master of
disguise (we are lead to believe. . . the disguises we see would not
fool a blind person)  who, after just getting out of prison wants to do
one final big job before retirement.   That seems like a rather stupid
reason to risk getting caught,  While in a mansion he has cased to rob,
he hears a noise and hides in a vault which just happens to have a
one-way mirror so he can see President Richmond (poor Gene Hackman is
hardly in the film)  perpetrate a murder. .  Talk about coincidence.
Once the murder is committed,  the Secret Service agent Tim Collin
(Dennis Haysbert) who is assigned to guard the President, has to
arrange getting the President out of the house and so on.  Another
agent (Scott Glenn) is also in on everything and even Gloria Russell
(Judy Davis), the President's Chief of Staff, has to save the day.
Davis has the one good role in the movie and, fine actress that she is,
she makes the most of it.
Others wasted in this nonsense are Ed Harris (a homicide detective), E.
G. Marshall (a millionaire wheeler and dealer who helped elect the
President) and Laura Linney who has the role of Luther Whitney's
daughter whom he has not seen in years . . . but that is another
story.   Ms. Linney looks very much like Helen Hunt, acts very much
like her, has her charm and even her hairdo.

Title
Review for Rough Magic (1995)
By far the poorest excuse for a movie.  ROUGH MAGIC is so bad it almost
defies description.  It would seem that the film was done without a
script and that whatever nonsense popped into the writers' and
director's heads, the camera was given the command to roll.  Nothing in
the film made any sense; it was an insult to one's intelligence.
Bridget Fonda is the female lead.  She was given the most insipid lines
to recite ("You brute!") and the most ridiculous things to do.
Someone (Paul Rodriguez) eats an egg and explodes, turning into a hot
dog.  A dog eats the hot dog.  Later, at a wedding, Rodriguez explodes
again and appears at the altar nude.  Tojola (Euva Anderson) keeps
asking Myra (Fonda) for $3.24 because she had gotten gas at her filling
station and drove away without paying and I cannot remember why nor do
I care.  But Tojola's moaning about the $3,24 even at the wedding . .
.
Also in the cast: Russell Crowe, Jim Broadhurst playing a drunk, and D
W Moffett.
According to the director, "ROUGH MAGIC is about a woman's literal and
spiritual journey toward the re-awakening of her own heart."  I saw
nothing that even vaguely resembled that.  Several people die but later
come to life.  Weird and baaaad.
Directed by Claire Peploe who I find it hard to believe directed the
very funny comedy, HIGH SEASON.  I find it difficult to reconcile that
the same person directed both films.

Title
Review for Pyromaniac's Love Story, A (1995)
     It is usually a dead give away that a film with a cutsey name is
going to be a dud.  Then I looked at the cast and was pleasantly
surprised to see it contained, not only William Baldwin, but several
great actors: Michael Lerner, Joan Plowright and Armin Mueller-Stahl.
It did not help.  The movie, despite being a kind of fairy tale, was a
bore and for the following reasons:
     1) It had one theme: when people are in love they will do
anything for their lover.  But you do not make every scene in the film
based on that one idea.  This film did just that over and over again.
     2)  It was silly, unexciting and predictable.  When Linzer's
(Armin Mueller-Stahl) Bakery burns, his pastry boy Sergio (John
Leguizamo) thinks his boss did it for the insurance. John loves Hattie
(Sadie Frost) and when the father of the arsonist offers John $25,000
to take the rap, he accepts because after a probable probation, he will
have enough money to marry and travel with Hattie.  Pretty dumb.
     3)  Every few minutes, someone else says "He (she) did not start
the fire; I did it."  Why are they saying it?  Because they love the
person who last confessed and is now in jail and they are willing to
sacrifice themselves.
     4)  Most of the famous actors mentioned above have smallish roles
in the film.
     The only good thing that can be said about the film is that nobody
is harmed ... except, of course, the audience who were enticed into
seeing the film by the "big names" in the cast.  In a word, "borrring."

Title
Review for Anastasia (1997)
There are a few small criticisms that come to mind as I watched
ANASTASIA.    Despite some wonderful animation, when Dimitri walks up
stairs, he seems to hop.   And when he goes down the steps, he seems
to stumble.    I could not understand that because the rest of the
animation, and in particular the ballroom scenes, were spectacularly
perfect.
The other thing one must wonder about is why this story of a Russian
Princess and the Russian Revolution is suitable for children, even
if it is in animation.   And is it something adults will want to
watch in as much as it is animated?   Why does the story imply that
the real Anastasia is returned to her grandmother when, in fact, no
one knows that, nor do we know if there is a real Anastasia who escaped
the execution of the royal family?  "And the greatest mystery of the
20th Century begins. . . "   To which I say, "THE greatest mystery?
Hardly."
Be that as it may, the animation is a delight to watch.   Rasputin
is suitably monstrous bringing to mind the devil in Fantasia's Night
on Bald mountain.   And, getting back to the animation, why is every
woman in animated films shown as wide-eyed beyond belief?  Such as
Jasmine in ALADDIN?  And Anastasia?
An all-star cast is used for the voices behind the characters:

Title
Review for Sunset Park (1996)
     This has been a bad week for basketball films.  A few days ago I
saw CELTIC PRIDE, which was quite bad (1 byte), and two days later
there's another silly one about a coach who knows nothing about
basketball.
     SUNSET PARK is a high school with a basketball team but no coach.
Just as happens frequently in our schools, a phys ed instructor will
be delegated to teach math if there is a need for a math teacher.
The new coach,  Phylllis  Saroka (Rhea Perlman, the little but feisty
waitress on TV's CHEERS)  is the teacher chosen to coach the team. Not
having the slightest idea about basketball, let alone coaching, she
gets a book to learn everything there is to know (it says here), The
Beginner's Book of Coaching Basketball.   That pretty much tells you
where this film is headed.   It also tells you that the players are
not going to pay any heed to their new, shorty of a coach., an ugh,
WOMAN.
     Of course, they have not reckoned with Phyllis'  character which
is to be the best in anything she does and  is determined to make this
team the best in the league.
     Aside from the unlikelihood of a pint-sized woman running a team,
the film has other faults.  For one thing, it does not look as if the
team's players are really playing basketball or are just actors going
through the motions which is how it appeared to me.
         Filled with honorable intentions, the film falls far short of
its goals.   Even Rhea Perlman, a fine performer on TV and the screen,
falls short.  The "plot" is too weak to be overcome by anyone.
Still, just for seeing Perlman do her stuff, the film may be worth
seeing.

Title
Review for Oleanna (1994)
     David Mamet, among the best of the current American playwrights,
has adapted his two-character play by writing the screenplay and
directing the film, a story of sexual harassment.  Mamet maintains
there are two sides to every story.
     His play was written and completed shortly before University of
Oklahoma law professor, Anita Hill, testified to a Congressional
committee that Supreme Court nominee, Clarence Thomas, allegedly
subjected her to inappropriate behavior; U.S. Navy Lt. Paula Coughlin
spilled her story to the Washington Post of sexual abuse in the
Tailhook scandal ... and, of course, the Bobbit story.
     Mamet, in OLEANNA, tackles the problem of PC and what is sexual
harassment, how easily an innocent person can become a victim.
     In this case it is Carol (Debra Eisenstadt), a young college
student who visits her professor, John, (William H Macy), at his office
to complain about the low grade he has given her.   She comes as a
supplicant while the professor tries to explain to her the reason for
the low grade.  She blames him; he is a poor teacher.  He wonders if
that could be true.  He offers to erase the grade and give her an A for
the term if she will visit him once a week to discuss the course.
     She turns this into a case of sexual harassment which was the last
thing the professor, a happily married man, was thinking of.  Before
the session is over she has accumulated a list of grievances
(harassments) which she will turn over to the tenure committee that is
considering giving him tenure.
     As in most cases in real life, there is no real solution and the
film is no exception.  But the tense, very dramatic and literate
exchanges that are found in plays written for the theater rather than
TV or movies, make Oleanna a definite must-see film.   In addition the
acting is absolutely perfect; both Eisenstadt and Macy deserve to be
nominated when Oscar time rolls around.

Title
Review for Sabrina (1995)
     Way back, in 1954, Billy Wilder directed the film of the same
name.  It starred William Holden as the man much-too-wealthy -for
his-own-good and Audrey Hepburn as the daughter of Holden's chauffeur.
In the cast, too, was Humphrey Bogart.  The question in my mind is, if
you have a great cast, turn out a very entertaining romantic comedy,
why attempt to "improve" on the original? Are there no more writers
left in the movie world?  Are the producers afraid to take chances,
preferring to go back some forty years to do a remake of a hit?
Sometimes it seems that only the names have been changed ... to protect
the innocent.
     This time around we have equally fine actors.  There's Harrison
Ford (the billionaire ... in 1954 probably only a millionaire) and the
lovely Julia Ormond as the chauffeur's daughter.  Others starring in
the cast include Nancy Marchand, Greg Kinnear and John Wood.  Special
mention should be made of Kinnear.  Music by John Williams, a most busy
man. Also in the cast are Angie Dickinson, and Richard Crenna.
     The dialogue is witty and the film entertaining but there is too
much of the feeling of "How many times have I seen a similar film
before?"  While it is not easy to sneeze at a billionaire's proposal,
(and I do not for one moment believe that the chauffeur's daughter is
that interested in the money,) nevertheless, it occurred to me that
Ford is getting just a teeny bit mature to get the role of the guy who
gets the girl.  Julia Ormond acquits herself well as the young woman
who eventually falls for Harrison.  And did she not used to climb onto
a tree limb and watch the fabulous parties the Harrison family was
giving?  Maybe it was money after all. Naaah.

Title
Review for Hour of the Pig, The (1993)
     Even before the opening titles and credits are completed we knew
we were in for something more ribald than even a Boccaccio would have
dared.  Based on documents and court records circa 1450, THE ADVOCATE
relates the story of a young, handsome, dashing lawyer, Richard
Courtois, (Colin Firth) who leaves Paris to travel the countryside and
help the people who lead more simple lives and whose problems are of a
different nature than those to which he has been accustomed.  How
different they are astonish not only him but will shock you as well.
     Superstition in the countryside is the norm.  Between the powerful
Roman Catholic Church and the feudal noblemen of the time, and the
simple-minded folklore of the citizenry, life here is far, far
different than in Paris.  When a band of Gypsies arrives from Africa
they are greeted with hostility and fear.  Among the new arrivals is
the smokily sultry Samira (Amina Annabi) with whom Courtois falls in
love.  When she runs afoul of the ludicrous laws of the town, it is he
who takes her case to fight the prosecutor, (Donald Pleasance) who, in
fact, is but a lackey of the local landowner, the Seigneur.
     In this strange setting is the beautiful Filette, (Lysette
Anthony) the not-right-in the head daughter of the Seigneur, the result
of years of in-breeding.  There is the priest, Albertus (Ian Holm),
who knows right from wrong, and befriends the Advocate ... but  is
careful not to overstep himself because he would lose his power over
his flock.  The Seigneur is played by Nicol Williamson with a nice
haughty manner as befits a Lord who runs the town.
Written and Directed by Leslie Megahey

Title
Review for Anne Frank Remembered (1995)
     Most of us have seen various TV screenings of Anne Frank's Diary
and grieved for the young girl who met such a horrible death at the
hands of the Nazis just as the war was coming to an end.  But no matter
how many times you have seen it, someone else has found a new way of
presenting it, has found new, previously unseen footage of the atrocity
that was the Holocaust.  Now come ANNE FRANK REMEMBERED, an
unforgettable documentary that will tear at your heart.
     When, some years ago, I visited the very house where she and her
family were hidden in the attic, I was extremely touched.  And every
time I see a film about the tragic incident I am spellbound again.
     This is the kind of film that must be seen again and again so that
nothing like the horror of the death camps will ever happen again.
This is what movie-making does best, bringing to us history the way it
really happened.  No adjectives are strong enough to fully do justice
to the accuracy and poignancy of the film.

Title
Review for River Wild, The (1994)
     If there currently is a more talented, more versatile actress than
Meryl Streep, I have no idea who that might be.  Be it SOPHIE'S CHOICE,
DEFENDING YOUR LIFE, FRENCH LIEUTENANT'S WOMAN, KRAMER VS KRAMER,
SILKWOOD, MANHATTAN, or any of her other films, she is magnificent.  It
comes as no surprise then that in this film she is right on the
believability target as the desperate mother and wife who steers a raft
through the white-water rapids to save her family.
     Gail (Streep), her husband, Tom (David Strathairn), and their son,
Roarke (Joseph Mazzelllo), are white-water rafting on their vacation as
David and Gail try to put the lost zest back into their marriage.  Gail
has spent her childhood on the river and knows every inch of it.  She
has even gone over the falls where the three rivers meet in a wicked,
turbulent and very dangerous confluence ... but she was 18 then.  Now,
so many years later, she is called upon to save her family as she and
her son race down the river in a raft with two robbers who are making
an escape with a bagful of money and forcing Gail to get them to the
border.
     Kevin Bacon is properly mean as one of the robbers who befriends
and charms young Roarke but who turns vicious when he kidnaps the
family to aid in his escape.
     The beautiful scenery, the rushing water with its churning waves,
the raft going over several falls, and everyone hanging on for dear
life as Gail maneuvers the raft around waves and boulders makes for an
exceptionally fine thriller while all the time, Jerry Goldsmith's
stirring music pumps up the action, keeping you glued to the edge of
your seat.  This is what action movies are all about.
     Directed by Curtis Hanson who scared you with THE HAND THAT ROCKS
THE CRADLE. The script is by Denis O'Neill.

Title
Review for Cure, The (1995)
     In reviewing the film, I must preface it with the statement that I
believe AIDS is a plague about which I feel very strongly.  So when I
say that I felt the film should have been entitled, THE CURE (OR HUCK
FINN HAS AIDS) you will be aware that I am not being funny about AIDS
but rather about the film.
     Dexter (Joseph Mazzello) is an eleven-year-old who has contracted
AIDS during a blood transfusion.  All the kids shun him him and many
call him "homo."  It seemed to me that how he caught the AIDS could
have been explained by Linda, (Dexter's mother, Annabella Sciorra) and
that would have stopped the harassing but of course, then there would
not have been a film.
     Dexter does find a sympathetic friend, Erik (Brad Renfro), also
eleven years old. When he hears of a "cure" down south the two friends
take off on a raft on the Mississippi (a la Huck Finn) and go seek the
doctor who is claiming he has a cure.  That part of the film and the
people they encounter reminded me of Mark Twain's masterpiece.
     Unlike the excellent LORENZO'S OIL, with the passionate Susan
Sarandon and Nick Nolte fighting the doctors, doing there own research
and keeping the film alive and us on edge, this fails on all counts.
Well intentioned, certainly.  Box office?  I doubt it.  Too sad and not
enough excitement.

Title
Review for Princess Caraboo (1994)
     Based on a true story, this is a delightful romantic comedy with
the lovely Phoebe Cates as a woman who shows up in an English village
in the year 1817, wearing a turban and speaking a language no one there
has ever heard.  With her expressive hands and eyes she conveys that
her name is Caraboo.   Knowing nothing about her, the authorities jail
her for vagrancy but her manner is so regal that she wins the attention
of the local aristocrats, Mr. and Mrs. Worrall (Jim Broadbent and Wendy
Hughes), when she conveys to them that she is a princess.
     Among the skeptics is newspaperman Gutch (Stephen Rea) who, while
trying to get to the bottom of the mystery, finds himself falling for
Caraboo.  The Worrall butler, (Kevin Kline) is another who suspects she
is a fake but is taken in by her charm.  An Oxford academic, Professor
Wilkinson (John Lithgow), is brought in to check Caraboo's authenticity
but he, too, becomes enamored of her. Should she prove to be a
charlatan, the sentence would be death.
     All the cast (Cates and Kline are married in real life) are
exactly right for their roles so that the story's romance and comedy
are completely believable.  Kline. wearing a large mustache, and
dressed in livery, is sneaky.  Rea (THE CRYING GAME) tries to hold back
from succumbing to Caraboo's beauty while Lithgow (THE WORLD ACCORDING
TO GARP and TERMS OF ENDEARMENT) at first says Caraboo is a fake but
one look at her and he changes his mind in a hurry.
     The film follows the rather weird but true story very closely and
knowing that, it enhances the entertainment value.  John Wells, who
co-wrote the script with Director Michael Austin, has written a book,
PRINCESS CARABOO: HER TRUE STORY, which is being published in
September.

Title
Review for Jane Eyre (1996)
     Charlotte Bronte, on whose book the film is based, was one of
three sisters.  One was Emily, also a famed author, and the other was
Anne, a poet.  As was the custom among the writers of the early and
mid-nineteenth century, the stories ended with no loose ends,
everything being pat and complete.  Charles Dickens, a bit later,
was not of that genre.  What helps make JANE EYRE so intriguing is
that much of the story came from Chartlotte's own life.  Charlotte,
like Jane (Anna Paquin, who won Best Supporting Actress in The Piano)
was brought up in her early years in a parsonage school  for orphaned
girls, later becoming a governess.  The adult Jane is played by
Charlotte Gainsbourg.
     Love, real love, was what she wanted in life.  While in most
situations, the governess would be an employee of the master of the
house,  Jane was made of stronger stuff so that she is more like one
of the family.  From there it follows that she and the "master,"
Rochester, (William Hurt) fall in love.
     While films made from classics are seldom as good as the book
itself, a good director such as we have here, is capable of  bringing
out all that the book tries to tell.  Aided by such brilliant
supporting  actors as Joan Plowright as Mrs. Fairfax, all smiles, and
Miss Scatcherd (a name Dickens would have loved) played by Geraldine
Chaplin, strict and mean, the film is one you will not want to miss.

Title
Review for Wohin und zurück - Welcome in Vienna (1985) (TV)
       This is the third in a trilogy by the Viennese director which is
based on the real-life experience of the screenwriter Stephan Troller,
an Austrian Jew who fled the Nazis prior to WWII, came to the U.S. and
then went back to Austria with the victorious American army, as an
interpreter.
       It is not necessary to have seen the first two of the series as
this is a self contained movie, and is an exceedingly gripping,
well-made film not to be missed.
        The film follows Freddy, its hero, right to his home city but
none of Vienna is like the civilized country he had left, and of course
it is in shambles from the bombings.  As one woman mumbles at the
American soldier, "All you Americans are good at is bombing" as if
Vienna were in no way at fault.
       The "adoption" by the U.S. of Nazi war criminals who are able to
reveal to us Russian secrets, and how the Nazis are brought to the
U.S.  shows the collapse of the ideals the war was supposed to be
about. As one of the officers points out to Freddy, "The Russians
probably are doing the same thing."   The analogy to Kurt Waldheim is
not overlooked.
       There's the family that says they "bought" the pharmacy that
Freddy's parents used to own; the children running after the American
soldiers for chocolates, and the women playing up to them, too, for the
same reason.  There are the black marketeers.  Freddy realizes that he
belongs neither in the U.S. nor in Austria.
        Rather than dwelling on the war, the director explores the
post-war issues.  No one, including the American officers, stays clean
as they compromise their ideals as each new situation arises.
I noted that a banner strung across a street, written in German, was
not subtitled: "Welcome the Red Army, Liberators of Vienna."   Just one
more compromise and adjustment to new life by the Viennese.  Not to be
missed.

Title
Review for My Giant (1998)
Billy Crystal is one of the top standup comedians.  Despite his
boyish demeanor he has been around a long time.  In recent years no
one has been better as Master of Ceremonies of the Oscars than he.
How then explain that he wrote the story, along with David Seltzer
(who did the screenplay) of this one note boring movie?     An
essential attribute of every comic is timing.  How then explain that
he did not see (in his capacity as producer) that the director was
dragging his tail in this very slow-moving film.
 As an agent, Sammy (Billy Crystal) has been almost always
unsuccessful. Opening scene is of him driving his car in Romania
looking for talent he can sign up.   Did it have to take what seemed
like a half hour of driving and voice over before he finally came
across Max, a 7'7" giant (Gheorghe Muresan) ("He can play 8' if he
has to.").    Max is happy as a caretaker living in a monastery but
he longs for his long gone girlfriend Lillianna (Joanna Pacula) who
for the past 22 years has resided in New Mexico.   New Mexico?  22
years ago?  What kind of story is this?
 When Sammy convinces Max that he will be made into a movie star if
he goes to America with Sammy, the giant jumps at the chance.   Let
us spare you any more of the story.  Suffice it to say that Max was
mean and selfish to entice the giant to leave his homeland but
before the film ends, he realizes he has been a scoundrel and
changes into a good human being.   Give me a break.   Sounds like
Amateur Night.
 Others who contribute (but not much)  to this lost cause are
Kathleen Quinlan as Sammy's wife, and Zane Carney as their son.

Title
Review for City Hall (1996)
     Ken Lipper, who wrote the original screenplay, helps give the
film an air of authenticity.  Lipper used to be a deputy Mayor when
New York City's mayor was Ed Koch.   Lipper knows the ins and outs of
running a city such as New York and surely was of valuable help to
Director Harold Becker, along with the other screenwriters, Paul
Schrader, Nick Pillegi and Bo Goldman.   Given the air of truth
coupled with some very fine acting,  and real dialog, CITY HALL  is a
gripping winner.
     The City is well-run until, in a shootout between a drug-dealer
and a policeman, a young black child gets fatally shot.   Little by
little we learn that the confrontation  may not be all that appears on
the surface.   For one thing, the drug-dealer is a small timer but
related to the Mafia chief.   It is then further revealed that a
tangled web is somewhere involved in the killing.
     The black population is understandably angry.   This is hardly
the first innocent child to get killed in an exchange of police/gang
crossfire.    The buck stops at the desk of Mayor John Pappas (Al
Pacino).    How many more kids are going to be killed?  In the film's
finest, most moving scene, Mayor Pappas appears at the church where he
has been told to stay away.   And do not go near the coffin.   Despite
those warnings, Pappas shows up, and to a hostile black audience, he
delivers a fiery speech.  This is from the heart.  This is real.  And
the anger of the audience is turned around to where the Mayor is seen
as the one person who can and will change the way things have been
previously run.    It is a most moving speech and Pacino gives it all
he has got which is plenty.
     Assisting the mayor in every way is the very honest deputy, Kevin
Calhoun, (John Cusack).   Cusack, too, in his underplayed manner
greatly helps enhance the film. Marybeth Cogan (Bridget Fonda) is the
attorney for the dead child's family.   Danny Aiello is the chief
mafioso, Martin Landau is a judge, David Paymer is the city's
attorney.  With a cast like that, all at their best, it is no surprise
that the film is superb.   Do not miss this one.

Title
Review for Huozhe (1994)
     Perhaps at present one of the best directors in the world is Zhang
Yimou, mainland China's prolific filmmaker.  In 1988, his RED SORGHUM
caught the attention of the West with the story of village wine makers
warding off the Japanese.  This was followed in 1990 with JU DOU, the
tragedy of illicit love in a society dominated by males.  RAISE THE
RED LANTERN, in 1991, had the intriguing story of a young girl who at
her parents' insistence marries a wealthy man in whose house she
becomes "the Fourth Mistress."  1993 brought us into the current world
of China with THE STORY OF QUI JU, a woman who attempts to fight the
bureaucracy.
     In TO LIVE, we cover some forty-plus years in China that include
Mao's The Great Leap Forward and the Cultural Revolution, the Red
Guard, and the terrible toll on ordinary people.  Yimou uses one
family's travails as an illustration of what happened to the many
millions who had to live through those years.  As this review is being
written, the film is banned in China even though it includes nothing of
the current turmoil, imprisonments, etc.
     As in most of Yimou's films, his favorite (on and off the screen),
the beautiful actress Gong Li plays the lead.  Here she is a mother
with a young son and daughter, and a husband (Ge You) who, addicted to
gambling, ends up losing their home.  The film covers his career in the
army, his trade, which is that of a puppeteer, (of a kind I have never
before seen), his return to his home after the war to find that things
have changed in many ways, mostly politically.  The extremism of the
Left appears no more gentle than the kind found among the Right in
other countries of the world.
     If anyone knows how to tell a story, to get you involved with "the
big picture" as well as the individuals in it, Zhang Yimou is our man.

Title
Review for Radioland Murders (1994)
     Director Mel Smith has the top-rated TV comedy show in Great
Britain but if this frantic comedy is to be taken as an indication of
his directorial abilities, he had better stick to comedic acting.
     Given a superb cast with which to work he failed to utilize their
abilities, instead employing what appears to be a scatter shot approach
with hysterical non-stop running around in circles to the point where
it leaves the audience exhausted; somewhere in the film you have to
slow down for a moment so when the pace picks up again it is noted and
appreciated.  This just becomes tiresome, seeming longer than its 112
minutes running time.
     To see what could have been accomplished, let us just list the
cast: Mary Stuart Masterson, Brian Benben, Ned Beatty, George Burns,
Scott Michael Campbell, Brion James, Michael Lerner, Michael McKean,
Jeffrey Tambor, Stephen Tobolowsky and Christopher Lloyd.  With few
exceptions, it was a waste of talent.
     Smaller roles included Harvey Korman, Robert Klein, Bo Hoskins,
Billy Barty, Bobcat Goldthwait, Corbin Bernsen and Rosemary Clooney,
among others.
     The story, in brief:  In the olden days of pre-TV, millions of
people tuned in their radios each night to comedy, mystery and
romance.  In addition to the three major radio networks, a fourth one
is making its debut.  While out in the studio's audience the show is
going on, the dancers are dancing, the singers are singing, the
comedians are being comedic and the orchestra with its genial, smiling
conductor is waving his baton.  Backstage, all is bedlam.
     There are murders, there are the producers and directors trying to
keep the show going so the studio audience is unaware of what is
happening behind the curtains. And there is even a love story. This
hodgepodge is flung at us to the point that we do not care who or why
anyone is murdered; rather the concentration is on when is this thing
going to end?
Story by George Lucas.  You never can tell.

Title
Review for Children of the Revolution (1996)
While it is being billed as a "black Red" comedy, it is, despite some
funny moments, more of a black Red satire than comedy.  For those like
writer-director Peter Duncan's father, a card-carrying Communist who
never was able to believe the horror stories about Stalin, this film
will be most difficult.  But for the rest of the world, the film's
story is indeed way out, as satire should be, and fiercely
entertaining at the same time.  This, in large part, is due to the
fabulous actors who bring the movie to life.
Heading the cast is Joan Fraser (Judy Davis) as the Australian Red
revolutionary whose whole life in 1949 is the Party.  She is an
activist who brooks no diversion from her party line as she sees it and
"knows" one day her communists will take over Australia.  She is
enthralled with her leader and writes to Stalin (F Murray Abraham) to
tell him she is his Australian right arm.  One day she is surprised to
receive an invitation to visit him in the Kremlin..
Things really take off when she spends the night with Stalin and he
suffers a fatal heart attack but not before Joan has become
pregnant.  Back home again, she induces her husband (Geoffrey Rush)
to never reveal he is not the father.  Little Joe (Richard Roxburgh)
will grow up.  A mother's dream come true . . . a little
revolutionist . . . or so you would think. . . while the film takes a
new and exciting turn.  You have never seen anything like it.
Also supporting the cast is Sam Neill who despite a wealth of roles is
probably best remembered as the paleontologist in Jurassic Park.
Written and Directed by Peter Duncan.

Title
Review for Addicted to Love (1997)
It would be difficult to find two more charming actors than Matthew
Broderick and Meg Ryan but it takes more than charm to sustain a
movie.   Somewhere between the reading of the script and getting it on
film, something went a bit wrong; not very much but enough.  The
premise of a young man and woman losing their respective significant
others, only to discover that the "others" they lost are now in love
with each other, certainly sounds as if it would have made a light
romantic comedy.
Sam (Broderick), who is an astronomer in a small midwest town, is a
young romantic. Maggie (Ryan), a New Yorker who has seen enough to make
her wary, is a photographer who by chance meets our astronomer when
both she and he are spying on the two lovers who had jilted them.   The
cynic in Maggie convinces the romantic in Sam that the best way to get
back their respective lovers is by humiliating them.  But how?
Suffice it to say, Sam and Maggie establish themselves in a run-down
loft that just happens to have a one way view into the apartment of
their ex-lovers, Linda (Kelly Preston) and Anton (Tcheky Karyo) where
they sit around watching their exes cavort.     This is where the
movie bogs down.  After a while the spying becomes a bit tiresome but
continues through a good part of the film.  That may have been the
funniest gimmick in the movie but it soon becomes a one- note
gimmick.    That screenwriter Robert Gordon was experienced in breakups
of longtime relationships because he had had one of his own is really
irrelevant.   One would hope his breakup had more humor than does the
story he wrote . . . and that is too bad because whatever entertainment
there is in the film falls mainly on the aforementioned charm of the
two leads, too heavy a burden.
In a cameo, Maureen Stapleton appears as Maggie's mother.

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1994)
     As Kenneth Branagh "can do no wrong" in my book, I was shaken to
find that I was dumb-struck by the poorly conceived movie I was
watching.   Everything about it was bad and big and loud and a
hodge-podge.  How could someone as good as Branagh direct and act in a
film so lacking in everything?
     To begin with, "the monster," Robert de Niro.  Why did the film
need a star of his caliber who had comparatively few lines and those
mostly mumbles.   His face was as ugly and off-putting as one could
imagine, filled with oversized sutures for which a surgeon would be
arrested for botching the job.
     Karloff was and looked a hundred times better.   Karloff was
unknown; his first film was in 1916.  Fifteen years later he had some
mild success in The Criminal Code but it was not until his Monster role
that same year in Frankenstein that he became a star.  Did Branagh
choose De Niro because he wanted a "name?"
     If, as Branagh says, the film is about "Love," the love he does
not give his Creation but lavishes instead on Elizabeth (Helena Bonham
Carter), he missed the mark completely.  With perhaps one of the
world's most famous horror stories to work with, Branagh failed.
     Tom Hulce has the role of Dr Frankenstein's friend, while John
Cleese is the doctor who first thought of creating life but gave up the
idea.  Aidin Quinn and Ian Holm are also in the cast.

Title
Review for Murder in the First (1995)
I was asked by the publicist for MURDER IN THE FIRST to write a book
review based on a copy of the novel by Dan Gordon she gave me a few
weeks ago.  This makes it difficult to now see the film and write a
review of the movie with the book fresh in my mind.  (The book review
is in the following message.)
     For one thing, the book is more exciting than the film.  For a
second thing, why was it necessary to change the fictional names the
author, Gordon, had given the characters?  Does everything have to be
twisted around when making a movie from a book?  Willie Moore (in the
book) sounds better than Henry Young (Kevin Bacon).  Henry Willard
Davidson (Christian Slater), the young lawyer in the book, becomes
Stamphill. Oh, well.
     There have been many books on prisons and prison life but none so
clearly describes the utter authoritarian brutality visited on anyone
when a jailer, Mr. Glenn (Gary Oldman), wishes to punish.  This film is
based on a true story, an attempted escape of Alcatraz and the
subsequent events that made present day Alcatraz a tourist attraction
in San Francisco bay.
     When Warden Humson asked Mr. Glenn why number 532 (the number was
also changed!) was in solitary confinement for three years, the reply
he got was that the records will show that no one has attempted an
escape since Young received his punishment.  "You let those animals
think escape is possible you might as well stick in a revolving door.
Is that what you want, Sir?"
     Nevertheless, the warden decides Young has learned his lesson and
he is released from solitary, half crazed.  Gordon has described the
darkness, in the cave-like one-room, the little peephole in the "door,"
the smell.  Three years.  In the film, it is too dark to see much of
the "dungeon" as solitary was called.
     In all the time Young was holed up, his mind was on learning who
was the snitch who gave away the escape plan.  It was the one thing
that kept him alive.  When, his first day out of the dungeon (as it was
called) and on line in the mess hall, another convict whispers the name
of the snitch. A few moments later, Young gets his revenge and once
more is thrown under Mr. Glenn's authority.
     Gordon details the new punishment Young must now endure.  The
story then switches to the young Public Defender and his efforts to get
a fair trial for Young ... with Young not responding.
     While Gary Oldman and Christian Slater are let loose to give forth
with their histrionics, most of Kevin Bacon's work is in the dark ...
as is most of the film.

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
A new Batman, who when not Batman-ing around town is really Bruce
Wayne (George Clooney); a shiny new Batmobile that can ride upside
down on the ceiling of a tunnel; a new villain, Mr. Freeze (Arnold
Schwarzenegger)  Robin (Chris O'Donnell) now has a turbo-charged
motorcycle and is better able to assist Batman; some old character
actors from various prior Batman films;  Michael Gough as Alfred
Pennyworth, Bruce's butler, friend and father figure, and Gotham
City's harried Police Commissioner Gordon (Pat Hingle).
Add to that Barbara Eilson, "Batgirl" (the lovely, sprightly Alicia
Silverstone); the stunning model Elle McPherson who has the role of
Julie Madison, in love with  Bruce.   But the one who grabs the ball
and runs with it through the whole film is Uma Thurman as the
villainous Poison Ivy. In addition to her own shapely lines, Akiva
Goldman who wrote the script has given Poison Ivy the best lines.
Ivy was not always a villain.   She once was Dr. Pamela Isley, a good
person, a botanist, but something happened that turned her into Poison
Ivy whose kiss means death.   Robin comes close to touching lips with
her.   The fact is, Robin has a crush on her and when Batman tries to
warn him about her, he argues that Batman is just jealous because he
is actually in love with her himself.  It looked for a while that
Batman and Robin might actually split up.
Like Poison Ivy, Mr. Freeze was not always a hateful person.  As the
famous Dr. Victor Fries, a molecular scientist, he tried to
cryogenically preserve his wife who was terminally ill so that one day
when a cure was found for her illness, she could be defrosted.
Something went badly wrong with that operation and turned Fries into a
madman, mad at the whole world. Schwarzenegger does a great job as Mr.
Freeze.  He is aided by some fancy special effects that freeze people
and objects when he fires on them with a special gun.  No action
movie, it seems, is anything without special effects;  fortunately for
us, they are getting better and better.
Lots of action, lots of freezing and defrosting and shooting and
terrorizing Gotham but all with humor.  While Batman and Robin go
about their business of saving the city, Freeze and Poison Ivy keep
the film rolling.  They and the special effects are what give the film
whatever value it has.    The visual effects are the work of John
Dykstra.
Directed by Joel Schumacher who also directed BATMAN FOREVER.

Title
Review for Bean (1997)
Rowan Atkinson who has the title role in BEAN was supposed to have
been an electrical engineer but somewhere along the way he had more
of the slapstick comedian in him, the silent stars type, and in 1970
made his debut as a performer.   Despite being around since then,
and despite being famous in England as well as having been in the
films FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL, NEVER SAY NEVER
AGAIN, THE TALL GUY and THE WITCHES, he is not as well-known
 in the States except for cable TV.    BEAN will change all that.
Bean is silent.  The only sounds to come out of his mouth are weird
grunts.  The other actors, plagued by BEAN, do not remain silent.
How could they?   Bean's job as a guard in an art gallery requires
that he just sit in a chair.  Unfortunately, that is too much of a
chore so the alternative is to fire him.   However, Bean has a
friend, a benefactor to the museum, whom the Board of Directors would
not want to offend.   One of the board members conceives the idea of
getting rid of bean, at least for a while, by commissioning him to
deliver a $50 million painting (Whistler's Mother) to a new gallery
in the United States.   Further, he is passed off as an art expert.
Needless to add, the painting does not quite make it to its owner in
its original.
Atkinson pulls out all the comic stops in BEAN.  Falling off a chair
in the art gallery, making himself in a unique manner some real
instant coffee for breakfast as he is late to work, and shaving with
an electric razor his whole face including his tongue are
hysterically funny.   A most difficult trick is to sustain that kind
of humor throughout an entire film.  At that, the film is not
entirely successful despite other antics that pop up throughout the
movie.     However, it is still great fun.
Others in the cast include the art historian of the U.S. gallery
(Peter MacNichol), his wife (Pamela Reed) and their daughter
(Tricia Vessey) and son (Andrew  J Lawrence).   It is in their home
that BEAN stays during his Los Angeles visit.  Not since THE MAN 
WHO CAME TO DINNER was a family so harassed and made
 furious by their guest who was only trying to help.

Title
Review for Testimone dello sposo, Il (1998)
Poignant would be a good one-word description of this love story which
takes place in Italy just as the 1900s is coming to an end.   It is a
time when most women had no idea of what love can be.   While they made
excellent mothers, and even very good wives, they thought that being
obedient, faithful, dutiful to their husbands was what marriage and love
were all about.  Great emotion escaped them.
In THE BEST MAN, however,  Francesca (the Spanish actress Ines
Sastre) a young lady who is to be married to somene chosen by her
parents, is suddenly, uncontrollably attracted to her husband's best
friend. At the wedding, she pledges in her own mind, even as she says
the vows, that she is really marrying Angelo (Diego Abantantuono),
who has just returned from the United States after being away for 15
years, now a wealthy, handsome man.
Francesca hardly cares who knows her feelings but Angelo cautions her
that this infatuation will ruin her life.   Although Angelo reciprocates
her love, he is able to be more sensibly prudent. Nevertheless they share
a stolen, passionate kiss.  Even Angelo's confession that he did not earn
the money but inherited it from his hard-working brother does nothing to
change Francesca's love.
Husband Edgardo (Dario Cantarelli) has found an old flame of Angelo's,
Olimpia (Valeria D'Obici)  and surprises him by inviting her to his home.
Angelo tells Francesca there is no alternative, he cannot stay with her
as it would be a scandal, so he must leave with Olimpia.   Francesca runs
away to a church where she lives and teaches, never forgetting her true
love.   Need I add that the story does not end there?

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
 As of this writing, the Oscars for Best whatever in 1997 have not
yet been named but I would hope that the 1998 Best Actor nominations
will include John Travolta for his performance as Governor Jack
Stanton in PRIMARY COLORS.   For that matter, there are many solid
performances by every supporting actor in that very solid and most
entertaining movie.   None of that is or should come as a surprise
of course as the screenplay is by Elaine may, and the direction by
Mike Nichols, a proven combination.
 In a satire with more truth than poetry, the film is ostensibly
about Bill Clinton's 1992 campaign for the presidency but is much
more than that.  For one thing, it shows what kind of a person has
the stamina, the charm, the determination to know what to do to win
. . . and then to let nothing stop him. This is true of most all the
Presidents in the past.
 As portrayed by Travolta, Clinton exudes charm.   It is easy to see
why people would like him.  It is also easy to see how the speeches
he makes on his campaign trail are designed to please the kind of
audience he is addressing. . . and is that not a fact of life in
campaigning?  Tell a working class group that your mother worked in
a factory "just as you do so I know what it is like."   Tell a
Jewish group that you are a great supporter of Israel. Tell an
elderly group that your opponent (not necessarily true) wants to
tamper with Social Security.
 Back in 1993, the documentary THE WAR ROOM gave a good indication
of what campaigning and elections are all about.   One thing that
boggled my mind was that after the election, James Carville,
Clinton's campaign manager, married Mary Matlin who was second in
command of the Bush campaign. During the campaign she called Clinton
"a prevaricator, a draft dodger and a philanderer."   That tells us
something about the sincerity of all involved and Primary Colors
shows it in even brighter hues.
 In addition to Travolta, outstanding performances were given by
newcomer to the American scene but well known for his work on the
London stage, Adrian Lester in his role as Henry Burton, the
campaign manager.   Susan Stanton, (Emma Thompson) the Governor's
wife, is portrayed as having a one track mind: win the election
with no regard for how.  She wants to be the First Lady and nothing
will be allowed to stop that from happening.  Next is Libby Holden
(Kathy Bates) as the tough private confidante of the governor.
Bates is great!
 Others in the cast are political advisor Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob
Thornton) and Freddy Picker, (Larry Hagman) a former governor of
Florida, whose one secret indiscretion many years ago can devastate
his attempt to beat Stanton if the Stanton campaign team wishes to
make the news public. Cameos by Rob Reiner, Diane Ladd, Robert
Klein, Geraldo Rivera, Charlie Rose and Larry King.
 The film is based on the novel by Joe Klein who kept his identity
hidden for a while by having the author listed as "Anonymous."
Obviously, he was an insider in Washington and knew the scene very
well.
 PRIMARY COLORS is entertaining and informative, telling it as it is
with few, if any, holds barred.   Go see it!

Title
Review for Box of Moonlight (1996)
This fairy tale-like film has all the elements of a "feel good"
movie with a quirky set of characters, (Al and "Kid," respectively
played by John Turturro and Sam Rockwell), a happy ending, is
funny and delightful from the opening scenes to its FIN.
Turturro is perfect as the uptight contracting engineer, Al
Fountain, a stickler for punctuality, a person so predictable he
is something of a bore.   His wife, Deb (Annie Corley), tells him
she can set her watch by him.   All that changes when an
out-of-town job, on which Al and his crew had been working, is
cancelled.   It is then that Al notices one of the hairs in his
head is grey.   In a small panic about how his life has been so
dull to date he is drawn to visit the site of his childhood.  Al
rents a car and heads to his old memories. On the way he sees a
child pedalling a bike but going backwards.   He sees a waitress
pour coffee into a cup with less and less liquid in the cup.
Very odd.
Enter Kid, standing next to his beat up and broken down old car,
dressed in a Davy Crockett outfit including the fur hat with tail.
Kid hails the  approaching car and Al stops. . . . and the movie
takes off in a state of whimsy.   Kid says he lives "just a bit up
the road" and could Al tow his car there?   Al, always Mr. Nice
Guy, agrees.    After the old car is tied by rope to the new
rental car, Kid tells Al that it would better if Kid drove as he
knows the road better.  Al reluctantly agrees.     They drive off
with Kid at the wheel of the new rental and Al in the old beat up
car.
Kid's house is somewhat further away than the "just a bit up the
road."   It begins to grow dark when the cars finally arrive at
the oddly decorated trailer and surroundings which are "home" to
Kid.    Thus begins Al's coming out of his box of predictability
as Kid, time after time, surprises Al (and us).    Kid is sooooh
reasonable and always smiling so that Al seamlessly enters some of Kid's world, becoming a better man, a better father to his child
and a more loving husband.     His earlier phone calls home to his
wife and his telephone conversations with his child are absolute
gems.
An Oscar-deserving performance is given by Sam Rockwell as a
free-spirited sprite.  Fine performances are turned in by the two
ladies to whom Sam introduces Al: Catherine Keener and Lisa
Blount.   Dermot Mulroney rounds out the excellent cast.

Title
Review for Eye for an Eye (1996)
        Who has not at some period in one's life yearned for revenge?
Picture the parents of the two people who were killed in the case of O
J Simpson.  Surely, despite the jury's finding of "Not Guilty," how
difficult it must be for the parents to restrain themselves from doing
him harm?
        In EYE FOR AN EYE, the older daughter of Karen McCann (Sally
Field) is raped and murdered.  On a technicality, despite evidence that
Robert Doob (Kiefer Sutherland), the accused, is set free by the judge.
Everyone is angry but only Karen decides to take matters into her own
hands.   If her husband (2nd marriage) Mack (Ed Harris) will not take
her seriously; if the detective (Joe Mantegna) says he is helpless, 
then
who but Karen can track down the whereabouts of the free murderer and
revenge her daughter's death?
        Despite the fine cast, the movie has a tendency to slow down
frequently.  The story is hardly original.  Whatever reason there is
for seeing the film lies mostly in the acting; Fields, as always, does
a magnificent characterization as the distraught, angry parent.  Others
in the cast do well by their smaller roles.

Title
Review for Reckless (1995/I)
     Even a fairy tale about Christmas has to have some continuity,
some explanation of the whats and whys of the story.  RECKLESS does not
seem to have any of that.
     The film opens Christmas Eve with Rachel (Mia Farrow) lying in bed
with her husband Tom (Tony Goldwyn), snuggling up to him and chattering
happily away.  Not being able to understand one word of what she was
saying I assumed it was the fault of the screening room's sound or I
had gone deaf. Luckily the explanation came soon when Tom tells Rachel
that he can no longer stand her giggling babbling and had put out a
contract on her to have her killed.  After the confession, he also
tells her that he took out a $100,000 insurance policy on her life.
That is the end of the understandable part of the film; the rest is a
hodgepodge that is the fault of the director, the screen writer and/or
the editor.  (Norman Ren, Craig Lucas, and Michael Berenbaum,
respectively.)
     Outside the house, the snow is piled high but when she opens the
window and climbs onto the sill, her husband gently but firmly shuts
the window on her so that she goes sliding down the snow-covered roof
and onto the ground ... unhurt, of course.  This is, after all, a
fairy tale.
     Later she is in a phone booth when she is approached by a Lloyd,
(Scott Glenn) who takes her to his home where she meets his wife, Pooty
(Mary-Louise Parker) who is in a wheel chair as she is a paraplegic
who, for good measure, is also a deaf mute.  That she talks and hears,
a bit later in the film, was not explained ... at least, not to me.
     One weird incident follows another without any rhyme or reason
that I could ascertain.  The press kit mentions Candide but Voltaire
would have a lot to say about that.
     The supporting cast includes Eileen Brennan, Giancarlo Esposito
and Stephen Dorf.
1 byte (because I am feeling generous.)

Title
Review for Milk Money (1994)
     Meet the new Worst Movie Of The Year.  This one has no redeeming
features.  That it could be made by Paramount, the same studio that
gave us FORREST GUMP, is another surprise.
     The film opens with twelve-year-old Frank (Michael Patrick Carter)
and two of his friends discussing women and diaphragms.  One of the
friends suggests they gO to the "big city" where women will undress for
money.  They then break into their piggy banks, sell all their toys and
books and with a sack of coins and bills they get on their bikes, off
to the big city.
     They accost well-dressed women on the street with the moronic
question, "Are you a prostitute?"  When they are about to be conned and
robbed by some tramp who takes them into an underground parking lot,
V., (Melanie Griffith) gets out of a car where she had been plying her
trade with an elderly man and conks the tramp over the head with her
shoe, knocking him out.  Little Frank decides he wants to take her home
to marry his widowed dad (Ed Harris).
     Last year we had the delightful SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE with a young
boy (Ross Malinger) trying to get his dad (Tom Hanks) to marry a sweet
woman journalist (Meg Ryan).  (3.5 bytes)
     Last month the story got more unlikely in CORRINA, CORRINA, when
dad (Ray Liotta) is being asked by his daughter (Tina Majorino) to
marry Whoopi Goldberg, their housekeeper. (2 bytes).  And now, dad is
invited to marry a hooker who Frank tells him is his math tutor.
     The more the movie goes on, the more inane it becomes.  It has at
least two unacceptable story goofs but even without that, it is
pitiful.

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
It is nice to see Stallone in something other than his macho,
daredevil, machine gun-firing roles.  And he is much more likable
playing Freddy Heflin, a wannabe policeman who is rejected because one
ear has been damaged when, as a teenager, he dove into the water to
rescue the drowning Liz (Annabella Sciorra).  He is an acknowledged
hero and is given the job of sheriff in the town of Garrison, NJ, just
across the river from NYC.  There is not much happening in Garrison
except possibly for a jackknifed big rig.
Garrison is called "Copland" because so many of New York's finest are
fed up with NYC's crime rate of one every eight seconds.  In Garrison,
no one commits a crime because there are too many cops living there.
Sheriff or no, the cops really control the town.  For instance, when
Cindy (Janeane Garofalo), a new deputy, wants to cite Ray Donlan,
(Harvey Keitel) a top ranking cop for speeding, Freddy has to tell her
that is a "no-no."  We do not give tickets to cops.  Nice and peaceful
town.
Nice and peaceful until Officer Murray Babitch (Michael Rappaport) who
is on his way home after a fun evening in NYC gets sideswiped by a
couple of black men who are having their own joy ride.  Infuriated, he
gives chase.  When one of the men leans out the window with a gun
pointed at Babitch, he fires his own revolver and causes the car he is
chasing to crash and explode, killing both occupants.
That is not good . . . but worse is that when the detectives
investigate, they find that there was no gun involved, just a steering
wheel lock.  That is bad.  He can easily lose his status as a hero for
having rescued people in a fire and suddenly find himself the subject
of a police brutality investigation.  But what are friends for?  A
fellow officer plants a gun in the crashed vehicle.  To insure there
will be no further inquiries they pretend that Babitch must have
jumped to his death from the George Washington Bridge into the Hudson
River.  End of story?  Hardly.
Two things then happen.  As Donlan drives away after the ticket
incident, Freddy sees the "drowned" Babitch looking out the back
window.  Further, there is the NYC police Internal Affairs
investigator, Moe Tilden (played with great humor and flair by Robert
De Niro) who smells there may be a cover up.  Tilden tries to talk
Freddie into helping him by reporting anything suspicious but Freddie
is uncertain about what he should do; go against his cop friends
. . . or uphold the law?  The combined efforts of Tilden and Freddy
could forever change how Garrison is perceived and run.
For the most part, the film is exciting. Much of that is due to a
superb cast.  Aside from those already mentioned, there are Ray
Liotta, Peter Berg, Robert Patrick in supporting roles.

Title
Review for Fille seule, La (1995)
The movies have always had pretty faces.  Not a year passes but that
some new and beautiful woman enchants the audience with her presence.
This year, the one who bowled me over is 19-years-old Virginie
Ledoyen.  Although she has been in French films for some 6 years, this
was the first time I had seen her.  In 1995 she appeared in this
current film (just being released in the U.S. now), in La Ceremonie and
in Mahjong, a film by Taiwanese director Edward Yang.
Virginie is not of the Hollywood mold.  In what may be described as
wholesome, intelligent, a delight to behold, Virginie (who in this film
is Valerie) has a unique kind of beauty.  Her eyes have depth; you can
see the wheels turning inside her head; happy and giggling, sad and
sizing up a situation,  Every emotion comes through that lovely
face.  Little wonder that she is in every scene in A SINGLE GIRL.
Little wonder that the director has the photographer, (Caroline
Champetier), slavishly follow her every move, whether sitting at a
table in a cafe, strolling briskly through the French city, bringing
Room Service meals to the hotel's customers where she works.  And
almost always, a look of independence on her face.  A pretty good
trick when you are only nineteen.  .  . and pregnant.
Valerie is in a cafe talking over a cup of coffee to her unemployed
boyfriend, Remi (Benoit Magimel).  She is waiting for the right
moment to tell him she is one month pregnant and does he have any
thoughts about the new situation.  He really does not; he is surprised,
of course, but speaks in generalities.
Employed as a waitress who serves the Four Star hotel's guests when
they ring for room service, she encounters some odd ones; those who
offer to pay for her sexual services, those who are freaky in other
respects.  There is also the hotel's manager who would like to get at
her (as he doing with another employee). Valerie wards them all off,
accepting her situation with stoic equanimity.  In short, she is a
person of exceptional character.  Her experiences enable her to
determine what she will do about the baby she is bearing.  Looking at
that face, you know that whatever decision she makes, it will be the
right one.

Title
Review for Daytrippers, The (1996)
A "daytripper," I have learned, is someone who cheats on a spouse,
usually around lunch time or while "staying late at the office."  THE
DAYTRIPPERS is a delightfully humorous look at one family when wife
Eliza (Hope Davis) who thinks her marriage is just great comes across
what may very well be a love poem from someone signed "Sandy" to her
husband, Louis (Stanley Tucci).
What is a shocked, suspicious wife to do but run off to her parents'
home, Rita (Anne Meara) and Jim (Pat McNamara) to seek advice.  Jim is
the downtrodden, silent husband who never comments about anything.
Wife Rita makes up for his silence by never shutting up for a moment,
voicing opinions on everything and expecting her every command to be
obeyed.
When Eliza arrives, she is met not only by her parents but also by her
sister Jo (Parker Posey) and Jo's boyfriend Carl (Liev Schreiber).
After reading the poem, mom Rita decides that this calls for immediate
action, ordering the five to hop into a cab and go to the office where
Louis works.  Louis is not there; he has been given the day off.  Wifey
did not know he was going to be off..  Smell a rat?  Something rotten
in Denmark? Nothing to do but track that daytripper and find out what
is going on.
Anne Meara's "mom" is the film's main character . . . and "character"
is the precise word. She is an overbearing, driven, take-no-prisoners
Mom.  Meara is superb; good to see her in action again.  Everyone in
the cast is just right but the star is really the wonderfully realistic
dialogue by writer Greg Mottola. . . and the film's surprise ending.
All the speaking lines ring true, a great plus for any film.
What happens when the family finally finds the elusive daytripper?  Why
not see the film and enjoy it and laugh as I did, right down to the
last moments.  Excellent.
Written and directed by Greg Mottola.

Title
Review for Yin shi nan nu (1994)
     You say you got hungry at BABETTE'S FEAST?  Your mouth watered at
LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE?  Then you are in for another feast treat with
this Taiwan film by the same director who gave you the hilarious THE
WEDDING BANQUET.
     Mr. Chu (Sihung Lung), Taiwan's greatest chef, will make your
mouth water as you see him prepare the food in a large restaurant with
dozens of helpers scurrying all around.  Listen to the pots sizzle as
he drops in his scrumptious delicacies and makes his wondrous dishes.
Get ready to watch a master chef prepare great Chinese food and be
prepared to get hungry immediately.
     Ah, but Mr. Chu, a widower, despite his being a food wizard, finds
he is having trouble at home managing his three pretty daughters,
Jia-Chien, a self-sufficient airline executive; Jia-Jen, a high school
teacher who may never find the right man; and Jia-Ning, the youngest of
the three and a confirmed romantic.  As if he needed more problems, Mr.
Chu is losing his taste buds; a deaf Beethoven.
     Sunday family dinner is a ritual to keep the family together but a
small torture for the daughters who would rather be elsewhere.
     One of the funniest and endearing scenes in the film is that
involving the lunch brought by Mr. Chu to a friend's daughter at
school.  You will "eat it up."
     Then there is the widow, Ms. Liang (Ah-Leh Gua) who has returned
from America and who has her eye out for Mr. Chu while she checks out
her newly divorced daughter, Jin-Rong (Sylvia Chang).
     Throw all that into the pot and let Director Ang Lee stir things
up and you come up with the most delicious foreign film of the year.
For good measure there is a delightful surprise.
     Finally, about the title.  EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN.  That is what
people need to survive: food and sex.  Need we say more?

Title
Review for Johnny Mnemonic (1995)
     No one I have known has actually ever accused Keanu Reeves of
being able to act.  This film will change no one's mind.  Johnny
(Reeves) keeps a straight face throughout the whole film.  If we are
looking to give him credit it must be that the plot is so ridiculous,
no one could have done any better.
     The film opens with a big splash across the screen:  INTERNET.
Innocent me, I thought maybe at last they have made a movie based on
real scientific electronic know-how.  Forget it.  That is the last of
any credible science fiction.
     In the 21st Century, the most important asset is information.  To
keep things secret and unavailable to competing corporations, "mnemonic
couriers" are employed.  Johnny is a professional courier who has a
chip implanted in his brain (did I say "brain?").  Into this chip
containing thousands of gigabytes of memory, Johnny is supposed to
store the information he has stolen.  As in everything, there is a
price and the price Johnny must pay for what he gets is that his own
childhood memory is removed to make room for the chip.  Little wonder
he looks befuddled.
     Others in this mess are Dona Meyer, Ice-T, Takeshi, Denis Akiyama,
Dolph Lundgren and a mysterious ghostly Barbara Sukowa, a strange ghost
in cyberspace.  Very weird film.

Title
Review for Two Much (1996)
     This should have been called "Too Long."  Not only was the
two-hours film boring but it was entirely derivative and predictable.
Everything that you have ever seen in a comedy film (good or bad) was
thrown into this mess. When you see the comic hero (Antonio Banderas)
running out of a house which has a pool, you know he is going to end up
in it. Remember the famous scene in the Marx Bros. film where they are
facing each other as if they were looking in a mirror?  That was a
work of genius. This silly thing tried to imitate it with a variation
that was just a poor imitation.
     An art dealer/cum con man, Art (Dodge. . . is that a pun for
Dickens' "Artful Dodger?") pretends he is a twin brother to Bart.  Both
parts are played by Antonio Banderas.  As the twin, he lets his long
hair down and puts on glasses.
     The cast consists of well-known names.  Aside from Banderas, there
is Melanie Griffith, Daryl Hannah, Joan Cusack, Danny Aiello and Joan
Cusack.  What a waste of talent.
     Question, when is Aiello going to refuse to play a mafia-type
surrounded by bone-breaking bodyguards?  He has the talent but he has
been typecast as an Italian gangster and apparently the money that part
brings him overshadows the fact that he is a good actor and ought to
insist that his agent find him a new role.

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
  In 1988, director Wim Wenders gave us WINGS OF DESIRE, a film in
French and German.   Based on that film, Brad Silberling has made
his own English version.   When that happens, the newer attempt is
almost always a disaster BUT in this case, despite the original
being excellent, the current film is a bit superior. For one thing,
it comes across as more understandable than the subtitled one.
  It is the story, a romantic fantasy, of a fine surgeon, Dr. Maggie
Rice (Meg Ryan) who oddly and despite herself, falls in love with
Seth (Nicolas Cage) an angel who makes his presence known to her.
Angels are normally invisible.  In this film there are many angels
in the city, their job being to help those in need.  So when Dr.
Rice inexplicably loses a patient and is very despondent about the
loss Seth decides to show himself to her and comfort her.
  Seth learns there are many things he does not know about real
humans, that there is much  he has never experienced.
  Why would a down-to Earth woman surgeon allow herself to fall in
love with a non-human, an angel?   What must the angel give up to
experience that of which he has never before been aware?   For one
thing, his immortality.   Not exactly an easy choice.
  A patient, Nathaniel Messinger, (Dennis Franz) lying ill in a
hospital bed  reveals that he once was an angel.   Now he is happily
married and the father of two. From the first time arriving on Earth
as an angel, Messinger felt at once that there was more of life to
be savored.     Would the same hold true for Seth?  I liked Franz's
performance very much; he is a consummate actor.
  Unlike Messinger, the angel, Cassiel (Andre Braugher), has the
role of an angel who is satisfied with his lot.   He is not one to
give up his immortality to become a human.     Nevertheless, he
cannot help but wonder about what it must be like to be in love.
  The film, then, is about love and its power to sway even angels .
. . or at the very least make them restless pondering the pros and
cons of giving up their endless life and become mere mortals . . .
and for what?
  Very solid performances by both Cage and Ryan and, in fact, by all
in the cast, make the film  most entertaining and thought-provoking.
Highly recommended.
  Visit my web site  or 
  send your comments to my">href="mailto:bhoffman@ix.netcom.com">my 
  email address.

Title
Review for Farinelli: il castrato (1994)
     Based on a true story about two brothers, Ricardo and Carlo
Broschi.  It was quite the custom in Italy to castrate young boys with
good voices so that their voices would not change.  This took place
mostly in the 17th and 18th Centuries with many becoming very famous
even to the point of having groupies and insignia worn by the fans.
With all the crazy customs of people over the centuries it is a wonder
the human race has survived this long.  Not everyone became famous;
many had their lives ruined by the mutilation.
     When the film opens there is a handsome boy of about 9 years old
who is singing in the chorus.  He has a beautiful voice.  His friend,
standing next to him, cautions him not to sing because "you know what
they do to young boys who have good voices."
     In the film, the singer is called Farinelli (Stephano (Dionisi).
His father induces him to help his older brother, Ricardo, (Enrico Lo
Verso) who is a composer.  "He will compose and you will sing and
together you two will be famous.  Please do not let us down; do it for
your brother and me."  And so he submits.
     Farinelli grows up and becomes famous, singing before kings and
queens.  His brother's compositions are of very poor quality but he is
carried along by the younger one's beautiful voice and popularity.
     Despite his being one of the castrati, women are taken in by his
beauty and his voice.  When asked, he tells one beautiful woman
Alexandra (Elsa Zylberstein), that he was left enough to satisfy a
hundred women.   That is not quite true.  He starts and then his
brother finishes.
     Touching, beautifully mounted and directed, filled with drama. the
film is not to be missed.  It was nominated for the Best Foreign Film.
Derek Lee Ragin and Eva Mallas Godlewska did the actual singing, their
voices digitally fused.   You cannot tell the singing was dubbed.
     For something different and excellent, try FARINELLI.  You will
love it.

Title
Review for Urga (1991)
This story of a young Mongolian couple, Gombo and Pagma, is set in the
quiet and immense steppes of China's Inner Mongolia.  Although China
allows a maximum of 2 children per family, the Mongols are allowed
three.  There is an infant, a delightful 6-year-old son and a lovely
9-year-old daughter.  Gombo's mother also lives with them in their
"yurt," a circular collapsible tent covered with furs or skin. Their
living is made by tending sheep, horses and cattle for sale and food.
We see one of the sheep slaughtered, skinned, and prepared for
tonight's dinner.
Into this happy family comes a Russian truck driver, (Sergei) a
contract worker, who is helping to build a road in China that will
bring the steppes in closer comtact with the modern world.  When he
falls asleep at the wheel of his truck after having driven for 24
hours, he drives his truck's front wheels into a river.  The next day
he and truck are rescued by Gombo who invites him to join the family
for dinner and a night's rest.  They soon become good friends with
Sergei involved in several funny scenes.
Beautiful photography of the immense sweeping steppes plus a warm and
humorous story make this a most enjoyable film.   Pagma, the pretty
wife, tells Gombo that if he wants to have sex with her he had better
go into town (several hours' ride on horseback) and get some condoms at
the pharmacy.  As she was a city woman before marrying Pagma, she has
to explain contraceptives to him as he looks at her open-mouthed with a
"what will they think of next" look.
Oddly, the town has a disco where nicely dressed young men and women
are dancing up a storm, disco style;  the last thing I would have
expected to find in that part of the world.   When Pagma enters the
pharmacy with a note written by his wife so that he will know what to
ask for he finds the place staffed by a dozen pretty pharmacists, one
of whom asks if she can help.  When he looks sheepish, she says "Did
you come to buy condoms?"   ""Who, me?  Oh, no" and leaves.  His
explanation to his wife's query about the condoms is that they were
"sold out."
In town he buys a TV to bring home to the family.  He sets up the TV
antenna, hooks the set up to the generator and they all gather round to
watch.   After a couple of hours they find the 2 available channels
boring.  (They could lived in the U.S. and have had 50 boring
channels.)
Where Gombo and family used to live there now stands a smokestack
spewing black smoke.  The fourth child (born because Pagma did not get
the condoms) now works at a gas station next to the smokestack.
"Progress" is sweeping that beautiful area.
In Chinese (Mongolian?) and Russian with English subtitles.

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
Do not let the title fool you.   It could lead you to believe  this
was going to be one of the surreal films with corpses rising out of
graves.   Not at all . . . or at least only occasionally spooky.
Instead this is a tensely entertaining film about a murder and a
trial.   The acting by everyone is absolutely superb.   Good story
and great acting; what else could one ask for?
Based quite loosely on John Berendt's recounting of a murder in
Savannah, it will hold you in its grip from beginning to end.   John
Kelso (John Cusack) is a journalist who is sent by TOWN AND COUNTRY
magazine to cover a Christmas party given at the beautiful Savannah
home of wealthy, famous Jim Williams (Kevin Spacey) who is a
collector, an antique dealer, a restorer of 18th and 19th Century
homes.
What should have been a routine assignment for Kelso who would just
have to take notes on the lavishness of  the party, record who in
Georgia society attended, and other such trivia finds himself in a
room with Williams discussing the party.   Into  this room bursts
Billy Hanson (Jude Law), an obvious hustler who shouts at Williams,
knocks over an expensive antique grandfather clock and hurls threats
before he leaves in a state of drunkenness or excessive drugs.
All this is witnessed by the  journalist to whom it is obvious that
Billy lives with Williams as his lover.
When, a short while later, Williams shoots and kills Billy, (in
self-defense, he claims) the movie turns dark.   Williams is
arrested but because he is a prestigious member of Savannah society
he expects to be released at once on his own recognizance.  That
does not happen that quickly because the investigators have lots of
questions about Williams' version of what happened.
In a nice twist of irony, the film concludes exactly right.
Just about everyone in the cast is superb, from Cusack as the young
journalist, to Spacey, haughty, dignified, self-assured.   An
exceptionally able performance is given by Jack Thompson who plays
Sonny Seiler, Williams' defense attorney.
Special mention must be made of the transvestite known as The Lady
Chablis who is played by Chablis Deveau (a transvestite in real
life)  who provides both humor and pathos to the film, dominating
many of the scenes.  Add to the cast, Minerva, (Irma P. Hall) like a
one-woman Greek oracle who keeps popping up every now and then with
some pithy remark.  It was she who stole the film A FAMILY THING
with her performance in 1996.    Lastly, there is the entirely
unnecessary "love interest" played by Alison Eastwood who just
happens to be Clint Eastwood's daughter.
Do not expect the film to be faithful to the book.  See it on its
own merits which are plentiful.

Title
Review for Natural Born Killers (1994)
     NBK opens in a cafe cum gas station in an isolated part of a
desert.  While Mallory Knox (Woody Harrelson) is sitting at the counter
ordering, his girl friend, Mickey, (Juliette Lewis) turns on the juke
box.  Dressed in a tiny bra top and sexy tight-fitting clothes she does
a little dance by herself.  When three locals come in, one of them
starts dancing with her but when he thinks he is going to make headway
with her she suddenly kicks him in the groin and the whole place turns
into a mass shootout.  And that's just the first scene.
     During the film we meet Mickey's father (Rodney Dangerfield) an
abuser of his daughter; Robert Downey, Jr., as the host of a TV show,
"American Maniacs" who will do anything for a story for his program;
Tommy Lee Jones as a tough prison warden.
     The pace of the movie is frantic.  Frequently you cannot hear the
dialogue ... everyone is shouting at once and the music is blaring ...
but the "feel" of the film comes through.  The idea is that the media
hypes killers into notoriety and that there are enough idiots in this
world who look up to the killers as if they were heroes.
     All through the film there are quick flashes of predators such as
a wolf, a polar bear, snakes: natural born killers.
     Despite the total violence, none of it is for the sake of showing
blood.  It is an innate part of the story of killers without
conscience.  Except for the last scene which I found unreal, the movie
is a spellbinder.  Remember how enthralled everyone was watching TV
while O. J. Simpson rode down the freeway with the police cars following
and the helicopters overhead?  Stone is not exaggerating and therein
lies the strength of the film.
     Exceptional acting by Juliette Lewis and Robert Downey, Jr.
Harrelson is good, too, but Tommy Lee Jones got a little too hopped up
in his role.

Title
Review for Small Wonders (1996)
     Exhilarating, heartwarming, profoundly moving!   All that and
very entertaining. This is a documentary which shows that one person
can move and change the environment and lives of children.   Teacher
Roberta Guaspari-Tzavaras has done just that.   This film about her
dedication and achievements leaves you with a great feeling and a hope
for the future.
     When school funds were cut, the Arts were the first to be axed.
Music teacher Roberta would not take "no" for an answer.  She rallied
parents and friends to support her program to teach the violin to the
little kids in three schools in NYC.:  Central; Park East 1, Central
Park East 2, and RiverEast Elementary School.   Most of the children
attending those schools were from minority and poor families but
Roberta enriched their lives as she taught them to play and love the
violin.    Each year 150 children were chosen by lottery to be in the
program.   The sad part is that there was not enough funds available
to include many more children and that it is just in NYC when it
should be in every school in our country.   Violins, not guns, should
be our goal.
     It is a delight to see the children from different ethnic groups,
as they play Bach with an intensity and dedication one would not
expect of youngsters.   We see one of the annual concerts, this one at
Carnegie Hall, with the great Isaac Stern and Itzhak Perlman aLong
with many other famous professionals,  joining them in the
performances.
     There is no question about Roberta Guaspari-Tzavaras' dedication
and love of music and children.    You will not want to miss this
wonderful film.

Title
Review for Month by the Lake, A (1995)
     Here is another film that should be nominated for an Oscar ... in
just about every category.   If you loved ENCHANTED APRIL, you cannot
afford to miss A MONTH BY THE LAKE.
     The stories of the two films are entirely different but the mood,
the scenery, the acting have the same wonderful flavor that was found
in ENCHANTED APRIL.  Vanessa Redgrave (as Miss Bentley) has never been
better.  I sat transfixed as I watched this great actress do her
stuff.
     Miss Bentley has been coming with her father to a resort near
Italy's famed Lake Como since she was a child.  Now a middle-aged but
beautiful and lively spinster, this is the first time she is there
alone, her father having died that year.  "Unmarried" would be a more
accurate choice than "spinster."
     Major Wilshaw, a wealthy and fascinating man ((Edward Fox)
unexpectedly catches her eye.  This is his first visit to the resort
and she arranges to show him around.  Despite some happenings that
might have broken the light relationship they had, they somehow
continue to see a lot of each other until the young and beautiful Miss
Beaumont (Uma Thurman), a nanny to two children, makes a play for the
wealthy Major.  That is when things begin to happen;  you will not want
to miss a moment.

Title
Review for To Gillian on Her 37th Birthday (1996)
          Exactly two years ago, on Gillian's 35th birthday, the Lewis
family, consisting of Gillian (Michelle Pfeiffer), her husband Daniel
(Peter Gallagher) and daughter Rachel (Claire Danes) were out sailing.
Gillian, in a very happy mood, climbed the mast, when a gust of wind
suddenly hit the sail and she was thrown to the deck and killed. Now,
(It would have been Gillian's 37th Birthday) Daniel cannot forget her
for a moment; in fact he has been "seeing" her at the beach and
"talking" with her as if she were still alive.
          As his sister-in-law, Esther, (Kathy Baker) points out to
David, his obsession with his dead wife has estranged his relationship
with his daughter and Esther is going to go to court to obtain custody
of the young teenager unless Daniel can let go of his wife and return
to a normal existence.  Daniel will have to make his move.
         Others in the cast include Wendy Crewson, Bruce Altman,
Laurie Fortier and Freddie Prinze, Jr.
         All the acting is of high caliber and that helps make the
movie believable and touching.
        Directed by Michael Pressman who also directed the 1985
West Coast stage production.  He is the executive producer of the TV
series PICKET FENCES and has directed some of the episodes.

Title
Review for Postino, Il (1994)
     Philippe Noiret, the French actor who has been in dozens of films
is perhaps best known in the U.S. as the projectionist in the wonderful
1990 film, CINEMA PARADISO.  Here, as Pablo Neruda, he charms us once
again, this time as a famous poet who has been exiled from his native
Chile because of political reasons.  He now makes his home on a small
island in the Mediterranean. living in a secluded mountainous area
where he will not be in frequent contact with the villagers and where
he can write his poetry undisturbed.
     IL POSTINO is the story of friendship and heartbreak.
     Mario (Massimo Troisi) is the son of a fisherman but fishing is
not to his taste.  He thinks about emigrating but just then he is asked
if he would like to be the personal postman to the poet.  The area is
out of the way of the regular postman but Mario is happy not to have to
either emigrate nor fish.
     In the beginning, Mario climbs the road to Neruda's home and shyly
delivers the mail.  Neruda, though polite, at first shows little
interest in his personal mailman.  As time passes he becomes a bit more
friendly, intrigued by Mario's interest in Neruda's poetry and poetic
manner of speaking.  (While the film frequently refers to "metaphors"
it is really "similes" that are being discussed.  I suspect the
translator of having confused the two ... but no matter.)
     Mario's sole purpose in learning how to write poetry is to enchant
his beautiful Beatrice (Maria Grazia Cucinotta) with whom he is in
love.  Much of the poetry he reads to her (as his own) is really that
of Neruda.
     Heartbreak comes when Neruda receives mail that he can return to
his homeland.  They will keep in touch it says here.
In the early 1990s, Italy's famous actor Massimo Troisi, read a novel
by Skarmeta which became his inspiration for the film IL POSTINO and in
which he acted the part of Mario despite his having had a history of a
bad heart.  Twelve hours after the film's photography completion, he
died in his sleep at the age of forty-0ne.

Title
Review for Lust och fägring stor (1995)
     The story takes place in Malmo, Sweden, in 1943, a couple of years
before WW II came to an end.  Although Sweden is neutral, it has a
submarine, WOLF, which it sends out on a shakedown cruise.
     Back in Malmo, the school term has begun.  A new teacher has been
hired.  She is Viola (Marika Lagercrantz), a 37-year-old pretty woman
who has had much difficulty since she married Frank (Tomas Von Brmssen)
a traveling salesman who is not much good at his job, is also an
alcoholic who never stops drinking.  In addition, he is wont to go to
bed with other women despite his being married.
     Viola's students are about 15 years old.  One of them is a tall
handsome blond boy, Stig, (Johan Widerberg, who happens to be the son
of the film director).  Despite the age difference of 22 years, Viola
seduces Stig to the point where neither can think of much else but
going to bed.  As one might anticipate there will be no happy ending
to the people involved.
     Stig has a next door neighbor, a pretty, wholesome-looking girl,
Lisbet (Karin Huldt), the same age as Stig on whom she has a strong
crush.  Poor Lisbet is heartbroken because although she throws herself
on Stig he appears to be entirely disinterested.
     Others in the cast are Sig's brother, Sigge, (Bjrn Kjellman) who
has enlisted to sail on the submarine.  Their mother is played by Nina
Gunke.
     Directed by Bo Widerberg who also wrote and edited the film.  If
he had deleted about 10 minutes' worth of film, (128 minutes) it would
not have hurt.  Despite that, it is an excellent film, highly
recommended. Among Widerberg's many films, perhaps the best known is
the fine Elvira Madigan, made some 9 years ago.

Title
Review for Kolya (1996)
This is the Czech entry for the Academy's best Foreign Film.  I have
never yet seen a Foreign Film entry that I did not like, and KOLYA is
no exception.   True there are periods when the action does not seem to
be moving fast enough but those are mostly at the film's beginning.
The film picks up greatly, however, with the appearance of 5-year-old
Kolya (the 6-year-old Andrej Chalimon who was discovered in a
kindergarten.)
Every moment in which Kolya appears is delightful and once he enters
the story he dominates the film.  He is a very handsome child, who with
a little luck will be asked to act in many films in his future.  He
seems born to act; his face, his movements, are all professional yet
childlike.  One wants to hug him.
The story is of Fratizek Louka (Zdenek Sverak, who also wrote the
screenplay), a cellist in the Czech Philharmonic but, with Russia's
army in Czechoslovakia, he cannot earn enough to live on and so he
supplements his income by playing in a chamber group at funerals.
A friendly grave-digger suggests that Fratizek marry his niece; not a
real marriage but signing a slip of paper.  In exchange he will be paid
sufficient money to buy a small car, pay his rent.  Fratizek wants to
remain in every way a bachelor but when he sees the pretty niece, he
relents.
Things now happen quickly.    His "bride" runs off to Germany with her
lover but leaves her 5-year-old son Kolya with his "father",
Fratizek.    In no time at all, as we can easily surmise, Fratizek and
Kolya love each other as if they were, in fact, father and son.

Title
Review for It Could Happen to You (1994)
     Charlie (Nicolas Cage) is an unlikely NYC cop: honest and
dedicated beyond the call of duty.  His wife, Muriel, (Rosie Perez) and
he live in the borough of Queens in a very modest apartment house.
Muriel wants to be rich.  Muriel keeps haranguing him to be a little
less honest and pick up some extra money with which she is obsessed.
She also insists he buy a Lottery ticket despite the insane odds
against winning a jackpot.
     On Charlie's beat is a little coffee shop.  One of the waitresses
is Yvonne (Bridget Fonda).  A judge has just given her a break by
having her declared bankrupt when the husband whom she has left has run
up a $12,000 tab on their Master card.
     Charlie and his partner are having coffee when their pager goes
off calling them to an emergency.   He pays Muriel the bill but
discovers he has no change for a tip.  Instead, he promises her if he
wins the lottery he will give her half his winning; if he loses he will
be back with a tip.  This being the movies, he wins ... $4 million.
When he breaks the news to his wife that he is going to give the
waitress half of the winning "because I promised her," she hits the
ceiling.
     Up to this point the fairy tale is funny and easy enough with
which to go along.  Charlie is very nice, Yvonne is sweet and grateful
for the $2 million and wife Muriel is a riot with her tantrums.  But
the movie turns mean when Muriel becomes shrill and vindictive.  The
little fantasy we were enjoying turns real and sordid and all the fun
leaves the film.
     Isaac Hayes has a cameo as the narrator and Red Buttons does a bit
as an attorney.

Title
Review for Uomo delle stelle, L' (1995)
     Foreign language films, when well made, have a charm all their own
and THE STAR MAKER is in that class.  It holds you in its grip as the
story unfolds and while nothing earth-shaking appears to be happening,
little by little what we have been missing begins to surface.
     From one little Sicilian village to another, Joe Morelli
(Sergio Castellio), a con man, travels selling dreams to the poor
inhabitants for a fee.  Morelli looks like a good man, which is a
requisite for that kind of job.  He comes with a truck laden with
camera equipment and reels of film (long since expired) and over his
loud speaker he offers the good people, the farmers and the workers,
and the women of the town, the chance of a lifetime.  For a fee he
will give a screen test, and if he thinks you have what it takes to be
a star who will make millions, he will forward the test to Rome where
big time directors will give their opinion and send for you.  He does,
however, make no promises.
     Naturally, Morelli finds in every face in the village a potential
star. He takes them inside the tent he has set up and cajoles them into
speaking.  If they do not know what to say, he gives them some famous
lines from GONE WITH THE WIND.  If they falter he encourages them to
say anything that comes to mind.  Thus the personal lives of the conned
are revealed.  The urge to do well spurs them on to tell all.
     One such is the beautiful girl, Beata (Tiziana Lodato) who was
brought up in a convent since she was a baby.  She dreams about going
to Rome and becoming a big star and is willing to do anything (which
she has never done before) to raise the money for the screen test.
     The film is, not surprisingly, very good as the director is the
one who gave us the wonderful CINEMA PARADISO.  STAR MAKER has its dark
moments but they only reveal the harm the con man has inflicted on
these poor people but gullible villagers.

Title
Review for Matilda (1996)
          In probably the funniest summer film this season, Mr
Wormwood and wife, (Danny DeVito and Rhea Perlman)  aided by  Matilda
(Mara Wilson) make a most hilariously enjoyable movie for both
children and adults alike.  By all means, this is not to be missed.
          Matilda is a very, very bright child whom the parents are
too stupid to notice.  At her very first birthday, with a nice
chocolate cake in front of her, she spells out her name on the
chocolate: M A T I L D A.   The idiot parents berate her for ruining
the cake, never noticing that the one-year-old is spelling.
          By the time she is 8-years-old she has devoured almost every
book in the library . . . and we do not mean those that have pictures.
Her father wants her to stop reading and watch TV.  "What can you
learn from a book that you can't learn better from TV?" he demands.
"And, by the way, what book are you reading now; she shows him it's
MOBY DICK."   In a frenzy he tears out the pages and berates her for
reading porno books.
               At school, she is sent to an institution that is more
like a jail, with the headmistress, Trunchbull, (Pam Ferris) , more of
a mean old witch than a school principal.   Fortunately, there is Miss
Honey, (Embeth Davidtz) Matilda's teacher, who helps and understands
the child's genius.

Title
Review for Mrs. Brown (1997)
Despite the unprepossessing but quite appropriate name of MRS. BROWN,
the film is the very best so far this year   "Superb, Intriguing, Gripping," all come to mind in this true story of England's Queen Victoria (Judy Dench) and her servant, John Brown (Billy Connolly) with whom she fell in love.  Seldom has History been more interestingly brought to the screen.
A mere eighteen when she was married to Albert, Queen Victoria went into deep depression when her husband died.   Not wishing to see anyone, unable to be consoled, she had a profound effect on the country she ruled.  While at first England extended great sympathy to their beloved Queen after the passage of a few years during which she partook of no ceremonies, the public began to feel somewhat short-changed.
1864.  The Queen decides she needs someone to care for her horses. The man hired is John Brown, a tall and handsome Scotsman.  As if part of a romantic novel, the Queen falls in love with him, much to the dismay of her children, the rest of her family and of her loyal subjects who are unhappy about this commoner, this servant.   Everyone begins to resent and babble about Brown who is always at her side. He has assigned himself as her protector, as a kind of security guard and not even her son, The Prince of Wales (David Westhead), can have an audience with her unless Brown gives his assent.  But the Queen? She has not been this alive in many years.
Meanwhile, a storm is brewing, aided by the gossip newspapers of that day in rumor-mongering who now refer to the Queen as "Mrs. Brown."  Even Prime Minister Disraeli (Anthony Sher) comes to call on Brown to  tell him the queen must come out of hiding and return to Windsor to partake in the events of the country or the monarchy may be in grave danger.
This then is a true romantic story of great love and loyalty taking place on the highest plateaus of nobility.  To relieve the tenseness of the main story, there are the three Maids-in-Waiting who march just behind the queen in case she wants something.  When she stops her brisk walk, they stop.  The director has choreographed that episode into a quaint ballet-like humorous sequence.
No review of MRS. BROWN could be complete without mentioning the very
MEMORABLE performance by Judy Dench, at times imperious, and other
times, just a vulnerable woman who loves a man regardless of the consequences and who forbids him to ever leave her.   Connolly, as the object of her love, is very believable; little wonder that a queen would fall in love with him . . . kilt and all.
Mention, too, must be made of the screenplay and literate dialogue by Jeremy Brock, as well as the music composed by Stephen Warbeck.  The fact is, everyone in the cast is first class in this most entertaining film.

Title
Review for Breaking the Waves (1996)
The ads say "On over 75 Ten Best lists," to which I say that I would
hate to believe that is true..  This endlessly boring film took almost
165 minutes before, thankfully, it came to an end. What is it with
editors who will not cut long dull scenes, who will not delete
unnecessary action?   What is it with critics who go wild over
pretentious films?
Breaking the Waves is about miracles and having chats with God; Bess
(Emily Watson) talks to God and from what she is saying and at what she
is smiling, He apparently is on the same channel.  However, the advice
He seems to be handing her is really not very good, ungodly, and gets
her into an awful lot of trouble.
Bess, who has a sweet expressive face, lives in a small town in
Scotland.  She marries. Hwr husband (Stellen Skarsgard) works on a ship
at sea doing something with pipes and oil (?).  When an accident occurs
and Bess's husband is paralyzed, bedridden and with a prognosis of his
never being able to walk again nor really improving, Bess takes it very
hard.
Wife Bess is one loyal woman, always at his bedside. When her husband
says he would like her to have sex with "someone" and then come back
and tell him about it, it would be as if he and she had had sex.
Sure.  First Bess says she cannot do that but then she hits on the
doctor.  He very ethical will not touch her.  While she lies in the
nude on a mattress, inviting him, he tells her to get dressed.   But
there are many others in the city, on ships, in bars, on a bus, who
accept her offers.
Bess is doing this for her husband who, it is quite obvious to even
this layman, is on his deathbed.  As Bess tells everyone, she is not
making love, she is only offering a sacrifice for her husband, hoping
God will work a miracle.
Also stars Katrin Cartlidge, Jean-Marc Barr and Udo Kier. 
Directed by Lars Von Trier.

Title
Review for Casino (1995)
In Casino, director Martin Scorsese takes a good look at those who run
Las Vegas' casinos as well as the also-rans.  The thought that some 30
million people visit Las Vegas each year (and, I confess to being one
of them), is enough to make you sick at heart. You may win now and then
but in the final computation everyone is a loser.  Of course, that does
not include the gangsters who run the casinos. For them it's a gold
mine.
Scorsese's film is based on the real life story (from Nicholas
Pileggi's book) of Sam "Ace" Rothstein, a big time bookie, who was sent
to Las Vegas by "the mob" to find out who was stealing, who tinkered
with the mechanisms of slot machines so they would win huge jackpots,
and to put a stop to it, as well as watch that the blackjack dealers
were kept honest.  Oddly, you are left with a lot of empathy for
Rothstein (Robert De Niro) largely because the way he plays his role
and Scorsese's direction.
While Rothstein may have known everything there was to know about
gambling, drugs, prostitution, alcohol. etc. he nevertheless falls
heavily for Ginger McKenna (Sharon Stone).  He even goes so far as to
marry her, while she becomes a drug and alcohol user. This bodes no
good for Ace.   I do not think it did much for Sharon Stone, either, as
I felt she was miscast.
There is one other main character, Nicky (Joe Pesci), a childhood
friend of Ace, but too much of a trigger-happy mobster. Pesci runs away
with the film as he bends all his efforts to take over the operations
from his pal, Ace.
Also in the cast but in smaller roles are Alan King, James Woods, Don
Rickles L Q Jones and Kevin Pollak.

Title
Review for Out to Sea (1997)
How could a movie starring two great actors turn out so pitiful I
had to force myself to sit through the screening? When I think of
the innumerable films that Walter Matthau has made and those of
Jack Lemmon, it really hurts to report that this was a fiasco: two
old men, and they do look old, acting so out of character and
looking lost and ridiculous as they meander and stumble through it all.
It is not that the story is bad; it's that Casting and the
Director should never have chosen the two fine actors for these
roles.   Charlie (Matthau) plays the horses and always loses.  In
deep debt to his bookie, he dreams up a scheme whereby he and his
brother-in-law Herb (Lemmon) will get a job on a cruise ship as
dancers (read "gigolos") where they will charm the single ladies
who want male companionship on the cruise.  They will then fleece
the women and Charlie will be able to pay off his bookies.
Two big obstacles are that both look very aged.  What woman in her
right (or any mind) would look upon them as potential catches?
Why would a very good-looking, young-looking Liz (Dyan Cannon)
give even a passing glance at Charlie.  Why would the lovely Vivian
(Gloria De Haven) think she would like to marry the decrepit Herb?
Give me a break!   Add to that, that although Charlie and Herb are
hired as dance companions for the women, Charlie cannot even
dance.
What we have is a fine cast that is utterly drowned at sea.  There
is Hal Linden and there is Donald O'Connor in little more than
cameos.  While Linden looks as handsome as ever there is one scene
where O'Connor's paunch makes him look about 6 months pregnant.
Why would he have allowed himself to be so badly served when he
should want to be remembered as the suave, handsome, great dancer
he was?
Among the others drowning in  OUT TO SEA are Elaine Strich, Rue
McClanahan and Brent Spiner.   Sad.
Directed by Martha Coolidge who has made some pretty good films in
the past:  Lost in Yonkers, Angie, Rambling Rose, etc .  This one
she had better forget.

Title
Review for Johnny Stecchino (1991)
        This Italian belly-laugher stars Roberto Benigni in the
dual roles of Dante, an inept, unhandsome, nice guy, who drives a
school bus for Down Syndrome children, and that of a Palermo
Mafioso, Johnny Stecchino, who made the mistake of ratting on his
fellow gangsters.
        As Dante, nothing good ever happens to him.  No one ever
notices him.  At parties he may as well be invisible.  One day,
quite by accident, he meets the beautiful Maria (Nicoletta
Braschi) who takes him in hand because unknown to the naive Dante,
Maria has recognized that he is a dead ringer for her boyfriend,
Johnny, a squealer who is in hiding from the Mafia who would like
to rub him out.
       Johnny is nicknamed Stecchino (toothpick) because he always has
one in his mouth.  When Dante, while dining in a restaurant with Maria,
puts a toothpick in his mouth, Maria tells him she wants to call him
"Johnny Stecchino," the plot being that Dante will be passed off as the
gangster, killed by the Mafia, and Maria and the real Johnny will fly off
to another country to live happily ever after.
      Running along with the above are several other very funny
plots. Dante has a penchant for stealing bananas. He also is being
investigated by an insurance detective who suspects that Dante's
uncontrollable right hand is a scam on which he is collecting
disability compensation.  (It is and he is.)  There is also heroin
that Dante is told is a medicinal powder that controls diabetes.
All of the above are cleverly interwoven into the main story to
make this one of the funniest comedies of the year.
      Roberto Benigni combines all the talent of the slapstick
comedians who have made us laugh all these years.
      Screenplay by Vincenzo Cerami and Roberto Benigni. .

Title
Review for Sense and Sensibility (1995)
     On first hearing about SENSES AND SENSIBILITY, written by Jane
Austen 200 years ago, (her first novel), the screenplay by Emma
Thompson (her first screenplay) and directed by the Taiwanese Ang Lee
(THE WEDDING BANQUET, EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN), one could not help but
wonder what the film might turn out to be.  Put away your fears.  The
combination, along with some fine acting, has emerged as probably the
best film of the year.
     Lots of things have changed in 200 years.  They had no cars, no
TV, etc., and their lifestyles were very much different than is ours
today.  But emotions have not had a metamorphosis.  Then, as now,
there were good people and bad, the selfish and the generous, and
through it all was "love" and desire and decorum.
     SENSE AND SENSIBILITY is essentially about two sisters and the men
they desired and those who wanted the sisters to be their wife.  That
was not as easy as it sounds.  Money and station in life are here looked
upon very carefully by both the sisters, the men, the parents.
     All of this is carefully laid out in a complex but orderly
fashion.  Thompson wisely stuck as closely to Austen's book as film-
making would allow and, with a fine director, we have a masterpiece.
     Very briefly, the story is that the law in England at that time
said that the estate of the father went to his son.  When the father,
Henry Dashwood, (Tom Wilkinson) was dying he told his son by his first
wife.  John (James Fleet), how he wanted the estate handled.  The elder
Dashwood had been married before.  By his second wife, (Gemma Jones),
he had three daughters.  From John, he extracted the promise that the
widow and her three daughters would be well taken care of but it was
not long before John's wife, Fanny (Harriet Walter) began, after the
death of her father-in-law, to minimize the amount John had been
intending to give the widow and daughters, and helped to make their
life miserable.
     At the first opportunity, the widow and her children, with little
money of their own, moved away but before that happened, the eldest
daughter, Elinor, (Emma Thompson) had fallen in love with Fanny's
brother, Edward (Hugh Grant).  While it seemed as if they were
engaged, when Elinor moved with her mother and sisters, the expected
visits from Edward did not occur.  Elinor was hurt but took things as
well as she could.  The film's other love story is that of the younger
sister, Marianne (Kate Winslett) and the several men who fell in love
with her.
     Faithful to the period in every respect, the movie depicts the
lives, the yearnings of the people involved.  How far does one go in
declaring one's love?   Is a man 35-years-old too decrepit to marry a
27-year-old?   Is a woman in her late twenties "over the hill?"  These
and many other questions are encountered and resolved in a most
proficient manner, aided by such fine actors as Alan Rickman, Robert
Hardy, Elizabeth Spriggs, and Emile Franois and others.  All have
important roles and all do well by them.

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
OUT OF THIS WORLD!  EXTRATERRESTRIAL AND EXTRA-HILARIOUS!   The Sci-Fi
genre has never been this funny.  With some witty lines written by
screen story and screenplay writer Ed Solomon, free rein is given to
Tommy Lee Jones in his role of K, the man in black who works for the
unofficial government agency that monitors aliens on Earth.  There
credo is "Protecting the Earth from the scum of the universe." K spouts
some very funny lines despite his tongue never leaving his cheek.
Jones is terrific.  Look for lots of belly-laughs.  Why are these
agents called "MEN IN BLACK?" Because they dress in black, why else?
When  Zed (Rip Torn), the chief of the agency, learns that inhabitants
of another planet are planning on conquering Earth, he assigns J (Will
Smith) to help K save us. It is good to see Smith again on the large
screen after that fine performance in SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION of a
few years ago. Casting could not have chosen a better actor for the
role of J.
The evil extraterrestrial, Edgar, (Vincent D'Onofrio) visits a
farmhouse, takes over the farmer's body and for the rest of the movie
grimaces and walks around like a Dr. Frankenstein's monster reject . .
. except that Edgar is a takeoff on monsters and a funny takeoff it
is.
When some strange deaths occur, the bodies are turned over to a medical
examiner, Dr. Laura Weaver (the pretty Linda Fiorentino) who becomes
involved with the monsters and with trying to save the planet.
Special effects include the gelatinous slime that the aliens squirt at
the Earthlings.   There is an alien, Mikey, whose exterior is that of a
Mexican immigrant but he cannot fool our hero, K, who rips off his
false face to expose his hideous, slimy real self while immigration
border patrol police are shocked.  Then there is the High Priest of
Baltia who likewise uses a human disguise.
The visual special effects were supervised by Eric Brevig; (Industrial
Light & Magic) the alien make-up by Rick Baker.   These are all
excellent.   The film is based on the Malibu Comic by Lowell
Cunningham.

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
I screamed all the way through Woody Allen's latest film, stopping only
to catch my breath but maintaining a fixed grin.  Only Allen could have
pulled off so many outrageously funny scenes.  No other writer would
have thought of the scenes that Allen envisioned; no other director
would have dared attempt those scenes if he had ever thought of them;
and no other director could have made the scenes come off perfectly.
Genius.
When Allen realized no one had made a musical in some ten years it
immediately hit him that that is what he should be doing . . . except
it would be an Allen musical than which there are nor ever have been
anything similar.  The songs used in the film, of the 1930s and 1940s
era, are nostalgic but Allen does not rest on that;  the songs have to
further the story, not be inserted merely because they are melodic.
When the engaged-to-be-married Holden and Skylar break up, (Edward
Norton and Drew Barrymore), Holden sings "I'll Never fall In Love
Again."   This holds true for all the approximately 25 songs used. . .
always either carrying the story along or describing the emotions of
the singer.
Every scene is a belly laugh . . . even when tinged with a bit of
nostalgia.  Try these: The engagement ring, the funeral parlor, the
Groucho homage, the hospital, Steffi (Goldie Hawn) and  Joe  (Woody
Allen), ex-wife and her husband, doing a dance.  Then there is
Halloween, there is Charles Ferry (Tim Roth), an ex-convict who is
invited to her home by the liberal Steffi.  And Itzhak Perlman and
Julia Roberts and Alan Alda . . . and on and on.
If a good story about dysfunctional families means anything; if great
entertainment and feeling good mean anything; if brilliant writing and
fast-paced  direction mean anything for Oscar consideration, Woody
Allen and Company deserve a clean sweep. Don't miss the cinema genius
of our times as he works his magic.

Title
Review for Making of ...And God Spoke, The (1993)
     Two wannabee moviemakers in Hollywood, Clive (Michael Riley) and
Marvin (Stephen Rapport), are looking to break into big time.  Utterly
talentless but eager, they hit upon making a movie about the Bible
because of its built in audience.  Some four billion people have read the
Book and will be flocking to the theaters to see their opus.  Sure. The
good news is that they have deleted all the depressing parts.
     So what if there were actually twelve Apostles?  Clive and
Marvin's budget only allows for eight; who will know the difference?
Brando decides not to be in their film but Soupy Sales is available and
willing to play Moses.  Because the filmmakers need money they agree to
product placement so Moses is holding a six-pack in one hand and the
Tablets in the other.
     Everything that can go wrong does because Clive and Marvin have
not the faintest idea of what they are doing.  When they are about to
film Eve in the Garden of Eden, they discover the actress (Christie
Michelle) whom they have selected to play Eve has tattoos all over her
body.  Cain is Lou Ferrigno, the giant hulk.
     Obviously, the film is not for those who take the Bible
"religiously."  But if you have a sense of humor about Life and
Religion, you'll find God, Jesus, Mary, Noah, etc. portrayed in this
satire film.
     First-time filmmaker, Arthur Borman, who apparently has lots of
experience in how a film is born, produced, made and marketed, directed
this very funny takeoff on that very subject.

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
 With all the betrayals among almost all the characters in this
crime-caper film, the laughs come fast and frequent.  Just about the
only non-betrayer is the white bail bondsman, Max Cherry (Robert
Forster) who is attracted to the black airline stewardess cum cash
smuggler Jackie Brown (Pam Grier).   Strong performances by both aid
immensely in the enjoyment and believability of the film,.
 Jackie, who works for a small airline, adds to her income by
smuggling cash for the gunrunner, Ordell Robbie (Samuel L Jackson).
In fact that is where she gets in big trouble with a Los Angeles
policeman, Dargus (Michael Bowen) and  Federal government agent,
Nicolette (Michael Keaton) who would like to throw Robbie in jail.
For this they need the help of Jackie.   Caught with the cash, she
is given the option of naming Ordell as the real owner of the money,
or they will see that she goes to jail . . . and she promises
herself she is never going to go to jail.
 What makes the movie a delight are the full-fleshed characters, all
played skillfully and frequently sympathetically.    There is, of
course, Robbie, who has a young floozie living in one of his
hideouts.   That is Melanie Ralston (Bridget Fonda in perhaps her
best acting) as a nymphet.    Playing off each other is the somewhat
dim-witted Louis Gara (Robert De Niro in a delightful role he must
have enjoyed doing immensely).    Melanie, who looks like a dumb
blonde turns out to be quite a bit less stupid than one would have
guessed.   Some very funny dialog when Robbie asks Gara if he went
to bed with Melanie whom he had instructed to "take care of Gara"
while Robbie was going out for a bit.
 Bail bondsman Forster is perfect for his role as is Pam Grier with
her crooked smile. With good dialog by Quentin Tarantino the movie,
while not as good as his    PULP FICTION, is one not to be missed.
For one thing, while there are substantial amounts of gore,
Tarantino wisely opted to keep imuch of it off-screen.  Movies have
already reached the point of overdoing mayhem and blood.   Time the
directors pulled back a bit and left something to our imagination.
In this, Tarantino succeeds nicely.

Title
Review for Perez Family, The (1995)
     Back in 1980, the U.S. and Castro reached an agreement whereby
Fidel would allow thousands of Cubans to emigrate to the U.S.  This
became known as the Mariel boatlift.  Among those who in the film who
are on one of the boats is the hyper, lovely, sexy, irrepressible
Dottie (Marisa Tomei) and a handsome man, Juan Raul Perez (Alfred
Molina).  Juan has just been freed after 20 years in jail and expects
to have his wife Carmela (Anjelica Huston) waiting for him when the
boat docks.  In the turmoil of the landings, the going through a not
particularly friendly Immigration, they do not meet and she assumes he
is dead.
     Miami's Little Havana is colorfully photographed but only a hint
of the miserable conditions that exist there that have made it the
capital of crime in the U.S., is actually shown.  While not a political
film, it would not have hurt to show that the freedom the refugees
expected to find in the U.S. was not entirely all that they had been
lead to believe.  Drugs, prostitution, crowded conditions, are more or
less skimmed over.  Rather than a political film it is a romantic
comedy.
     When the detective (Chazz Palminteri), looking for illegal aliens,
arrives at Carmela Perez's home he is instantly smitten with her.  She,
for her part, thinking her husband is dead in Cuba, is amenable to his
advances.  Palminteri is one of the finest actors currently appearing
on the screen.  He looks like a Hollywood stereotypical Italian
gangster (he was the gangster in THE BRONX TALE ... and also wrote
the story) ... and was the gangster whose job it was to watch over
the dumb blond actress in Woody Allen's BULLETS OVER BROADWAY.  But
he exudes a certain charm, a goodness and kindness that are always
evident.  He is in a class by himself.
     Most of the story concerns getting together a Perez family as the
more there are in the family, the less time will have to be spent
before being released in Miami.  The hilarious comedy scenes derive
from getting this mythical family together to present to Immigration
and sexy Dottie will knock you out with her innocence, charm and
wiggling.
     Everyone in the cast is terrific but Tomei (who put on 20 pounds
on her derriere so she could swing it wildly) and her wholesome lovely
smile and good humor are what carries the movie.

Title
Review for Io speriamo che me la cavo (1993)
     What a delightful, heart-warming, film!   What a dedicated teacher
and what a bunch of irresistible third grade rascals he inherits as his
students ... just as soon as he can round them up from their busy work
schedules.
     Professore Spetelli (Paulo Villaggio) is the maestro who finds
himself in a suburb of Naples in southern Italy.  He had asked to be
assigned to the town of Corsano but through a computer error he is
appointed to teach at Corzano where the Mafia rules, where his students
are truants who work in the barber shop, the gas station, engage in the
black market and are priming themselves to graduate to the Mafia.
Maestro Spetelli involves himself with the students and, eventually,
they with him in this hilarious yet poignant film.
     Villaggio is wonderful; the kindness shines from his face.   The
young boys and girls are uninhibited in their language and their acting
is astonishingly  superb.  Put that all together, hand the reins over
to a great director, and you come up with perhaps the best film so far
this year.
Directed beautifully by Lina Wertmuller.

Title
Review for Pelle erobreren (1987)
A riveting film, a work of art.  From the first frames where out of an
opaque fog there appear the dim outlines of the masts of a schooner,
the film is a masterpiece of photography and story telling.
The time is about the early 1900s.  Huddled on the ship are immigrants
from Sweden who are going to Denmark for work because of bad times in
Sweden.  Among the passengers is an older man (Max Von Sydow), a
widower since a year,  and his 10-year-old son, Pelle (Pelle
Hvenegaard).
The father tells Pelle that in this new land children do not have to
work.  They can spend their time at play.  But we soon see that it is
all bravado.  Father is a loser.  Whether because of circumstances or
of an innate lack of character it becomes apparent that Father meets
each challenge by backing down.  On the other hand one must feel sorry
for this pathetic man because he cannot afford to take risks.
On the dock people are being hired.  Not surprisingly, he is the last
one to be chosen, along with his son.  It appears to be some kind of
indentured servitude;  lodging and food, and after several years there
is the payoff in money and becoming a free man.  Lodging for Pelle and
his father consists of a partitioned portion of the barn, next to the
cattle and the chickens, hardly the life he had described to his son.
Running through the film are several other stories that blend with the
main one, each interesting in its own right.  There is the fascinating
tale of the beautiful young working woman who is in love with a
merchant's son; there is the dream of one worker of being free the next
year and of going to America to make his fortune about which, poor man,
he has no doubts.
Throughout, the photography is beautiful, with scenes that are sheer
Breughel or Millet. Other scenes, with snow blowing icily across the
fields, convey the bitter cold.  And there is the raging sea, the fog,
the broken floating ice floes all interwoven to emphasize the hardships
all must face in that climate.  You will marvel at the nastiness of
adults and children, alike, when they have the power to impose their
will on those not in a position to fight back.  A powerful masterpiece
of man's inhumanity to man.
In Danish and Swedish with English subtitles.

Title
Review for Arrival, The (1996)
Over the years there have been very few science-fiction films that have
turned me on, for the simple reason that they are usually hokey,
completely unbelievable   It was therefore a pleasure to watch a film
of that genre that deals with the subject matter that is based on
current scientific knowledge.   Further, the music, composed by Arthur
Kempel, fits perfectly with the story yet is unobtrusive;  the sets are
realistic, and the special effects by Charles L. Finance were exactly
right for the film.  In short, not only is the story a good one, it
includes a warning  for those of us for whom Planet Earth is our only
home. Pretty nearly everything in the film is superb.
Zane Zaminski (Charlie Sheen)  is a scientist  whose hobby is listening
to the skies for  a sound, an indication, that life on some other solar
system is trying to communicate with us.  He spends night after night,
for many years, just listening with huge antennas.  This leads to
neglect of his wife, Char (Teri Polo) as he cannot tear himself away
from his "hobby."  Working and listening with him is another scientist,
Calvin (Richard Schiff).
It is generally conceded by most people who are knowledgeable about
such things that mathematically, it is almost a certainty that given
the incredible number of solar systems, with each star in the heaven
being a sun, that Earth is the only place where a life form exists. It
therefore is reasonable to assume that one day we will hear from them.
To the great delight and awe that their dream and efforts have come
true,  Zane and Calvin hear and see on their computer's monitor what
can almost surely be a signal from some far away solar system. They
record the sound and the picture on the screen and rush to their
superior at the JPL laboratory to show what they have found.
To their astonishment, their boss, Gordian (Ron Silver) belittles the
whole thing and tells them to forget it as it is only nonsense. They
beg him to take a look at the tape and give him a copy.  When they
leave, he breaks the tape and throws it in the trash.  Ron Silver, by
the way, straightfaced throughout the film, gives a great performance
as one of the key figures in the film.
Shortly after the discussion with Gordian, Zane is fired  because of
downsizing??? The next day his friend, Calvin, is killed.  He is one
among others who mysteriously die.  Is someone trying to keep a
secret?  Is the government afraid that news of communication with
another solar system will panic the people on Earth?
At this point, the film begins to pick up even more speed and
excitement.  There is the pre-teen black kid neighbor, Kiki (Tony T
Johnson) who is curious and Zane lets him in to his lab and shows him
the computer.and other instruments.  Kiki will play an important part
in the film as it develops.   Scientist Ilana Green (Lindsay Crouse) is
worried about the increasingly warm weather the Earth is having each
year, as we all should be.   If this continues the ice at the poles
will begin to melt and our seas will rise and the beaches and nearby
cities will be under water.  It is something about which the
governments of the world (as well as the people) should be concerned.
Here, then, is a fine film you will not want to miss.  It is unlike any
science-fiction film you have ever seen.  Charlie Sheen is great as the
serious scientist who wants to get to the bottom of what he sees as a
conspiracy.   Find out about the Aliens for yourself!

Title
Review for Métisse (1993)
     The young (26-year-old) French Mathieu Kassovitz, in his
directorial debut, has made a delightful comedy about two men in love
with the same woman and she with them.  Kassovitz also wrote the screen
play and dialogue.
     In the opening scene, we see Felix, who is a bike messenger, only
twenty years old, flying through Paris at top speed on his bike.  He is
on his way to the beautiful eighteen-year-old West Indian, Lola, who
has the beautiful skin color that matches cafe au lait.
     The other man in love with Lola is Jamal, also twenty, a Muslim.
He comes from a family of high ranking diplomats and has real class.
     When the two men arrive, Lola surprises them with a bit of news:
she is pregnant, is determined to have the baby but does not know which
of her two lovers is the father.  How the problems are resolved and how
well Kassovitz handles the movie makes up the film.
     Very entertaining.   In French with English subtitles.

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
With the exception of the unforgettable FANTASIA, there has been nothing in
the field of animation to compare with Disney's MULAN.   The graphics were
absolutely captivating.   The battle scenes, the spears and arrows in the
air, the city below, the snow,   the crowd of 2,000 Huns on horseback,
7.000 lanterns, a crowd of 30,000. . .  everything with perfection.
Then there is the wonderful story, in fact a great poem, (which originated
during the Northern Wei Dynasty (386-534 AD) that the Chinese have been
relating to their children for some 2000 years so that everyone in China is
as familiar with the story as we here are with Pocohantas.   The original
great poem begins with the sound of a loom, "Zhi-zhi, zhi-zhi."  The poem's
story over the many years of telling have resulted in many versions.    It
should be noted that unlike the MULAN film being reviewed here, the only
love interest in all the stories was one of the paternal-filial
kind.   Hollywood added Captain Shang (voice of B.  D.  Wong).
The current film is based on the story version by the famous
children's books writer, Robert D San Souci.   China has been
invaded by the Hun, Shan-Yu (Miguel Ferrer).  The Emperor (Pat
Morita) decrees that every household must send one male to help
fight the invader.  Mulan (Ming-Na Wen), a feisty, brainy young lady
who, according to custom should be getting married, is very upset
because her aged father, Fa Zhou (Soon-Tek Oh) the only male, is
thinking of joining the army and will surely be killed.  She throws
all caution aside, dresses like a male and secretly sets off to join
the army where she does heroic duty and helps save the day.
In the film, Mulan is slightly wounded, which is when it is revealed
to Captain Shang by the attending  physician that Mulan is woman.
In the original poem, the revelation comes when she returns home
from the war with a medal given her by the Emperor and the treasured
sword.    Adding the captain as the love interest does not hurt
anything.
There is the delightful character,  the dragon, Mushu, (Eddie
Murphy) who was originally an ornament on an incense burner who
comes alive to help Mulan.   There's the matchmaker (Miriam
Margolyes), there's Mulan's gruff but good-hearted comrade in arms,
Yao (Harvey Fierstein), Shang's singing voice (Donny Osmond), and
more.
One more word about the original poem which ended with a sentence
that became famous in China:   If two rabbits run side by side, how
can you tell which is the male and which the female?
Songs and music by Matthew Wilder, lyrics by David Zippel, and an
original score by Jerry Goldsmith.
Everyone connected with the film should be very proud.  It is
magnificent.

Title
Review for Dream for an Insomniac (1998)
            ****************************************************
Tiffanie DeBartolo, wrote and directed this very charming film.  There is
nothing to indicate that this is her first full-length movie.    Delightful
from start to finish, with a real-life take on young men and women in love,
one would hope that it gets the wide distribution it deserves.
The cast was carefully and wisely chosen.  The lead roles of Frankie (Ione
Skye)  the starry-eyed lady who suddenly falls in love, and  the handsome
David (Mackenzie Astin),  on to the supporting role of Allison (Jennifer
Aniston) who lightens up the screen every time she is on.   Allison is
Frankie's best friend; would that everyone had a best friend such as she.
Then there is Uncle Leo, (Seymour Cassel), who gives Frankie his approval
of David. And who would not?  David is handsome, and everything else a
young woman who is looking for an attachment would want.
Frankie has had a rough few years of never finding "Mr. Right."   Never
wanting a second date because there is always something wrong, she is
overwhelmed at her first sight of David.  How nice, at last.   But right
about when everything appears to be perfect, in walks Molly (Leslie
Stevens) who just happens to be David's  fiancee about whom he has made no
mention to Frankie.
Most women perhaps would have cried and cried and bemoaned their fate. . .
and Frankie does that.   But she also is determined to let David know what
he will be missing if he does not return to her.     With only 2 days left
before she and Allison are to leave for the West Coast for auditions, she
has no time to waste.   Cut to the chase!

Title
Review for Someone Else's America (1995)
     In this beautifully told story of two immigrants and their
families in America,  we feel the difficulties they encounter, the
homesickness, the troubles they must endure.  Despite that, the film
has its many humorous moments in between the pathos.  That the
direction and acting, as well as the story, are so good make this one
of the year's better films.
     Alonso (Tom Conti) is a legal immigrant from Mexico, supporting
his blind mother (Maria Casares) who yearns for Spain, her homeland.
Alonso's  income is from a  small bar he owns, the Paradiso, in a poor
neighborhood in Brooklyn.  Employed  at the bar, and living there, is
Bayo (Miki Manojlovic) who is from the faraway land of Montenegro.
Unlike Alonso, Bayo is here illegally.  Of the pittance he earns in
various other small jobs, he sends money back home to his mother, Anja
(Zorka Manojlovic) so she can take care of his three children.
However, he is unaware that his mother is not receiving the money and
that his children are heartbroken at their father's absence.
     The youngest daughter, Savka (Andjela Stojkovic) is ill with
yearning, the youngest son, Pepe (Lazar Kalmic) is a dear boy, but the
oldest son Luka, (Sergei Trifunovic) is a rebel always in trouble with
the authorities.   Grandma Anja decides that only by taking them to
America can she handle the problems caused by the  lack of money and
her ability to care for her three grandchildren.    The trip to the
U.S., via Mexico. and the attempt at illegal entry engender the
saddest part of the film as in crossing the Rio Grande, Pepe loses his
treasured accordion, lets go of the rope that directs them to the U.S.
and, a non-swimmer, goes after the accordion..   His father Bayo will
not believe the child has drowned and will not give up the search for
him, shouting "PEPE!  PEPE!"  as he walks along the shore.
     Alonso and Bayo are from two different worlds but their
friendship  is binding.    This bonding and the smaller stories that
are in the film make it one that you will savor, that you will not
soon forget..    Do not miss this unassuming little gem..

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
Right up front I have to admit that before attending a screening of
PRIVATE PARTS, the only thing I knew about Howard Stern was based on
the occasional articles I had read in the Los Angeles Times.   None of
it was flattering.   I was, therefore, expecting to see an outrageously
disgusting display by this top-rated  radio talk-show host.  In that, I
was not disappointed; he is disgusting and he is outrageous.
However, to my surprise, I found him a warm person, a devoted husband
and a loving father.  In addition, he is in no way stupid.
College-educated  in Communications, he seems to have learned more than
many who are currently executives in radio and TV.
Howard's goal was to stop being hired and fired by every radio station
all over the country.   He wanted to be number one, have a secure job,
and do things his way.   He then surrounded himself with some wonderful
people, notably Robin Quivers, elevating her from just reading the
weather reports to engaging in exchanges with Howard.  How the
executives railed against that!  How they screamed that they were
losing advertising clients.   All of this, of course, until the ratings
started coming in and they realized they had a gold mine.   So, if
Howard Stern is disgusting, what can one say of those who hired him,
wanted to fire him, but succumbed to the ratings?  Who has fewer decent
values?
The "utterly without redeeming qualities" of many of his gags are,
pitifully, funny but I am not about to enumerate them.   My
understanding is that the director and Stern both did not want to
soft-pedal any of what really has taken place on some of his shows, so
we get to see a few choice ones.   Even as we gag, we laugh.   Some are
so infantile, it speaks volumes about the public that adores him.
One executive explained that of those who listen to his programs, there
are those who love him and want to know what next outrageous thing he
is going to say or do.  For those who watch but hate him, they do it
because they want to know what next outrageous thing he is going to say
or do. So there you have the reason for his large audience, as well as
the sales of his book, PRIVATE PARTS.
Mention must be made of the cast, many of whom are real-life people
from his show as well as others who make this a very funny movie:   In
addition to Howard and Robin, there are Mary McCormack who plays his
wife; Fred Norris who plays himself as he has been on Stern's show as
engineer for some 18 years;  Jack Martling, the show's real head
writer; Gary Dell'Abate, the producer of Howard's show . . . and a
dozen others who contribute to the film, including some stunning
nudes.
So, if you are squeamish, perhaps you ought to stay away.  But if you
are able, as I was, to enjoy the spectacle of Howard Stern putting
everyone on . . . and I have no doubt but that is exactly what he is
doing, . .  I suggest you catch PRIVATE PARTS and get yourself a good
laugh while learning about the phenomenon that is Howard Stern.

Title
Review for Sydney (1996)
HARD 8 is so perfect in every respect, it is hard to know where to
begin.  Let us start with the writing by Paul Thomas Anderson..   There
is not a word in the entire film's dialog that should be changed.
Every word has meaning; every word carries with it questions that are
raised as the story progresses.   I cannot recall when last I saw a
movie with dialog as well written. . . and delivered.
Then there is the acting.  The film has a  superb cast starting with
"Sydney," (Philip Baker Hall who one would hope will be remembered when
Best Actors are being nominated for 1997 films.)  What about the
direction, also by Anderson?  And the editing by Barbara  Tulliver of
this very taut story that feels as if at any moment something will snap
and you hope it will not.
Sydney, a middle aged  well-dressed man approaches a down and out loser
who is sitting hunched outside a coffee shop.  That is John (John C
Reilly).  Sydney asks John if he would like a cup of coffee.  John asks
for a cigarette and follows Sydney into the cafe.  Sydney asks John if
he has any money. The answer is that he does not; he lost it playing
blackjack.  Sydney asks John if he knows how to count cards while
playing blackjack.  No, he does not.  Sydney tells him only a fool
would play blackjack if he did not know how to count the cards.  Sydney
then offers to take him to Reno and teach him how to win.  And so they
are off and, in fact, John does very well.
The film moves two years forward.  We meet Clementine (Gwyneth
Paltrow), cocktail waitress and part-time prostitute.  We also meet
Jimmy (Samuel L Jackson) who is a scummy security guard at a casino who
tries his hand at blackmailing Sydney on whom he has some unsavory
dirt.
Throw all that together and HARD 8 is an absolute gem, a perfect
illustration of how to do nail-biting film noir.  Do not miss this
one.
Written and directed by Paul Thomas Anderson.

Title
Review for Badkonake Sefid (1995)

Title
Review for Quick and the Dead, The (1995)
     You probably will not believe it but besides BASIC INSTINCT which
brought her instant fame, Sharon Stone has appeared in twenty-one other
films.  That includes a quickie moment in Woody Allen's STARDUST
MEMORIES when he catches a glimpse of her on a passing train.  THE
QUICK AND THE DEAD was supposed to make us forget the films that went
nowhere but this one will not do it.
     From the opening scene of a cowboy on his horse approaching
us at top speed across the range, there was a noticeable giggle in the
audience.  Everyone, it seems, guessed it was our first glimpse of
Ellen (Sharon Stone) and for some reason it looked funny.  It just was
not the Sharon Stone we have come to know and love.
     The remainder of the film has nothing to add.  It is a typical
Western.  Instead of a dusty cowboy seeking revenge on some bad guy
(Gene Hackman, in this case), it is a woman who is out to get him for
his role in having her father, a Marshall, killed when Ellen was just
about ten years old.
     There are plenty of tough hombres in the town of Redemption which
Herod (Hackman) runs with the help of his cronies.  To reduce the
number, each year he stages a shooting contest, with the winner (he who
remains alive) getting a large cash prize.  As Herod is the fastest
draw in town, guess who always wins?  And guess who hates him for
that: his son, "Kid," (Leonardo DiCaprio) who gets no respect from his
old man.
     This year there is a slight change in the :hootout; a woman is
going to participate and, as the rules never said a woman could not be
in the contest, Ellen is allowed in.  Ah, revenge!
     As acting goes, there is not very much in the film to challenge
anyone.  Sharon never cracks a smile, Hackman never stops his sneering
smile, DiCaprio has little to do.  The story is not supposed to be
taken seriously (said Director Raimi) and you can bet that no one
will.
     Others in the cast include Russell Crowe who used to be in Herod's
gang but decided he would rather be on the side of God.  Then there are
gunfighters played by Lance Henriksen, Keith David, Tobin Bell and
Jonathan Gill.

Title
Review for Cosi (1996)
COSI, an Australian film which is loosely based on Louis
Nowra's experiences as a drama therapist at a mental
institution back in the mid 1970s, is short for Mozart's
comic opera, COSI FAN TUTTE. At the institution, Nowra had
directed several plays with the mental patients cast as the
performers.
We therefore meet Lewis (Ben Mendelsohn) who has dropped out
of college and is looking for employment in something
meaningful to him.   Offered a job as director of a  play at
a mental institution and thinking it will be easy, he
accepts.  Thus begins the story. Lewis quickly realizes that
this will not be the snap job he had pictured.
Dealing with willful mental patients who have their own
ideas about how the opera should go, trying his best to make
some order out of chaos,   Lewis fears for his own sanity
but before he quits, he suddenly realizes that he really
likes the misfits with whom he is in constant contact and
decides to give it his best shot.
Although COSI has many things going for it, such as its
director who had directed the very funny THE EFFICIENCY
EXPERT, some talented Australian actors such as Ben
Mendelsohn (THE EFFICIENCY EXPERT, THE YEAR MY VOICE BROKE),
Tony Collette (MURIEL'S WEDDING) and EMMA), Barry Otto
(STRICTLY BALLROOM) Rachel Griffiths (MURIEL'S WEDDING) and
Pamela Rabe (SIRENS) the movie does not quite live up to its
potential.  Several scenes are quite predictable.  Still, it
is very funny and certainly worth seeing.

Title
Review for Dunston Checks In (1996)
        About the easiest way to make a comedy is to use a monkey
(in this case, an orangutan which is actually an ape)) as the film's
hero.  A monkey, by definition, is a comedic character.  Let him
run loose and you have a funny film.  Adults will laugh but the
kids will laugh even harder.  Money in the bank.
        Lord Rutledge (Rupert Everett) is a nogoodnik, a jewel thief
who owns and uses Dunston, the monkey, to do the dirty work of
stealing.  Dunston escapes his conniving master and checks into the
classy Majestic Hotel owned by Mrs. Dubrow (Faye Dunaway) and run by
the very efficient manager, Robert Grant (the Jason Alexander of the
Seinfeld show).  The comedy surrounding the antics and havoc as
Dunston goes ape (excuse the pun) is further enhanced by a youngster
Eric Lloyd,  and Paul Rubens as an animal control officer.

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
        *********************************************************
If you were expecting to see Jim Carrey doing his outrageous "shtick," you
will not find it in this film . . .  Which is a plus.   In ACE VENTURA,
while the movie was only mediocre, Carrey's antics were amusing. By the
time he made Cable Guy, which was better, and The Mask, which was still
better, he no longer needed the way-out eye-popping. .   Truman Burbank
(Jim Carrey) is quite a different character.
Truman has been an actor all of his 30 years but only recently has he
become aware of that.   It seems that soap opera director, Christof (Ed
Harris) has been playing god with Truman's life . . . since he was born.
He has made him the star of the longest running soap opera in TV history.
The story is indeed different than usual movie fare but not quite as
original as the publicists  would like us to believe.   Several articles
have been written about other movies with approximately the same premise.
However, once that is said,  the Truman Burbank movie stands on its own.
And Carrey is very good in it..
Director Christof constructed a gigantic sound stage that looked like a
typical American town, Seahaven.  All the buildings are quaint.  And
Truman has had no idea he had been living and growing into adulthood on a
huge movie set.  All his friends and family are actually actors in this
long-running soap opera, as is even his wife, Meryl (Laura Linney) while
every other day since he was born Truman has been watched by thousands of
TV cameras hidden in the make-believe town of Seahaven.  All his neighbors
are in the cast, equipped with earphones to receive instructions,  all
directed by Christof.    Truman's life has become the TV fare for billions
of watchers over the thirty years.
When it finally dawns on him that none of this is real, that he is a pawn
being manipulated by Someone, Truman rebels.  His single priority now
becomes his escape from Seahaven.   At the other end is the Director who
"conceived" "The Truman Show and is not about to let the series come to a
conclusion. It is interesting to contemplate what it may be like in the
next millennium when spying will be even easier than it is now. What will
happen to privacy?  Those are some of the specters the film raises.  The
question also comes up, "Why are billions of people over the years
watching Truman Burbank's seemingly uneventful life."   At no time are we
shown anything out of the ordinary in his existence.  Perhaps it is that
people are natural voyeurs.
While the scenes with Christof manipulating the sun and the moon and the
weather and ocean waves from his studio control room are funny, Truman's
escape on the sea seemed to go on too long.
Others in the cast are Truman's friend Marlon, an actor, of course,(Noah
Emmerich), Natascha McElhone, who plays Lauren/Sylvia,  Holland Taylor as
Truman's "mother"   And Kirk (Brian Delate.)

Title
Review for Celluloid Closet, The (1995)
     The dictionaries define "unique" as "one of a kind."  No more
apt description fits The Celluloid Closet.  Narrated by Lily Tomlin,
using over one hundred film clips from the Thomas Edison experimental
film to the Oscar-winning Philadelphia, the movie is frequently
hilarious, thoroughly entertaining and always informative. The film is
based on the book by Vito Russo, the story of how Hollywood has over
the years shown gays and Lesbians.
     Having seen most of the films from the Chaplin days through the
present, I was surprised to find how little I knew about them.  I
never thought of the comic Edward Everett Horton  as supposed to be
portraying a gay character.  He was just funny and made us laugh.
The truth is I did not even know what a "gay" was.
     We knew about the Hays Office that had the power to censor films.
We knew that the Catholic Legion of Decency  made a list of films
which  good Catholics were forbidden to see.  That was then and
this is now but we still have those who would censor what can be seen,
The rating system is still with us.
     How we learned to view gays and Lesbians and how they learned to
view themselves came in large part from the Silver Screen.  Any
reference to homosexuality was sure to bring a laugh just as comedians
used Brooklyn and Cucamonga as laugh=getters.  Gayness on the screen
could be funny but it could also make you pity the poor unfortunates
A male costume designer was good for a laugh. . . . or a flouncy
waiter . . . . or any of a dozen stereotypes.  No one thought of
them as being homosexual; they were just sissies.  On the one hand
there were the John Waynes and on the other were the sissies.
Quentin Crisp remarks that when a man dresses as a woman, we find it
funny (SOME LIKE IT HOT) but a woman dressed as a man (Dietrich,
Garbo) was not only accepted but even was a source of titillation.
     Again, the film is unique.  My own favorite scene is at the end,
a clip of Tom Hanks and Anthony Banderas in their Navy uniforms, and
the voice over commentary that sums up this wonderful film.

Title
Review for Primal Fear (1996)
     Not being in the legal profession I am hardly in a position to
comment on the antics of the attorneys in PRIMAL FEAR.  I doubt that
lawyers visit the murder location looking for clues; they have
investigators for that.  But as sheer entertainment this is the film
to see.  For one thing, Richard Geer has never been as charming,
ingratiating and just a pleasure to watch in his role of a hotshot
lawyer more interested in seeing his picture on the cover of a
magazine than in defending a client . . . until he comes across
Aaron-Roy who is accused of murdering a very prominent Catholic
churchman, the Archbishop of Chicago.
     Martin Vail (Richard Gere) is the lawyer whose whole being is
devoted to always winning, to be the most sought after attorney.
Intrigued by the young man (Edward Norton) accused of the murder and
whom everyone believes is the killer, he decides to take the case
without a fee.  Thus begins a film that has more twists and turns, ups
and downs, all tense and exciting, than a roller coaster ride.  You
will love every surprise, of which there are enough for several films.
One of my favorites scenes is the very last when Vail is about to
leave the courthouse and sees through the door the crowd of newspeople
and photographers waiting for him.  I thought it was a great touch
that packed a big exclamation mark on an already stirring film.
     Mention should be made of the great casting by Deborah Aquila
and Jan Shannon, a category I have never previously mentioned.
Janet Venable (Laura Linney) is the prosecuting attorney who once was
"very close" to Vail and may still wish for a closer relationship is
exciting in and out the courtroom.  Alfre Woodard, a fine actress, is
perfect as the judge..  There is Andre Braugher (Tommy Goodman) as
Vail's investigator,  John Mahoney and Frances McDormand, all turning
in excellent performances.  Wow!

Title
Review for Jerusalem (1996)
Just a century ago, an amazing religious event took place in a small
village in Sweden.  The power of an evangelist to enthrall and entice
otherwise sane people with his vision is not anything with which we are
unfamiliar, as witness among others, our own homegrown Baakers.
Based on a novel by Selma Lagerlof who traveled to Jerusalem in an
attempt to understand the astounding events, the filmmakers have now
made it into a movie.
True enough, the villagers were ripe for someone to take them by the
hand and explain what had been happening in the village and to lead
them to what was promised was a better life, a godly life of love.
When Big Ingmar, whose ancestors, the Ingmarssons, had governed the
town for generations, was killed in an accident and daughter Karin,
(Pernilla August) married to an alcoholic, had to take over the running
of the Ingmarsson farm because Little Ingmar who would have inherited
the farm was a mere ten years old, the village was left without a
leader.  Fortuitously, along came the traveling preacher, Hellgum
(Sven-Bertil Taube) who had all the answers, urging them to give up
their worldly goods and move to faraway Jerusalem where peace and love
were in abundance and where everyone would live "happily ever after."
Some 40 adults and children left their Swedish town of Nas Parish after
having sold whatever property they had and journeyed to Jerusalem.  The
film, however, is primarily concerned with just a half dozen or so.
There is Ingmar's older sister, Karen, who sells the farm to finance
the trip, to a wealthy man who wants the property so he can give it as
a dowry for his daughter, Barbro (Lena Andre).   The now adult Ingmar
(Ulf Friberg) is in love with his childhood sweetheart, Gertrud (Maria
Bonnevie), who is uncertain about whether or not she should make the
trek to Jerusalem.
The decision is pretty much made for her when Ingmar tells her he is
going to marry Karin because he cannot bear to lose the farm which has
been in his family for so many generations.   This leaves Gertrud no
choice but to leave with the others.
The film then moves to Jerusalem where a Mrs Gordon (Olympia Dukakis)
is the ruler of the compound where all the newcomers, as well as those
already there, will live.  And the story further unfolds, moving back
and forth between the parish in Sweden and the Promised Land  of
Jerusalem.   The film's problem  is that it takes 2 hours and 46
minutes to tell its story and I found that much too long. There were
any number of places  where some heavy editing could have been done and
still kept the integrity of the saga. . .  but that did not happen.

Title
Review for Scarlet Letter, The (1995)
     It takes a lot of chutzpah (nerve) to take a classic book and
change the story around, including the ending.  Hawthorne, wherever he
is, must be seething.  Hollywood has done it again.  If you read the
book you will not believe the ending that was slapped onto the film.
Should anyone care, the screenplay was written by Douglas Day Stewart,
produced and directed by Roland Joff.
     If you read the book, beautifully written, many years ago, you may
want a refresher.  It takes place in the early 1700s when the Puritans
in Massachusetts ruled the colony with a strictness that took any joy
out of life.  As well, superstition and witches were prevalent.  The
story opens with a description of the Boston prison, the women
parishioners, in particular, outside the prison, a mean and vindictive
lot, who are angry at the light sentence given Hester Prynne (Demi
Moore), in the jail for adultery. After months of imprisonment she is
sentenced to wear the scarlet letter "A" for the rest of her life so
everyone would know her as an adulteress, a pregnant adulteress who
would not name the father of the child she was bearing.
     How she bears her punishment, how she earns her living are
described in the book but not in the film.  Many are the omissions and
changes made to Hawthorne's story.  Despite a mostly fine cast, (Gary
Oldman as Arthur Dimmesdale, the best-liked preacher, Robert Duvall as
Hester's husband, Robert Prosky as one of the ministers, Joan Plowright
as an independent and fearless woman destined to be accused of being a
witch) the film does not begin to come near the excellence of the
book.
     Hester looks like the Demi Moore we know, right down to the
shower in the nude, to a replica of the famous Vanity Fair cover where
she posed with her huge belly and navel.  None of that was necessary.
Hester's daughter, Pearl, eventually age seven, who in the book is an
important character is here relegated to being about three-years-old and
except that a birthmark "proves" she is a witch, she is not anyone of
note in the film.
     But it is the "cowboys and Indians" type of ending that was chosen
as the film's laughable ending that put the final stamp of mediocrity
on this version of THE SCARLET LETTER.

Title
Review for How to Make an American Quilt (1995)
     Different women love men for varied reasons.  Some may not call it
"love" but by whatever name, they are happy or unhappy.  accept their
lot or fight back.  Bringing the stories of each of the women together
is accomplished by the writer of the screenplay, Jane Anderson and
director Jocelyn Moorehouse with the help of a cast, led by Winona
Ryder, that is outstanding.
     Finn (Ryder) has graduated from Berkeley and is spending the
summer at the home of her grandmother, Hy (Ellen Burstyn) and
great-aunt, Gladys Joe (Anne Bancroft) in California.  She is there for
two reasons: her boyfriend, Sam (Dermot Mulroney) has proposed marriage
and she wants time to think about it.  The second reason is she is
trying to finish a thesis on the rituals of women's handiwork in tribal
cultures.
     A group of women, led by Anna (Maya Angelou) long ago started a
quilting bee at Hy and Gladys Joe's home where she once was a maid but
is now the expert on the quilting.  Others in the bee are Constance
(Kate Nelligan), Em (Jean Simmons), Sophia (Lois Smith) and Marianne
(Alfre Woodard) who is Anna's daughter.
     As the quilt is being made, Finn is unaware that it is for her
wedding whenever that should happen.  Meanwhile, through flashbacks,
the stories of the women are revealed; a husband's death, another
husband's infidelity immediately after marriage but is always forgiven
by the wife because "that's how he is."  Each has her own tale to
tell.  There is even a discussion about whether marriage is still a
useful convention.  Finn hears it all.
     Others in the cast include Kate Capshaw and Rip Torn.  What
further enhances the film is the mood, the tone, the unhurried pace
and, for me, the surprise ending.

Title
Review for Real Blonde, The (1997)
There are several things that make THE REAL BLONDE such a delight to
watch.    There's the sexy, fun story and realistic dialogue, both by
Tom Dicillo,  the fine acting by the entire cast which consists of
some great names even in the smaller roles.   Take Kathleen Turner
as a powerful casting agent such as is found in the real world of TV
and movies.   There is Marlo Thomas as a top notch photographer who
knows how to make a picture tell a story that is not true.  And
there is Buck Henry as a psychiatrist who would love to bed his
patients.  And Christopher Lloyd who runs a catering service that
employs actors between gigs or those who have yet to get their first
break,   Finally, Denis Leary as a women's self-defense instructor
who tries to come on to the women who have personal problems. Wrap
all that together by a fine director and you have one very
entertaining film.
 The story and all the characters ring true.   Joe (Matthew Madine)
and his live-in lover Mary (Catherine Keener) appear to be about at
the end of their relationship.   While Mary is a make-up artist for
TV and movies,  Joe is still waiting for his first job,    His only
income is as a waiter. Obsessed with never accepting a minor part in
a film as it would be too demeaning for someone who is as good as he
thinks he is, he is always out of work, always shooting off his
mouth and blowing his chances of ever getting  cast.   Mary has just
about had it with him even if they are in love.
 Bob (Maxwell Caulfield) is Joe's  friend and fellow-actor (and
waiter!).  His problem is he wants to find a real blonde, someone
who does not get her hair dyed; a natural.   To this end he runs
after every blonde he imagines will fill the bill.   What he really
wants is a woman whom he can love.    Among those he chases are
Kelly (Daryl Hannah in a superb performance) and Sahara (Bridgette
Wilson) who is seen as the perfect body on huge billboards.   Is he
happy?   Not at all.
 Joe finally settles for a role as an extra with a hundred other men
in a Madonna video.  He has to play up to casting director Dee Dee
Taylor (Kathleen Turner) in order to get the role.  When Joe meets
up with Tina, (Elizabeth Berkley) who is a Madonna double, his
morality suffers as he takes her to bed.   So much for HIS ethics.
 One would hope that despite the film being released so early in the
year, that come Oscar voting time in 1999, Matthew Modine and Daryl
Hannah  will be remembered.
 The movie runs along rapidly as we get to know all the characters
and meet those on their periphery who have a bearing on the story
and on their lives.   That there is not a dull moment in the film is
a tribute to the fine direction..

Title
Review for Small Wonders (1996)
     Exhilarating, heartwarming, profoundly moving!   All that and
very entertaining. This is a documentary which shows that one person
can move and change the environment and lives of children.   Teacher
Roberta Guaspari-Tzavaras has done just that.   This film about her
dedication and achievements leaves you with a great feeling and a hope
for the future.
     When school funds were cut, the Arts were the first to be axed.
Music teacher Roberta would not take "no" for an answer.  She rallied
parents and friends to support her program to teach the violin to the
little kids in three schools in NYC.:  Central; Park East 1, Central
Park East 2, and RiverEast Elementary School.   Most of the children
attending those schools were from minority and poor families but
Roberta enriched their lives as she taught them to play and love the
violin.    Each year 150 children were chosen by lottery to be in the
program.   The sad part is that there was not enough funds available
to include many more children and that it is just in NYC when it
should be in every school in our country.   Violins, not guns, should
be our goal.
     It is a delight to see the children from different ethnic groups,
as they play Bach with an intensity and dedication one would not
expect of youngsters.   We see one of the annual concerts, this one at
Carnegie Hall, with the great Isaac Stern and Itzhak Perlman aLong
with many other famous professionals,  joining them in the
performances.
     There is no question about Roberta Guaspari-Tzavaras' dedication
and love of music and children.    You will not want to miss this
wonderful film.

Title
Review for Shall We Dansu? (1996)
Shohei, (Koji Yakusyo) is a devoted 41-year-old husband to Masako
(Hideko Hara) and father to a sweet teen aged daughter.  Masako has
learned to depend on her husband showing up from work at the same
time every night.  In fact, she thinks, he seems to be in a rut
and could probably use a little change   Her daughter cautions her
that she should be happy that her father is such an uncomplicated
man who does not cause any kind of anxiety in this middle class
family.
Shohei, who is an up and coming office employee, takes the same
train home every night but tonight, as he gazes out the trains
open doors at a station, he happens to look up at a building where
a pretty woman is gazing out a window. It is a dance studio where
ballroom dancing is taught.   And every night now, he makes a
point of looking up and seeing her until one fateful night he
suddenly dashes out the train's open door and crosses to the
building..
Ballroom dancing had had a somewhat bad aura to it because not so
long ago it was a place where men went for more than dancing.
While that is no longer true, no one exactly advertises the fact
he is attending a ballroom studio to learn to dance.  After
looking to right and left to make sure no one he knows has seen
him, Shohei enters the building and goes up to the fourth floor,
knocks on the door and finds himself in the dance hall.
Shohei asks to be taught by Mai (Tamiyo Kusakari), the woman of
the window but when he learns that the price of a private lesson
is prohibitive, he opts for being taught as part of a group of
three, giving rise to film's funniest moments.   When he has
overcome his original stiff bearing when learning to dance, he
decides he must dance with Mai.  He even goes so far, after a bit,
to ask her to join him for dinner but she quickly puts him in his
place; if he is taking these classes just to be able to date her,
she tells him,  forget it.  It will never happen.
There are many humorous moments in the film and quite enjoyable to
watch as are the dancers as they get better and better.   Where
the movie turns a bit cold is toward the predictable end:  The
wife begins to wonder why Shohei is no longer on time . . . on
Monday, Wednesday and Friday evenings, and what is that new
perfume she smells on his shirts when she is about to do his
laundry?   And the more the film progresses from that point, the
more obvious it becomes what the ending will be..  Too bad the
film's last quarter was unable to be as rich as the first three
quarters..     Nevertheless, It has a charm and is a delight to
watch.
Others in the cast include Naoto Takenaka, Eriko Watanabe, Yu
Tokui, Hiromasa Taguchi and Reiko Kusamura.
Written and directed by Masayuki Suo.
(In Japanese with English subtitles.)

Title
Review for Four Rooms (1995)
     FOUR ROOMS, a four-segment anthology directed by independent film 
darlings Allison Anders, Alexandre Rockwell, Robert Rodriguez, and 
Quentin Tarantino, has to be one of 1995's major disappointments.  
Perhaps it's the format itself -- twenty minutes isn't enough time to 
develop much in the way of characters or story.  When Martin Scorsese, 
Francis Ford Coppola, and Woody Allen tried a similar structure for 
their ill-fated 1989 offering of NEW YORK STORIES, "flop" was the most 
commonly heard description.  More problematic than the format, however, 
is FOUR ROOMS' execution.  Shoddy acting and direction typify three of 
the segments (Robert Rodriguez's being the exception).  Even Tim Roth, 
one of the best actors of the '90s, has his weak moments.
     FOUR ROOMS takes place on New Year's Eve at the Mon Signor Hotel, 
one of Los Angeles' most notorious dives.  Ted the bellhop (Roth) has 
just joined the staff and is in for "a really bad night."  Ted is the 
glue that holds the four stories together as he moves from room-to-room 
and problem-to-problem.  Roth, with an accent that unaccountably fades 
from American to British, plays Ted like a cross between Jim Carrey and 
John Cleese. 
Cast: Tim Roth, Valeria Golino, Madonna, Ione Skye, Sammi Davis, 
      Lili Taylor, Alicia Witt, Amanda De Cadenet
Written and Directed by: Allison Anders
Cinematography: Rodrigo Garcia
     By far the most lame of FOUR ROOMS' stories, "The Missing 
Ingredient" lacks anything resembling intelligent dialogue, coherent 
plotting, or competent acting.  This trite mess is easily the low point 
in the short career of writer/director Allison Anders, whose 1992 
release, GAS FOOD LODGING, was a positive triumph.  "The Missing 
Ingredient" plays like an R-rated episode of a bad TV sitcom, with 
profanity, bare breasts, and sex failing to liven things up.
     The story -- what little there is -- revolves around a witches' 
coven trying to resurrect the spirit of a stripper.  All the ingredients 
(mother's milk, virgin's blood, sweat of five men's thighs, and a year's 
tears) are ready except for a sperm sample.  Since witch Eva (Ione Skye) 
failed in her assignment to bring this vital component of the mixture, 
she is charged with seducing Ted and getting what she needs from him.  
Cast: Tim Roth, Jennifer Beals, David Proval
Written and Directed by: Alexandre Rockwell
Cinematography: Phil Parmet
     Unlike many reviewers, I wasn't a big fan of writer/director 
Alexandre Rockwell's debut feature, IN THE SOUP.  While the film 
contained several instances of insightful comedy, the entire production 
seemed self-indulgent.  It's doubtful, however, that even those who 
heaped effusive praise on IN THE SOUP will have many kind words for "The 
Wrong Man".  This totally unfunny segment places Ted in between a man 
(David Proval) and his wife (Jennifer Beals) while they play S&M games.  
The episode isn't effectively comical, provocative, or titillating.  
Rockwell's confused script degenerates into dirty language with a cheap, 
predictable conclusion.  
     "The Wrong Man" is one of those stories that, because of a certain 
artistic pretentiousness, thinks it's a lot more humorous and clever 
than it actually is.  Really, it's basically a pointless short that, 
following right after Anders' disastrous opening, dooms FOUR ROOMS to a 
forty-five minute start that's almost unendurable.
Cast: Tim Roth, Antonio Banderas, Tamlyn Tomita, Marisa Tomei, 
      Lana McKissack, Danny Veruzco
Written and Directed by: Robert Rodriguez
Cinematography: Guillermo Navarro
     After struggling through an unwatchable first two episodes, FOUR 
ROOMS finally stumbles upon something worthwhile in its third.  By now, 
a large portion of the audience probably won't care.  However, for those 
with patience, "The Misbehavers" offers an oasis in an otherwise 
creatively barren land.  Robert Rodriguez's contribution starts with Ted 
being induced by a $500 tip to baby-sit for the two small children of a 
gangster (Antonio Banderas) and his wife (Tamlyn Tomita).  Of course, 
Murphy's Law rears its head, and just about everything that can go 
wrong, does.
     Although a fair portion of the humor in "The Misbehavers" is of the 
crude variety, it's skillfully handled by film maker Rodriguez (EL 
MARIACHI), and, as a result, is occasionally sidesplittingly funny.  The 
two child actors (newcomers Lana McKissack and Danny Veruzco) are apt 
performers, and Tim Roth does his best manic John Cleese imitation.  
There's also a riotous phone conversation between Roth and Marisa Tomei 
that, despite its brevity, may represent FOUR ROOMS' comic highlight.
Cast: Tim Roth, Quentin Tarantino, Jennifer Beals, Paul Calderon, 
      Bruce Willis
Written and Directed by: Quentin Tarantino
Cinematography: Andrzej Sekula
     There's no doubt that a fair number of those in the audience will 
be present because Quentin Tarantino is involved in this film.  
Unfortunately, Tarantino's episode can't save FOUR ROOMS.  Not only is 
it pointless, but it lacks the energy that characterized the director's 
feature films (RESERVOIR DOGS and PULP FICTION).  Also, while "The Man 
>From Hollywood" features Tarantino's rapid-fire dialogue, the actor 
speaking many of the lines is one of the most inept and uncharismatic 
performers in movies these days:  Tarantino himself.
     "The Man from Hollywood" is based on an old Alfred Hitchcock TV 
episode, where a man bets his finger that he can start his lighter ten 
straight times.  Ted is brought in to wield the hatchet to remove the 
digit (should the need arise), earning a fee of $1000 for his troubles.  
The two bettors are big-time Hollywood director Chester Rush 
(Tarantino), who's putting up his 1964 Chevy Chevelle, and actor Norman 
(Paul Calderon), whose pinkie is on the line.  Also in the penthouse 
suite is profanity-spewing Leo (Bruce Willis) and, reprising her role 
from "The Wrong Man", Jennifer Beals.
     Even though "The Man from Hollywood" is merely twenty minutes long, 
it drags, and only the conclusion has any zing.  Whether Tarantino is 
played out has yet to be determined, but his efforts in FOUR ROOMS are 
feeble at best.  It's only the ugliness of Anders' and Rockwell's 
segments that make Tarantino's somewhat palatable -- but "The Man from 
Hollywood" is still no better than mediocre by his, or anyone else's, 
standards.
     At its best, FOUR ROOMS is reminiscent of John Cleese's '70s TV 
series FAWLTY TOWERS.  Far more frequently, however, this movie recalls 
one of the worst hotel movies of all time, BLAME IT ON THE BELLBOY. 
While spending ninety minutes watching FOUR ROOMS doesn't rank alongside 
the distasteful experience of a full night's stay at the Mon Signor, 
it's still a poor way to waste an evening -- New Year's Eve or 
otherwise. 

Title
Review for Road to Wellville, The (1994)
     Everyone has heard of Kellogg's Corn Flakes and almost everyone
has heard of its home, Battle Creek, Michigan.  But how many knew that
John Harvey Kellogg was also a a doctor, a surgeon, inventor, owner of
a spa and a crusader for "biological living?"  Not only did he invent
corn flakes but he also invented peanut butter and the electric
blanket.  Aside from that, he was a flamboyant flake.
     Some of his proclamations are, to say the least, very much out of
the mainstream of medicine.  "The liver is the only thing standing
between the smoker and death.  Sex is the sewer drain of a healthy
body."  As a strict practitioner of vegetarianism he would often tell
his audience at San (Sanitarium) that "My own stools are gigantic and
have no more odor than a hot biscuit.  An erection is a flagpole on
your grave."
     Will Lightbody (Matthew Broderick) who has been feeling sickly (he
is not getting enough sex) is induced by his wife, Eleanor (Bridget
Fonda), to come to the San for a cure.  She, herself, has been there
several times and it had, she says, done wonders for her.  Hardly has
Will been introduced to Dr Kellogg when he is whisked away to be
cleansed with a series of enemas.
     By this time the comedy is beginning to lose its humor, sinking
more and more into childish nonsense.  With a little more taste and
discretion it could have been an interesting tale about Kellogg.  It
does have a fine cast.  Anthony Hopkins as Kellogg, carrying his role
with complete abandon, is aided by John Cusack, Dana Carvey, Michael
Lerner as well as Fonda and Broderick and a host of others but to no
avail.  Director Alan Parker unfortunately did not know when to lay off
the dung and get on with the main story.  Too bad.

Title
Review for Gabbeh (1996)
This is only the second Iranian film I have been privileged to view.
The other was the delightful, Oscar-nominated for Best Foreign Film ,
THE WHITE BALLOON.    While the latter was a straightforward story of a
little girl's adventure as she goes into town to buy a fish for her
home aquarium, GABBEH is unlike any other film I have seen.   It is a
fascinating fairy tale about young love in the steppes of Southeastern
Iran where Gabbeh (Shaghayegh Djodat) lives with her  nomadic tribe.
The tribe was noted for their beautiful carpets.
The film opens with an elderly couple (Hossein Moharami and Roghieh
Moharami) on a farm as they discuss who will wash the newly completed
carpet which has woven into it, a young girl and her lover.  The
gabbehs are not mere carpets.  The pictures  woven tell the stories of
their lives, their hopes,   Unlike carpets everywhere, the gabbehs do
not have a pre-set design but depend on the inspiration of the weaver.
As part of this very imaginative fairy tale, the name Gabbeh is given
to the protagonist.  Her clothing, like the carpet, is blue.  She sits
nearby the stream where the old couple is washing the gabbeh and,
again  fairy-tale- like, we are left to wonder until the film's very
end about her relationship with  the old man and woman.
The film's story, as sung and related by the young  woman, is of the
lover from a neighboring clan who rides on horseback atop the mountain
ridge and gives forth wolf calls to her, beckoning her to come to him.
Her father has promised Gabbeh she can get married after her uncle has
gotten married,   After that has happened, he tells her to wait until
her mother gives birth to a new child.
Unable to abide by these delays any longer, Gabbeh runs away to the
mountain where her lover has an extra horse and she and he ride away.
When her father learns of this, he takes his rifle and goes after
them   Two shots  ring out and the father returns to tell the
tribespeople that he had to kill the couple as a warning to others not
to desert the tribe.   If you  think that is where the story ends, you
are, as was I, in for a couple of big surprises which put finishing
touches on this lovely film.    For something different, something
enchanting, you cannot miss with GABBEH,
Mention must be made of the exceptionally fine photography by director
of photography Mahmoud Kalari. The wheat fields, the winds that sweep
them; the many gabbehs that dry on the landscape are gloriously
presented.

Screenplay and direction by Mohsen Makhmalbaf,

Title
Review for Tango Lesson, The (1997)
While the story is an integral part of the film, the real joy is in
the exquisite dancing,   Sally Potter, best known for her film,
ORLANDO, the writer and director, wanted to combine her life
experiences with a tinge of unreality.  A film maker since she was
a teenager,  as well as a professional dancer, she fell under the
spell of the tango . . . as will you when you see this film.
Realizing that she must have authenticity to bring off the film she
decided to ask the renowned Argentinean tango dancer, Pablo Veron,
for dancing lessons. In return she promised to put him in a film,
his first leading role.  They shortly became dancing partners and
eventually he and she starred in the film with exciting
choreography by Veron.
Sleek, slick and sexy, the tango is a delight to behold when in the
hands of dancers who know and understand the subtleties of that
dance; the closeness of the dancers, the sexy kicks between the
partner's legs, and the smooth moves to the driving rhythm are a
joy both to the dancer and the audience.   While not all of the
tango's origins are known, it is a fact that it first showed up in
the barrios of Buenos Aires, as well as the bars and brothels. And
that it is definitely ethnic with overtones of African dancing and
footwork.
Both Potter and Vernon dance up a storm and, in the end, that is
what is best about the film.   Watching them go through their steps
is worth the price of admission, story or not. Provocative and
entrancing, the dance will grip you in its fascinating twists and
turns.

Title
Review for Shawshank Redemption, The (1994)
     Powerful, horrifying, funny and altogether wonderfully uplifting,
the film has "OSCAR" written all over it.  Based on a novella by
Stephen King, with the screenplay written and directed by Frank
Darabont in his first big screen movie, this film about hope and
friendship will grab you where you live.  If you thought King could
only write horror stories, keep in mind that he is the author of Rob
Reiner's STAND BY ME.  And now comes this terrific story.
     Andy Dufresne (Tim Robbins), is a mild-mannered banker, found
guilty of having killed his wife and her lover, and sentenced to two
consecutive life terms in Shawshank maximum security penitentiary in
Maine.  Warden Norton (Bob Gunton) is a Bible-quoting monster, as
mean as they come.  His head guard, Capt. Hadley (Clancy Brown), is a
sadistic brute.  The whole prison is a nightmare with many of the
convicts having lost all sense of decency.
     Into this hell hole comes Andy.  Somehow he survives long enough
to be befriended by Red, (Morgan Freeman), a "lifer" who wheels and
deals in prison.  He can get you anything you want ... for a price:
Red has already been in for 20 years when Andy arrives.
     When Andy makes known to the guards that he knows all about tax
saving, and able to prepare their income tax returns, he is allowed a
few more privileges.  He shows Warden Norton how he can keep the
bribes he receives from contractors, setting up a fake identity so the
warden can deposit the money and it would be untraceable.  When Andy
wants to get books for the library, he is permitted by the warden to
write to various people and agencies.  The warden knows Andy will never
get a response ... but he does.
     While the film is as taut as one can get, little splashes of humor
are dropped in to relieve the tension.  But throughout the film, the
thread of hope is woven; without hope, there is nothing.  We see this
despair in the trustee librarian (James Whitmore in a fine
performance).
     Look for Oscar nominations for Best Screenplay, Best Direction,
Best Acting and Best Supporting Actors; the film has all of that.
Robbins and Freeman are absolutely great!  One perfect movie!

Title
Review for Hercules (1997)
HERCULES may bear little more resemblance than the name of the
Greek hero we read about in school but it nevertheless is the
recounting of a heroic effort.   And it tells the young who will
love the film that you do not call someone a hero because he can
perform feats of strength; true heroism, Father Zeus tells son
Hercules, involves feats of the heart. That message is delivered in
this palatable animation that involves humor mixed with some
irreverence.
The film opens with a Greek chorus (the Muses) relating the latest
on the celebration of the birth of Hercules on Mt. Olympus where
the Greek gods live.   Zeus, a proud daddy, gives his son a winged
horse named Pegasus as both he and his wife Hera beam at their
infant son and Pegasus cuddling.
With the appearance of Hades we are made aware that there is a
plot afoot to have the Lord of the Underworld, usurp the throne
from Zeus.   The Fates told Hades that in 18 years, when the
planets align, it will be the most propitious time to take over.
However, they warn him, that unless Hercules is in some way out of
the picture, Hades' attempt will not succeed.  Aided by his two
dimwitted monsters, Pain and Panic, Hades has baby Hercules
kidnapped.   A drug deprives him of his godliness, turning him into
a mere mortal, but the monsters fail to deprive him of his
super-human strength.
Something tells our hero that he is "different."  Determined to
find out why he feels that way, he goes to a statue of Zeus who
suddenly comes to life,  and now father and son are at last
re-united.  It is then that Zeus tells his young son he can only
return as a god to Mt. Olympus if he does something heroic on
Earth.   He also advises him to get help from the legendary
hero-trainer, Philoctetes, affectionately known as "Phil."   This
is one of the highlights of the film with the animation of Phil
looking exactly like Danny DeVito, the distinctive voice of Phil
and the source of much of the film's humor.  Great casting.
Before Hercules attains true hero status, he meets Megara, a
sultry Greek beauty who works for Hades.  Before "Meg" can do
Hercules any harm as per her boss' bidding she realizes she has
fallen in love with our hero.
Voices of the many wonderful animated characers are supplied by
Tate Donovan as the adult Hercules; Phil's voice is that of Danny
DeVito, Hades voice is that of James Wood.  Meg, the seductress,
uses the voice of Susan Egan.  Zeus and wife Hera are given voices
by Rip Torn and Samantha Eggar. Pain and Panic are Bobcat
Goldthwait and Matt Frewer.  Voice of the Cyclops is supplied by
Patrick Pinney;  Hal Holbrook lends his voice to Amphitryon with
Alcmene being Barbara Barrie's voice. Hydra, the octopus-like
demon is given voice by Oskar Urretabizkaia.
Songs are by Alan Menken with lyrics by David Zippel.  Music is
fine and the lyrics are witty but I still yearn for something
comparable to the songs we used to sing and hum long after we had
left the theater: Give me a "Hi Ho, Hi Ho, It's off to work we go
. . ."

Title
Review for Night Falls on Manhattan (1997)
The word that springs to mind is SPELLBINDING.   In every way, which
includes the taut direction, the superb cast, the witty and precise
dialogue, and of course, the story (based on Robert Daley's book,
TAINTED EVIDENCE, that word sums up the film.   Andy Garcia, who is in
almost every scene, gives a terrific performance.  Richard Dreyfuss, a
real pro, just has to give a slight smirk, a lift of an eyebrow and he
is utterly believable.  And then there is the rest of the superb
supporting cast aiding to make this a Four-Byter.
This is a story of integrity, of being able to look oneself in the
mirror. That is what eventually confronts Sean Casey (Garcia) when he
begins to investigate the police force, 3 suspect precincts in NYC; and
he has to wonder about Joey (James Gandolfini), the cop and partner of
Sean's  father, Liam Casey (Ian Holm) and who is on the take,
protecting and giving information to the drug dealers in exchange for
money?
Jordan Washington (Shiek Mahmud-Bey) is impressive, tall, handsome and
menacing as the drug dealer the police would like to kill because they
have been offered a better deal than he was willing to give them.
When they close in on him, he ends up fatally shooting several police
and severely wounding the police veteran, Liam Casey.   That is all the
excuse District Attorney Morgenstern (Ron Leibman) needs to order his
cops to  make Washington sorry he was ever born "and we'll worry about
the Civil Liberties Union later!" Washington had surrendered to
Attorney Sam Vigoda (Dreyfuss), an attorney in the mode of famed
attorney William Kunstler.   And is Dreyfuss ever good!
Morgenstern is running for higher office against another District
attorney, Elihu Harrison (Colm Fiore) and in this high profile case
against Washington, he invites Sean, a former cop, and now a neophyte
attorney in the District Attorney's office, to be the prosecutor.   He
tells him the trial will be a snap: several police fatally shot by
Washington, Sean's father in the hospital, drug  dealer.  "You can't
lose."    They reckon without the brilliance of Vigoda.
Love interest in this tale of divided loyalties, backbiting and
honesty, is provided by Peggy (Lena Olin) who works in Vigoda's office
but falls in love with Sean.
Sidney Lumet feels: "The greatest threats to the nation are drugs and
racism."  He wants us to start fighting back before it is too late.
"Where is the line that separates "healthy compromise" from
"destructive loss of idealism?  'Just don't do it' and 'Just say "No"
is symptomatic of everything cockeyed about how we live: Put a sound
byte on it and it will go away."
Written and Directed by Sidney Lumet.

Title
Review for Celtic Pride (1996)
     To each his own.  There are those who can be glued to their TVs
watching every sports program and there are those who could not care
less.  Celtic Pride is about two of the former taken to the nth
degree.  Yes, it's a comedy about two basketball fans, Mike O'Hara
(Daniel Stern) and his pal Jimmy Flaherty (Dan Aykroyd), both fanatics
about their Boston Celtics.  Actually, the silliness that this film
engages in can hardly be called "comedy" without demeaning the word.
     Mike and Jimmy are a couple of crazies who are watching Lewis
Scott (Daman Wayans) lead his Utah Jazz team beat the pants off the
Boston Celtics in the game that will decide who is the best team in the
NBA.  Before long, the series is tied at the sixth game and it looks
like the Celtics are going to go down to defeat in the final game.
     When Mike and Jimmy discover that the Jazz's start player is
enjoying an evening at a local nightclub, the two idiots decide to get
Scott drunk so he will be unable to play well the next day.  Need I say
more?

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
Supernatural films all have the same problem, that of making the
story seem reasonable.  That is quite a challenge.  Unfortunately,
about the only thing that would make an audience believe FALLEN is
that the personable Denzel Washington is the star.    He is
Detective John Hobbes in an unnamed city (but filmed in
Philadelphia.)
Detective Hobbes had witnessed the execution of killer Edgar Reese
(Elias Koteas). It is odd that the ever-observant detective (as he
himself tells us in a voice over) did not think it strange that
Reese seemed to take the impending execution very calmly, even
singing "Time Is On My Side" as he is about to be gassed.
 Shortly thereafter there occurs a series of murders which although
having all the earmarks of Reese's style, are nevertheless the
apparent work of other killers.  It is Hobbes' assignment to find
out what is happening and to put an end to it.   Easier said than
done as Hobbes ponders whether these are copycat murderers or
perhaps something more strange.   To help him, he seeks the advice
of Greta Milano (Embeth Davitz) who is a professor of theology, well
versed in the supernatural. It is she who tells Hobbes that he is
dealing with Azazel, an angel who has fallen from grace but who has
the ability by a mere touch to invade a person's body.   In fact we
see him walking along the street, touching people apparently at
random as he moves from one human to another..   While it is shown
that Azazel is out to get Hobbes, we are never quite told why Hobbes
himself appears to be immune to invasion of his body.
The film's ending does provide some surprises but by that time it is
too late to be saved.
 The supporting cast helps the film but only to a degree.   Jonesy
(John Goodman) is Hobbes' partner.  Donald Sutherland is Lieutenant
Stanton in the police department. Lou (James Gandolfini) is the
sneaky-looking detective.  But all are to no avail.

Title
Review for Hanussen (1988)
As a voice-over intones "Our Father Who art in Heaven....", the camera
pans across hundreds of infantrymen in trenches, guns pointed in front
of them.   Then comes the command "attack!" and the men clamber out of
the trenches and start running forward and firing.  The next
counterpoint scene shows the dead.  Ironic and strongly anti-war scene
it is in the opening few minutes.  It is WW1.  Austro-Hungary.
The film, based on a true story, is of a soldier, Karl Schneider, lying
on the battlefield, physically and psychologically wounded.  Shift to
the psychiatrist's office where Schneider describes his dreams as well
as an incident from his early childhood when he rescued a young girl
from her home which was on fire.
Before the war Schneider had been in vaudeville  doing a
clairvoyant-hypnotist act.  He now decides, with the war over, to try
it again.  His act consists of reading questions written on paper by
members of the audience.  He then is able to single out who wrote the
message and to reply.    This astounds the audience as well it should,
One question, from a young woman whose parents are on a cruise to
America is, will she go to America one day, too?  Schneider tells the
audience that he does not see a ship.  He then tells the woman that she
will not go to America.  Next day's headlines announce the sinking of
that ship.
One of the many happenings that make the film so fascinating is the
foretelling of the future and the hypnotism with which Schneider is
able to get people to do things such as crowing like a rooster, setting
fire to a curtain.  He himself feels that it is his empathy for the
masses that enables him to "see" what is going to happen.
When his fame spreads and reaches into the highest ranks of the Nazis
and Hitler becomes aware of him, Hanussen's life is in danger.
Meanwhile, inflation and unemployment are causing the masses to be
fearful. Schneider predicts the Reichstag fire and Hitler becoming
Chancellor.
There are not many light moments but one is of a Baron asking what the
price of a certain stock will be.  It's 92 now.  Schneider, who uses
the stage name, Hanussen, because it is more exotic than his own, tells
him he doesn't do that kind of foretelling.  When the Baron insists, he
tells him, I'll give you the number of my grandmother's home.  25. "Is
that true?" asks the Baron.  "Absolutely.  That was my grandmother's
address." The next day the stock drops to 25.
Just as Hanussen took advantage of those on stage to make them play the
fool, crow like a chicken, so too was Hitler  able to manipulate and
impose his will on the people.
The film stars that fine actor, Klaus Maria Brandauer.

Title
Review for Century (1993)
     It was almost the beginning of a new century when enthusiasm was
high.  What new medical advances could be expected?  What changes in
style, in manners and in things unimaginable would the 20th Century
bring ... as well as a good deal of trepidation about what the future
would hold.
     Mr. Reisner (Robert Stephens), a Jewish merchant who had left
Rumania to establish a successful business in Scotland, is a
flamboyant, enthusiastic man.  He has a daughter, Miriam (Lena Headey),
and a son, Paul (Clive Owen).  Paul is on his way to London to do
medical research at the prestigious but controversial Whiteweather
Institute run by a brilliant doctor, Professor Mandry (Charles Dance).
     Mandry immediately spots Paul as the brightest of the researchers
and has Paul promoted as his assistant.  Together they visit the seamy
side of London, the sick and homeless about whom Paul had been
unaware.  Mandry, appears to be not only a great medical man but a
fine human being as well....  Paul soon learns otherwise,
     When a colleague of Paul comes up with a new theory about
neurology he would like to have tested, Paul sides with him.  To his
surprise, Mandry in effect says "No" by stalling.  Paul lashes out at
him for not pursuing this new research and accuses him of jealousy for
not having come up with the idea himself ... at which point Paul is
banished for a month from the Institute. Paul further learns, to his
horror, that Mandry is engaged in his own "ethnic cleansing" by
sterilizing poor sick women without their consent.
     It was during this period that many otherwise brilliant men of
letters were proposing some kind of method of "breeding out
undesirables."  The advent of Hitler put a lid on that kind of
thinking but is again, apparently gaining some converts in
Yugoslavia.
     There is, of course, a love interest for Paul in the film, and who
better than the beautiful Clara (Miranda Richardson), who works at
the institute?
     Director-Writer, Stephen Poliakoff does not have a wasted moment.
All of the cast is wonderful but it always amazes me how Miranda
Richardson can play such diverse parts so perfectly, as to name a few,
the sweet woman in ENCHANTED APRIL and the IRA hardliner in The Crying
Game.  For my money, one of the best actors working today. She will be
appearing shortly in TOM AND LIV ... and I can hardly wait.
P.S.  I did see TOM AND LIV tonight and Richardson was once again
perfection.  Excellent film, by the way.

Title
Review for Quiz Show (1994)
     It is not often that one is fortunate enough to see a movie that
has a good story, exceptional acting, not only by the film's stars but
all the supporting cast, and also has great direction. All of these are
found in this gripping, emotional film, and what a treat that is for
the moviegoer.
     Everyone probably remembers or has heard of the quiz show,
"Twenty-One," that swept the country's TV viewers in the mid-1950s, and
of the accompanying scandal when it was found the program was rigged
with some of the contestants being given the answers.   That it also
involved the son of a most distinguished intellectual family added
further drama.  Despite our knowing that story, it in no way diminishes
the excitement of the film.  This, again, is due to the fine direction
and to its superb cast.
     Herbie Stempel (John Turturro) is the man the show's producers ask
to miss a question when they feel he has outlived his popularity as the
show's top winner.  Turturro is perfect as he rages over being dropped,
and with the further ignominy over a question to which he (and everyone
else) knew the answer.
     Dick Goodwin (Rob Morrow) is the attorney who tenaciously sought
to find out if and how the program was rigged, and present it to the
Congressional Committee on Legislative Oversight. Charles Van Doren
(Ralph Fiennes), who rose to fame as the contestant who won the most
money; his father, poet and critic, Mark Van Doren, (Paul Scofield);
Quiz Show producer Dan Enright (David Paymer); and Jack Barry
(Christopher McDonald) the show's Host, all give wonderful
performances.
     Look for many nominations from Quiz Show come Oscar time, for Best
Movie, Best Acting by leads and supporters, and Best Direction.  One
extraordinary film!

Title
Review for Truth or Consequences, N.M. (1997)
I cannot recall how many "thrillers" I have seen these past several
months whose premise is that an ex-con vows never again to get in
trouble and again end up in the slammer . . . but who will do just one
more heist so he will have enough money to start anew and live happily
ever after.  Two that come immediately to mind are Absolute Power with
the jewel thief played by Clint Eastwood and  City of Industry with
Timothy Hutton wanting one more robbery before he quits for good...
something invariably goes awry as it does in TRUTH OR CONSEQUENCES NM.
It could be forgiven if the story then takes off on a new tack that is
both entertaining and original.   This one is neither because much of
the writing is bad and the actors have to do and say some pretty
ridiculous things.  Even as a thriller, it is full of holes.  When
Raymond (Vincent Gallo) hides out at his brother's house his brother
throws an object from the living room through a window into the yard.
When asked why he did that, he says "So if the cops come I can show
them the smashed window and say someone broke in."  When someone breaks
IN, the shattered glass will be INSIDE the house as will be whatever is
thrown from the outside to break the window.  I'm hardly a Sherlock
Holmes but even a rank amateur knows that much . . . or so one would
imagine.
Ray is a small-time crook who took a rap for a friend.  When he is
released from jail after having served his time he is met by Addy (Kim
Dickens), the woman he loves.  Ray gets a job with the one for whom he
went to jail but it is a rotten job certainly not commensurate with
what Ray thinks is his due for serving time when he was innocent.  With
no money Ray is determined to do one more job so he and Addy can live
happily ever after.  Sound familiar?
Ray connects with Curtis (Kiefer Sutherland), a former cell mate who is
a trigger-happy cold fish who kills with slight or no provocation.
There is a third partner, Marcus (Mykelti Williamson . . . the crab
fisherman in FORREST GUMP).  The plan is to rob the shop where  Ray had
been working, take the cash he now feels is rightfully his, and then
make their getaway.  No one will be at the shop when they break in.
Addy will be the driver; if he says it is safe, she tells Ray, she
knows it is safe.  In and out of the shop quickly and then freedom for
Ray and Addy.  Here comes the "awry" part.
When they break into the shop there is the owner and another man.
Neither was supposed to be there.  At the first balking by the owner,
Curtis takes out his guns and kills both him and the other man who just
happens to be an undercover cop.  All of this is recorded on the hidden
camera and on the tape recorder the cop was wearing under his jacket.
Ray is furious. "No killing!" but Curtis explains that all that was
before they found the two in the shop.  Now they have to make a getaway
before the whole police force gets after them for having shot a fellow
officer.
When their car begins to smoke and smoke being bad for your health,
they decide they have to change cars and when they see a couple sitting
on a grassy spot off the road, they take them hostage while using the
couple's motor home and ditch their old car.  Curtis was going to kill
the man and woman, Gordon and Donna (Kevin Pollack and Grace Phillips)
but cooler heads prevail and they are merely taken hostage.
This is when the film gets rather silly.  While riding in the camper,
Gordon is watching Jeopardy on TV and he is pretty close in his answers
but Ray is exactly right.  Two very bright guys; the hostage and the
hood.  Little by little (if you can believe this) Gordon, despite
Donna's amazed protests, is beginning to take a liking to the hoods and
even their guns and their lifestyle.   Kind of stretches things a bit I
would say.
Rod Steiger has a cameo as a Las Vegas casino owner and drug dealer
while Martin Sheen is some kind of hit man (who wants to be called
"Sir.") who knows no mercy so no one will ever want to thwart him.
The title refers to the quaint name of a real town in New Mexico.

Title
Review for Great White Hype, The (1996)
     Witty and satiric, The Great White Hope never lets up.  The
Reverend Fred Sultan (Sanuel L Jackson) is the ultimate con man who
is, among other things the manager and boxing promoter of the World's
Champion, "James, The Grim Reaper," (Damon Wayans). James is always
asking when he is going to see some of the millions that his boxing has
earned him but the Reverend has the ready smile, the hug, and "Brother,
I love you" as the ready answer to James . . . and to everyone else.
     The thread of the story is that James is worried that the
number of people attending the boxing matches is dropping and
realizes the black public  is getting tired of seeing "one black
brother beating up another black brother."   The solution, suggested
by his gorgeous assistant, Bambi (Salli Richardson), is to get a
white fighter dumb enough to take on the champ;  hence "The Great
White Hype."   Fortunately, she knows someone, Terry Conklin (Peter
Berg) from her past who did once beat James in an amateur boxing
match.
     Although everyone  in the cast has some input into making the
film a knockout, Peter Berg steals the movie with his very sincere
goals in life but dumb enough to think he can beat the champ..
When they find Terry he is no longer interested in boxing.  He plays
the guitar in a coffee house and all he is interested in is saving
the world's homeless.   If the money he wins in the match will go to
ending the homeless situation of the world, he will agree to the
fight.   That is one of the many satiric parts of the film, a boxer
interested in the homeless.    You will love the scowling, husky,
menacing guardians (including the one who does a 10-second dance
while on duty) who follow the Reverend.   Let us not forget Michael
Kane (Jeff Goldblum) who is trying for a Pulitzer prize by exposing
the Reverend's "private" life.
     In leading supporting roles are John Lovitz, John Rhys-Daniels,
Cheech Marin and Corbin Bernsen.

Title
Review for Apollo 13 (1995)
[Due to an upload problem, I didn't receive several of Ben Hoffman's
reviews until today, which is why some may seem a bit late.
-Moderator]
     This is the most enthralling film so far in 1995. with Tom Hanks
again giving an Oscar-nominating performance as one of three astronauts
trapped in space when one of the oxygen tanks blows up.
     The film is based on the true story of the almost fatal accident
in 1969 when the U.S. attempted to land the first humans on the moon
since Armstrong.  Much of the information in the film is revealed for
the first time as NASA does not always tell us everything.  Still more,
even the film does not reveal the whole story.
     Ken Mattingly (Gary Sinise) who was to have been one of the
astronauts has been exposed to measles and is scrubbed from the
mission.  Jim Lovell (Tom Hanks), (is the author together with
Jeffrey Kluger who wrote the book LOST MOON on which the book is based)
is the chief astronaut.  The two other astronauts were Fred Haise (Bill
Paxton) and Jack Swigert (Kevin Bacon.)    The Mission Control
commander is Gene Kranz (Ed Harris).
     Suddenly, from outer space, the ground crew hears "Houston we have
a problem."  That is the last thing the hundreds of scientists and
mathematicians at their computers want to hear. On board Apollo 13, an
explosion has occurred. There was the great dangers of running out of
oxygen, freezing to death if the power ran out and/or dying because of
the carbon dioxide each of the three was expelling.
     This film is a thriller in every sense of the word.  You will be
sitting on the edge of your seat as Mattingly, (who would have been on
board if he had not been dropped because of measles exposure) most
familiar with every part of Apollo 13, was called in to see what he
could do to keep the oxygen use to a minimum, to see if he could come
up with an idea to reduce the power usage.  It looked like history was
about to be made; three dead astronauts in space forever.
     What NASA did not tell the American civilians and anyone else
watching the Apollo 13, was that it was minutes away from disaster.
Even worse, as THE NATION magazine recently exposed, the Apollo 13 was
carrying a nuclear device with 8.3 pounds of plutonium.  This was to be
left on the moon for further experiments in the future.  Less than a
millionth of a gram could give a person cancer.  This was in the ship
as it tried to get back to Earth.  If the launching rocket had blown up
before Apollo 13 reached orbit, or if the spaceship crashed on landing
there could have been a nuclear holocaust.
     Keep that in mind when you watch the film and think of the
consequences ... and realize that we, the civilians, were never told
about how close our planet came to its end.  The plutonium in Apollo
13's capsule will be hotly radioactive for 2,000 years.  It fell into
the Pacific Ocean about 2000 miles from Sydney, Australia.  where it
will remain radioactive for 2,000 years. NASA implies that it is safe
but they forget that the ocean cannot absorb our garbage forever.

Title
Review for Speechless (1994)
     This a typical boy-meets-girl, boy-loses-girl, boy-gets-girl-back,
boy loses girl-again, and on and on, over and over.  The only
difference between SPEECHLESS and the hundreds of others of its genre
(or "ilk") is that this one is about two speech-writers, one for a
Republican Senatorial candidate and the other for his opponent.   This
latter may remind you of the recent marriage of James Carville, the
brains behind Clinton's campaign, and Mary Matalin, one of the leading
lights helping Bush.   However, that is mere coincidence, Life
imitating Art.
     More interesting than the love story is how the candidates read
the speeches over which their writers have labored.  They sound so much
like TV Anchors who frequently seem not to have the foggiest idea about
the text they are reading so beautifully and with so much charm.  The
film contains a gag about a teleprompter that has been tampered with
leading the candidate to recite "Someone's in the Kitchen with Dinah."
     While both Davis and Keaton are charmingly delightful and loving
as always, they seem to be even more so here and after a while it
begins to get a bit dull.  Christopher Reeve and Bonnie Bedelia help
keep the film going but their efforts are in vain.
Directed by Ron Underwood, whose CITY SLICKERS was a great comedy.

Title
Review for Jungle Book, The (1994)
     Although Nobel-Prize-winning Rudyard Kipling's stories written in
the late 1800s and early 1900s have already twice been made into film
(once animated, once live), Disney has attempted once again to bring
the story to life as a live adventure.  The story of the law of
"civilized" man vs. the "law of the jungle" seems to be a classic with
which every generation is intrigued.  Our own is no exception.
     If you are old enough to go back to 1942, you will remember
"Sabu."  In 1967, Disney gave us an animated version.  With the 100th
anniversary of the books' first publication, Disney Studios decided the
time was ripe for a brand new, more adventurous, version that would
please not only the youngsters but also adults.
     Mowgli (Jason Scott Lee), who grew up in the jungle not far from
the civilized world, but still apart from it, decides to see what the
rest of the world is like after he catches a glimpse of the lovely
Kitty (Lena Headey).  He is suddenly aware that he has been missing out
on something and wants to see how the rest of the world lives.  Being
friends with jungle animals is great and being able to speak their
language has its advantages but Kitty is a whole other species worth
checking out.
     Captain Boone (Cary Elwes), is the film's villain.  In addition,
he is engaged to Kitty.  When Boone discovers that the jungle holds
treasures of which the outside world is unaware and which he wants to
remove, Mowgli realizes that the so-called "civilized world" can also
contain malicious, greedy people such as Captain Boone.  Mowgli, of
course, is unaware that Mark Twain once said that it was a shame
animals were called "beasts" when, in fact, it is human beings who
contrive and kill not just for food but for treasure and possessions.
     Fortunately, Mowgli has a forestful of friends: the wolf (Grey
Brother), the bear (Baloo), and the black panther (Bagheera), who are
all on his side.
     If there is any criticism to be made of the film, it is that some
of the scenes are a bit too ferocious for youngsters accustomed to THE
LION KING, ALADDIN, BAMBI, etc.  THE JUNGLE BOOK movie even has someone
immersed in quicksand.  So use a bit of judgment with your PG-13. On
the other hand we have Sam Neil (Kitty's father) and John Cleese as
Dr. Plumford.  Jason Scott Lee's Mowgli looks more Asian than Indian
but does well as our hero.

Title
Review for Crucible, The (1996)
Arthur Miller is surely one of the great American authors of our time
having written Death of a Salesman, All My Sons, After the Fall, The
Price, and The Incident at Vichy, among others.    The Crucible dates
back to 1953 and deals with the red-baiting of the McCarthy era,   The
play has since been performed all around the world including China.
Miller wrote the play because, he said, "I was being surrounded by a
feverish flood of accusations od Communism coming from everywhere.
There was no way to deal with that in ordinary conversations because if
you cast any doubt on the veracity of the accusations you might well be
linked to the Devil, which at that time was Communism.  In The
Crucible, Miller turns to our own Salem witch hunts where a mere
accusation that you were in league with the Devil was enough to ruin
your life, to have you executed.  As with McCarthy and the House
Un-American Committee, no proof was needed; a point of the finger
sufficed to ruin lives.
Today, with witches and Communism no longer the "threat," there are
still the religious Fundamentalists, the mis-named Moral Majority,
orthodoxy on college campuses.  Says Director Nicholas Hytner, "These
are our contemporary  Salems."
The story is that of Abigail Williams (Winona Ryder) who has had an
affair with John Proctor (Daniel Day Lewis).  When he realizes that he
has committed a sin, a great injustice to his faithful wife, he rejects
Abigail and returns to his wife, Elizabeth (Joan Allen), his real
love.  Abigail, however, will not let him off that easily.  In the
climate of  Salem she is able to accuse his wife of witchcraft as the
whole Massachusetts goes Devil-crazy.
Excellent acting by everyone (notably Paul Scofield as Judge Danforth)
brings a reality to the film and an understanding of what it is like to
live in a world where a mere accusation can destroy everyone.

Title
Review for Martha & Ethel (1994)
     Most of us have grown up without the help of a "nanny."  In fact,
few of us have ever spoken with one.  Who, then, would expect a
documentary about a couple of nannies would not only be of interest to
the average moviegoer but would actually turn into a 4-byter?
     Jyll Johnstone, the producer-Director, wanted to make a film about
Martha, the nanny who played such an important part in her life and
family for forty years.  Coincidentally, co-producer Barbara Ettinger
was visited by Johnstone, a childhood friend.  Jyll was fascinated by
the number of pictures on the walls of Ethel, Barbara's old nanny.
After a short time for thinking about it, Jyll and Barbara decided to
make the documentary.
     With World War II behind them, many talented and educated women
looked for something to replace their responsibilities to their
children with women who would care for them.  The film tells of the
love and the closeness of the two nannies with their charges and how
they influenced the Johnstone's five children and the six Ettingers.
     The film goes as far back as the 1930s when Catholic Martha was
nanny to a wealthy Jewish family in Baden-Baden, Germany.  Life became
difficult for her when Hitler came to power; her having worked for a
Jewish family was a black mark and so she moved to the U.S where in
1941 she was hired.
     Ethel, the daughter of a black South Carolina share cropper
family  eventually moved north and took on the job of raising the
little Ettinger children.  The difference in the two nannies is obvious
but that they both loved the children is equally apparent.
     The filmmakers, their children, and especially the nannies, are
interviewed all through the film and reveal their love and
attachments.   Although this review is written in mid February 1995,
mark MARTHA & ETHEL down as nominees for a Documentary Oscar come
February 1996.

Title
Review for Reine Margot, La (1994)
     The time is the late 1500s.  Religious wars are raging in France.
Catholics, such as Catherine de Medici (Verna Lisi) who was the Queen
Mother was on one side while the Protestants were on the other.  It was
not about God; it was about power and who gets to rule.
     It is at this point that the Queen Mother decides to lessen her
problems and seek a peace by marrying her beautiful daughter, Margot
(Isabelle Adjani) to the Protestant Henri of Navarre (Daniel Auteil).
Charles IX (Jean-Hugues Anglade) was one of three brothers of
Catherine.  All three brothers are believed by historians to have been
in love with their beautiful sister, Margot, to the point where incest
is suspected.  Given that it was rumored that she had bedded at least a
dozen prior to her marriage, the stories about her are believable.
     What makes the film difficult to follow is that much of it was
filmed in the dark so that it is difficult to know who is who when a
battle breaks out in which many thousands of people died including most
of the guests who Henri of Navarre brought to the wedding.  With
historians differing about who started the massacre, the audience is
left on its own.  What we do know is somewhere between 2,000 and
100,000 were massacred that day.
     It is the strong acting by the stunning Adjani that helps hold the
story and the film together while the audience will learn something
about history.
Directed by Patrice Chereau from a story by Alexandre Dumas.

Title
Review for High School High (1996)
          It is not bad enough that our schools are in bad shape.
It is not bad enough that illiteracy in the United States is so high.
What we do not need is a movie that lays it on in thick globs that
demean everyone.  In addition it is a boring film.
         I never liked Jon Lovitz whom I compare to Chevy Chase.  Both
have sneers that turn me off.  Lovitz, in addition, affects a dumb
look as his idea of being a comic.  In HIGH SCHOOL HIGH, he is a
teacher at a private school who opts to leave in order to teach at an
inner city school.  There he encounters every kind of mischief and
worse.  There he finds a principal (Louise Fletcher) who uses a
baseball bat to keep the "students" in line.   That this is the same
Fletcher who was so good in ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST, is hard
to believe. . . and it is very sad that she cannot get a better role.
         I would have liked to review more of the film but after one
half hour of this disgusting display I left.  It has been several
years since I walked out before a screening was over but that
happened twice in this one week.   Baaaad.
          This was supposed to be a NAKED GUN type of movie, or
AIRPLANE, but it fell flat on its face because it lacked the wit that
the other films had.

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
    ********************************************
Denzel Washington gives the performance of his life in this superb
film.   His speech, that of an inner city resident; his Afro and
beard; his one-on-one basketball playing with his son, and in every
scene throughout this excellent film, Washington is outstanding.  He
has always given fine performances in the many varied roles he has
played but this film takes him to new heights.
Jake Shuttlesworth (Washington) is in jail for having killed his
wife. In an argument with his young son when he threatens to punish
him, his wife tries to stop him.  When he shoves her away she
accidentally hits her head on the stove and dies.
Jake's used to teach his son everything he knew about basketball.
Jake played well but not quite well enough to be a pro.  When the
son, Jesus (Ray Allen who played as a guard for the Milwaukee Bucks
and in the NBA  Rookie All-Star game and who here makes his acting
debut) shows promise, he keeps after him, after him every moment,
toughening him, hoping the son will make it for the family, the only
way out of poverty or near poverty in a way that Jake has never able
to do..   Many blacks dream that same dream but of course a
minuscule number ever makes it big time.
HE GOT GAME is filled with The Right Stuff.   While Jake is in
prison, Warden Wyatt (Ned Beatty) offers him a deal:  The Governor,
a great basketball fan and an alumnus of Big State, is ready to
offer to commute Jake's sentence if he can get his number one-rated
son to sign a Letter Of Intent to go to Big State.    Gorgeous women
from various universities let Jesus know that they are ready to go
to bed with him if he signs up . . . and several already do. Agents
are ready to give him cars whose stereo system costs $35,000 and
there is more where that came from if he will allow them to manage
him. Poor Jesus, from a poverty family, has to use all his inner
strength to ward them off.   And then Jake appears to beg  him to go
to Big State, letting him know that if Jesus does not sign with Big
State, his father will be returned to jail.   HE GOT GAME lets us
know that basketball is Big Business.
Big Time Willie (Roger Guenveur Smith) does a bang up job with his
role as a gambler, pimp, and drug dealer as he tries to warn Jesus
(and the young blacks in the theater watching the movie)  about all
the temptations and why they should be strong and stay on the
straight and narrow.
Lastly, the film shows the problems blacks have with whites who
promise but who are not to be trusted.   HE GOT GAME covers a big
court.    The beautiful photography of the basketball does not keep
us from realizing this movie's ball is bouncing everywhere.  Music,
by Aaron Copland and others greatly enhance the film.
Jesus' "bodyguard" and friend is "Booger" (Hill Harper).  The
sister, Mary, whom Jesus looks after, is Zelda Harris.   Other
supporting  roles are played by Milla Jovich, Bill Nunn,  Jim Brown,
the lovely Rosario Dawson as Jesus' girlfriend, and Lonette McKee as
Jake's wife.

Title
Review for Carrington (1995)
     Around the time of WW1 and until 1932, Carrington, as she liked to
be called (Emma Thompson) was in love with Lytton Strachey (Jonathan
Pryce).  Theirs was not the usual relationship.  For one thing he was
gay; for another, he was fifteen years her senior.  Despite that, she
lived with him and loved him for his intelligence and his world famous
writings.  Living with him did not keep her from having affairs,
one-nighters and longer when she so chose.  Thus she opted to ignore
the Victorian mores of the period and be the Bohemian.
     Carrington had shown great promise as an artist when she went to
college and she continued her painting while living with Strachey. Each
admired the other so much they could not live without being together.
     While the book on which the film is based is Michael Holroyd's
LYTTON STRACHEY, the writer/director, Christopher Hampton, chose to
make Carrington the leading figure in the film.  He wanted the film to
be about an artist to whom life was more important than art.  Thompson
is vivacious and looks delightful in her short cropped hair; Pryce, in
a beard, is more sedate.  In any case, hers is the bigger role and
gives her a chance to show her stuff.
     This turns into one of those films that sound better on paper than
when made into a movie.  The period after the war was not a
particularly interesting one (to me) nor were the characters. I kept
thinking PBS would be a more suitable milieu for the film.
     Also in the cast are Steve Waddington as Carrington's husband, and
Samuel West.  Penelope Wilton has the role of Lady Ottoline Morrell.

Title
Review for Yao a yao yao dao waipo qiao (1995)
     When better films will be made than most of the current crop, when
we look back to see who were the really great directors, the name of
Zhang Yimou will be high on the list.  Lacking the equipment in China
that many countries have, he has nevertheless turned out some fabulous
films.  At age 45, he has already to his credit RED SORGHUM, JU DOU,
RAISE THE RED LANTERN, THE STORY OF QUI JU, TO LIVE and now, SHANGHAI
TRIAD.
     In most of his films his starring actress was Gong Li, beautiful
and a mere thirty years old in 1995.  Films she made with other
directors include FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE, among others.
     While the story takes place in the 1930s in Shanghai, with various
war lords running the opium and prostitution rings, the similarity to
present day China has angered the current Chinese government and there
is a question of whether it will be allowed to be released there.  The
Chinese government has recently forbade him to attend the New York Film
Festival's opening night presentation of the film.
     Mr. Tang (Li Boatian) is the equivalent of a Mafia godfather.  By
aiding Chiang Kai-Shek and helped kill many of the Communists who were
anti Chiank Kai-Shek, he awarded the warlord status.  In addition, he
has been permitted the "services" of the beautiful Xiao Jinbao (Gong
Li), a singer and prostitute.
     Mr. Tang trusts no one whose family name is not "Tang."  A
relative allows her fourteen-year-old son to be employed by Mr. Tang.
It is through the eyes of this boy, Tang Shuisheng (Wang Xiao Xiao)
that we, the audience, learn of what is happening.
     As the story unfolds we are surprised at its many twists and turns
which lead to a tragic ending of the film.  For days the film haunted
me; it is that kind of film.

Title
Review for Haine, La (1995)
     The world is becoming more and more difficult in which to live.
It is obvious to us here in the U.S.A.: the graffiti and gangs, the
riots with police, the gangs, the illiteracy, etc. But we are not
alone.  The whole planet appears to have caught the illness that has
become so pervasive.  Watching HATE, a French film, we are easily able
to relate to the problems the film shows exist there; they are the same
ones we have.  Even their manner of dress is American in style.  As
the saying goes, the rich get richer and the poor have children and
something has got to give one of these days.
     First we are shown a riot.  It is said that during the riot a
policeman shot a young Arab who is now in a hospital fighting for his
life.  He has three friends who live in a housing project that,
although fairly new, already is beginning to look shabby.  The three
friends are of different ethnic origins but are, nevertheless, very
close.  There is Vinz (Vincent Cassel) who is Jewish, Hubert  (Hubert
Kounde) who is black, and Said (Said Taghmaoui), an Arab.  They are
ominously angry about the shooting.
     There have been many riots and there has been much shooting but
this time it is not the same as usual because the policeman in the
fray lost his Smith & Wesson 44 and the three friends have it.  That
makes a big difference as we shall see.

Title
Review for Brassed Off (1996)
In Yorkshire, the town's livelihood depended on the pit mines.  This
was true of many towns in England; this film then  applies to the other
towns in England, South Wales and Southern Scotland that were
devastated when in 1992 many pit mines were being closed, leaving the
people, the miners, the storekeepers without any income.   For hundreds
of years these coal mines were the life's blood of the country and its
people. Suddenly, they were being shut, one after the other.
This film is about the plight of one representative town and how it
fought the authorities and the independent mine owners to keep the
mines open.  The title, BRASSED OFF, I assume is a pun meaning "pissed
off"  as indeed the townspeople were but also refers to the brass band
which they loved and gave them inspiration in a time of depression.
Leader and conductor of the band was Danny (Pete Postlethwaite) who had
worked in the mines all his life and was now slowly feeling the
debilitating effects of the lung disease to which miners are prone.
Danny's spirit kept the town from complete despair but was not enough
to keep the amateur musicians happy in the face of the mine's imminent
closing. Luckily, along came Gloria (Tara Fitzgerald) a lovely young
woman who used to live in the town but had left some years ago. . . and
she could play music beautifully, giving a lift to the unhappy people
at a time when they needed it badly..
Intermingling the story of the mine's closing  with the music of the
brass band gives the film a unique feeling.    They play beautifully
and spiritedly but when Danny becomes suddenly ill, the spirit of the
band falls to earth like so much coal being dumped.    Add to this that
Gloria is in love with a young miner, her teenage boyfriend Andy (Ewan
McGregor) when the miners find out she is employed by the Coal Board.
Despite her protests that she is on the side of the union, of the
miners, she is scorned.
This, then, is the very well told story of the mines, of the people and
their band. It also is the revealing story of the Coal Board.  When
Gloria accuses the head of the Board of having made up his mind to
close the mines two weeks ago before she could get statistics to
suggest they keep the mine open, he replies "That is not true.  We made
the decision to close the mines two years ago.".
Fine acting, uplifting music and a slam-bang ending make this a most
worthwhile film to attend.
Tautly Directed by Stephen Tompkinson.

Title
Review for O Que É Isso, Companheiro? (1997)
A tense film directed by Bruno Barreto, it recounts four momentous
days in Brazil in September 1969 when some dedicated but amateurish
young men and women decide to bring to the attention of the world
that Brazil had a military dictatorship and kept many left-wing young
people prisoner.   With all their efforts thwarted, with nothing they
do making world news, they decide to kidnap the American Ambassador,
Charles Elrick (Alan Arkin) and hold him hostage with threats of
execution if Brazil does not release its political prisoners.
The film is based on Fernando Gaberia's book, O QUE E ISSO,
COMPANHEIRO, (What's happening, Comrade?).    The script is by
Leopold Serran.   In fact, an actor portraying Gaberia, is a
principal character in the film.
To accomplish the kidnap and to call the military's torture of its
prisoners to the world, the amateur terrorists (revolutionaries?)
attempt a bank holdup.   While the true story of those four days is
an edge-of-the-seat story, it is also a human story, the important
parts taking place in the room of the house where the Ambassador is
being held.
Warned that each person must assume a pseudonym and further warned
that everyone must follow orders or risk being shot, the movie comes
down to these young people, idealists who realize they do not want to
die for the revolution.    It had not occurred to them only four days
ago that they might be caught and shot.    I knew people like that
who were in the Communist Party and gave up their parents and
friends, to disappear without so much as a "Good Bye"  to pursue "The
Cause."    That they later regretted what they had done is another
story and may make a good movie.
Alan Arkin plays the ambassador with great dignity.  He is even
sympathetic to the plight of these mostly young people.   The
Ambassador is against both the war in Vietnam and the military
dictatorship . . . but his job as Ambassador requires loyalty to his
government.
Pedro Cardoso has the role of writer Fernando Gaberia/Paulo.
Fernanda Torres is Maria 
Luis Fernand Guimares is Marcao
Claudia Abreu is Renee
A Brazilian film, in Portuguese with English subtitles.
Barreto does not allow any of his personal prejudices or political
beliefs to color the film. . . and for that he deserves much praise.

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
You must know that you are in for a thrill when the director of
one of the best films ever made, DAS BOOT, is in charge.  No one
compares to Wolfgang Petersen when it comes to making superb
films.   Witness, in addition to DAS BOOT, IN THE LINE OF FIRE and
OUTBREAK. Petersen, assisted by a great cast, does not disappoint.
AIRFORCE ONE, from beginning to end, is one frantic, tense action
film.
President John Marshall (Harrison Ford) has frequently proclaimed
that to give in to terrorists only invites more terrorism.  If he
is ever faced with a decision about terrorists, his message is
clear.  But what happens when his wife (Wendy Crewson) and teen
aged daughter (Liesel Matthews) are being held hostage aboard the
supposedly secure Airforce One, the President's plane? Perhaps not
quite as easy to be objective. That is exactly what faces President
Marshall.
Aided by a traitor on the staff of the President's security team,
a group of terrorists is allowed on the plane. They are supposed
to be a camera crew.   Soon after takeoff, they hijack the plane
and take everyone prisoner, except for the President himself who
is in hiding.   Leader of the terrorists is Ivan Korshunov (Gary
Oldman with a very, very thick Russian accent) who wants the
President to get the release of Gen. Alexander Radek (Jurgen
Prochnow . . . who was the captain in DAS BOOT).  Radek is a
tyrant who has been taking advantage of the chaos in Russia since
they were freed of the Communist yoke.   Gen. Radek is in a
Russian prison.
Meanwhile, back in Washington, D.C., Vice President Kathryn Bennett
(Glenn Close) is trying to find out what is happening.  When she
becomes aware of the demands, she phones Russian President Petrov
(Alan Woolf) to release Radek so President Marshall will not be
harmed. . . but Petrov says he is unable to do that.
But this is an action thriller and President Marshall is a capable
opponent of terrorists as he has served with distinction in Viet
Nam and knows how to handle himself in tough, dangerous
situations.   Harrison Ford is utterly believable as he hides in
various parts of the huge plane, shoots automatic weapons at the
enemy when he has a chance, wrestles with the terrorists while
hanging near an open hatch.  A little humor (very little) is
injected when Marshall throws one of the terrorists out the hatch,
exclaiming, "Get off my plane."
Exciting film.  Great cast.  You will not want to miss this one.
Other supporting roles are by Paul Guilfoyle, Xander Berkeley.
Wm. H. Macy, Dean Stockwell, Tom Everett and many others too
numerous to mention.

Title
Review for Scorta, La (1993)
     From the moment the machine guns rattle and the old father runs
out into the street, letting out a heart-rending cry when he sees his
son has been assassinated in a car, along with a judge, the action
never lets up ... and this is before the opening titles.  Timely,
because of the political corruption being unveiled in Italy, the film
depicts the lengths to which the rightwing government officials and the
Mafia will go to silence those who would expose and jail them.
     In real-life Italy, the Mafia in 1992 had placed a bomb under the
car of anti-Mafia Judge Giovanni Falcone as he was on his way to
Palermo airport.  The judge, his wife, and three police bodyguards
were killed.  Based on incdents such as that, La Scorta takes you
right into the action in one of the most exciting, tense thrillers in
years.
     Judge De Francesco (Carlo Checchi) has been sent to this Sicilian
town to investigate the murder of his predecessor.  For his protection,
although he says he does not need them, four body guards are assigned
to look after him, to guard him ... and watching how they do just
that will keep you on the edge of your seat.
     There is Angelo (Claudio Amendola) who has come from Rome to his
home town in Sicily to join the Escort.  His chief is Andrea (Enrico Lo
Verso).  The other two guards are Raffaela (Tony Sperandeo) and Fabio
(Ricky Memphis).  All have bonded together with the one object:
protecting the judge.  That, of course, is not an easy job as they have
to be on the lookout for potential car bombs, grenades, and other forms
of mayhem.
     When the judge finds that there are politicians who are in the
pocket of the well-owners who sell water to the city, he has the water
shut off, raising the hackles of the local government who then try to
defame him and antagonize everyone against him  All sorts of ploys are
used by both sides and all are nail-biters.  One of the beauties of the
film is that, shunning a Hollywood climax, it opts for truth and a
realistic ending.  You will love it!

Title
Review for Birdcage, The (1996)
          It was way back in 1978 that La Cage Aux Folles, the
hilarious French film about homosexuals, the transvestite nightclub,
the owner, his partner (in more ways than one), first arrived here.
It was an instant critical and box office success.  That could only
mean one thing: a sequel.  Three years later that arrived but the
truism about sequels held and so that was an instant flop.  Since
everyone thinks "I can do anything better than you," another sequel
arrived 3 years later and it was an abomination.  That brings us to
today's version,  "The birdcage ."   directed by Mike Nichols and
oooh!. Vive la difference..
          Nichols'  version brings the story not merely up to date but
demonstrates the difference between the "family values."  rightwing
politicians are pushing and what the value of a family really is.
And Nichols' direction plus Elaine May's script are right on target.
          About the cast:  Everyone is exactly right; the casting is
perfect.  So much has been said and written about Robin Williams (who
here plays the father of a "straight" son) it is almost superfluous to
say more.  But in a couple of seconds he can take you from laughter to
tears and back.  Would that there were more fathers like Armand
Goldman, the gay father.
          In the most wonderful performance of a very successful
career in cinema, the one who got to me as the most brilliant was
Dianne Weist as Louise Keeley, the wife of the conservative Senator
(Gene Hackman) who are the parents of the lovely Barbara (Calista
Flockhart).  Special mention should be made, too, of Dan Futterman.
who plays Armand's loving, devoted son to his father and father's
partner,  Albert (Nathan Lane.)  Lane, who  is mostly known for his
work on the Broadway stage, is terrific.  The whole movie is
terrific.  Did I like it?  No, I loved it..

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
The story, an original screenplay by Ronald Bass, is plausible
enough;  the acting by the principals in this romantic farce is so
good the film does not appear to be contrived.   Julianne (Julia
Roberts at her best) split with her lover Michael (Dermot Mulroney,
handsome and sincere) some nine years ago but remained "best
friends" . . . something I have never been able to believe likely in
relationships.  Once you are lovers, you cannot go back to being
just "friends."   At least in my non-professional opinion.
That is not the point, though, is it?   In this film, that is what
happened, at least in the beginning.   Now, Julia hears that Michael
has found himself someone he loves, Kimmy (Cameron Diaz) and that he
is about to get married. Julia,  very disturbed by that news because suddenly in danger of losing him she realizes she is still in love with him.    What is a girl to do but fly to Chicago,    a few days before the wedding,  to the scheduled nuptials and
UNschedule it. No doubt in Julia's mind that turning on some of her
seductiveness which never before has failed her will make Michael
realize what he will be missing if he were to marry this new person.
Arriving in the city she gets in touch with Michael, ready to turn
on all her charm.  He introduces her to Kimmy . . . and Julia is
quickly made aware that this will not be as easy as she thought.
Kimmy is very pretty, very warm and friendly, and educated.  Only
some dirty work by Julia can possibly derail the impending marriage.
It is at this point the film begins to lose some of its impetus and
believability.    it also becomes pretty obvious whom Michael will
end up marrying.
Supporting actors include Rupert Everett, Philip Bosco, Rachel
Griffiths, M Emmet Walsh, Carrie Preston and Susan Sullivan.

Title
Review for Van, The (1996)
THE COMMITMENTS in 1991 introduced us to the mythical (but
representative) town of  Barrytown in North Dublin.   That was the
first of a trilogy written by Roddy Doyle. You may recall that it was
about an Irish soul band.  This was followed three years later by THE
SNAPPER, about a young woman who becomes pregnant but who will not
reveal who the father is.
The Commitmentswas directed by Alan Parker.  Both Snapper and THE VAN
are the work of Stephen Frears.
Barrytown is a quiet town on the surface but if you look around there
are many stories, funny and sad.  Take Bimbo (Donal O'Kelly) for
instance.  In a town where there are all too many unemployed, Bimbo
gets a pink slip . . . and now he is one of those without hope who hang
out in bars.  But Bimbo is not really one of them; he will work at
anything honest if he can only find something.
Out of the blue, Bimbo realizes that with Ireland qualifying for the
World Cup in football (soccer), there will be many people glued to
their TV sets, unable to cook.  If he can get a van and set it up as a
catering truck, he can make a good bit of change and be his own boss at
the same time,    He also wants to share his new enterprise with his
best friend, Larry (Colm Meany) whom he hires to work with him as a
partner.  Larry's first contribution is to name the van, BIMBO'S
BURGERS.
Another buddy, Weslie (Brendan O'Carroll) finds a van on an empty lot
filled with junk. The van looks "like the inside of a leper," to quote
Bimbo; filthy, rusty, and an engine that will not start up. However,
nothing is going to stop the two friends who have the car towed home
with the aid of hundreds of the town's children joyfully pushing the
vehicle as it is being towed. Bimbo and  Larry work on the van until it
is looking half human. Someone else gets the motor to run and away they
go to the pub where everyone will be watching the games.
It would be nice to report that all went well, that they got tons of
customers and that they made lots of money and lived happily ever
after.  Real life and movies do not work like that and so we are
witness to the trials and tribulations of two friends trying to run a
catering van when neither has any experience.
Not too far into the enterprise, they have a falling out and Larry
wants to quit not only the partnership but their friendship as well
while Bimbo decides what must be done to keep from losing the
friendship of Larry.
Interspersed between the sad parts and the frustrations, there is lots
of comedy provided by Larry who is a big blustering type.
Pity the poor worker who has a family to support, wants to work, but
can find no job.
Others in the cast include Ger Ryan, Caroline Rothwell, Neily Conroy, Ruaidhri Conroy, and Stuart Dunne. 

Title
Review for Fathers' Day (1997)
There are few productions that are more risky than taking a perfectly
good movie and doing a remake.   How do you improve on a movie that is
just about perfect . . . and why would you want to do that?     In this
case, the film was a subtitled French comedy that despite  raves from
audiences and critics played only in  art-houses for no other reason
than that subtitles are anathema to American audiences.    To insure
that this remake will not be a fiasco, some  heavy professionals were
brought in:  the director, the screenwriters and the cast.  Needless to
add, the movie is hilarious, a worthy successor to Les Comperes which
starred, in 1984, Pierre Richard and Gerard Depardieu.
This time around the film is called  FATHERS' DAY.   Several of the
gags in the original film are used again  such as the head-banging.
The story, with but few exceptions, remains the same.   In Les
Comperes,  (The Godfathers) Depardieu's role was that of a journalist
with some Mafia-types after him.   Here, Jack  (Billy Crystal), is a
well-to-do lawyer.
The story is of a married woman, Collette Andrews (Nastassja Kinski)
whose 16-year-old son. Scott (Charlie Hofheimer) has run away from
home.   When Collette feels that her husband, Bob, (Bruce Greenwood, is
not up to the task of finding their son, she embarks on her own.  First
she visits an old boyfriend, Jack, to enlist his aid in looking for her
son. Jack asks why, after 17 years of their not having seen each other
does she suddenly think of him as someone who would help her.  "Because
you are his father."  She explains that when last they saw each other
she was pregnant but did not tell him.  He asks if she has a picture of
the son;  she shows him a photo. Examining it, offhand he sees no
resemblance.  Collette tells him that when Scott smiles, you can see
the resemblance.   "Do you have a photo of him smiling? " he asks
her.   That funny line was also in the original film.
Feeling that Jack is probably not going to help her, she goes to the
home of Dale with whom she spent some sack time  in Berkeley, also 17
years ago.  Same routine: "because you are his father."    A very funny
bit (also in the original) is Dale about to commit suicide, a gun in
his mouth when the phone rings.  He talks with the gun in his mouth.
Dale is a "nebbish" for whom nothing ever went right.  He has all kinds
of phobias, cries easily and has a few suicide failures.     But
hearing that he has a son, he is delighted and asks no hard questions.
Yes,  he will be very happy to search for his son.
Then begins the search which includes visiting the father of the girl
with whom Scott ran away. Then visiting the girl's mother.  Each of
these adventures is very, very funny as only a one-two punch such as
Robin Williams and Billy Crystal, good friends in real life, can
deliver.   They work extremely well together to make this a most
enjoyable film. When you also have the two funniest screenwriters,
Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel who together wrote Night Shift, Splash,
Spies Like us, Parenthood, City Slicker I and II, A League of Their
Own, Greedy, Mr. Saturday Night  . and more, you cannot miss.
Julia Louis-Dreyfus, who is best known for starring  on the Seinfeld
show on TV, has a rather small part as Jack's wife.

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
The opening scene of CONTACT is the most awesome (in the sense of
"fantastic") several minutes of great special effects as we are
hurtled away from Earth at a huge speed.   Our planet becomes a
globe, getting smaller and smaller as we speed by the other planets
of our solar system.  Earth becomes a mere dot as we continue the
speeding away from our solar system, past the Milky Way and on and
on.  Simply stunning.   That alone is just about worth the price
of admission.
CONTACT could not have chosen a better time for its theatrical
release.  While through the ages people have wondered about the
stars and many have begun to wonder if there were possibly some
kind of life in some distant solar system, the soft landing of our
space probe on Mars must certainly have revived new speculation and
interest.
While Carl Sagan, on whose book CONTACT is based, when asked if he
believed in some highly-evolved life elsewhere in the infinitely
vast universe, replied "The key word in that question is 'believe.'
And in my view, you believe only on the basis of compelling
evidence."   In short, that evidence was never forthcoming to him.
Perhaps more important, however, was how he and his wife, Ann
Druyan,  felt about how such an event if it ever did happen would
affect the inhabitants of our planet.  That is what his book is
about.   What happens to religious belief if it turns out that
"there is someone out there" when according to the Bible, God
placed Man on Earth; that the stars and sun and moon are there only
to give us light. Sagan also wanted us to realize the incredible,
just about incomprehensible, vastness of the universe.
What happens to those who see aliens from another planet as
potential enemies.  In the film, Michael Kitz, (James Woods) is the
head of government security, reacting to the news that we are
getting a message form outer space as a time for increased
security.    Never mind that it is pointed out to him that it is
more probably that "anyone" capable of contacting us must have a
superior intelligence and would be unlikely to be warlike as we
stupid Earthlings are.
Ever since Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster) was a little child, she was
interested in stars and space.  Many were the hours she spent
listening to her short wave radio hoping to hear something other
than static from outer space.   While still young, her father died.
Ellie continued her studies and went on to become a respected
scientist in the field of radio.  Pretty nearly the whole
scientific community looked upon her obsession as being on the kook
side but her persistence got her some time to use the satellite
antennas to search the heavens.
Hour after hour, day after day, Ellie listened until one day she
heard something odd, something she had never heard before, and it
had a pattern.   It was coming from a distant star, Vega.  Getting
her fellow scientists to monitor the sounds, they discover that the
noises (sounding like grunts from a Jurassic Park dinosaur) were in
fact spaced to coincide with prime numbers.   That was proof this
was not some strange static.   Idiots such as Michael Kitz wanted
to know how come the messages were not in English.  Ellie had to
explain to him that English is not likely to be spoken in other
solar systems but mathematics would be a universal language.
Quickly, all the nations begin to ponder the significance while the
hucksters get busy with Vega fairs and people come flocking to them
as if to a picnic . . . or looking at the antennas as they would
when they believe a picture of Jesus is weeping.   In short, the
world is in a turmoil and so are their leaders.   President Clinton
gives some reassuring words on TV.
The story has many facets, all of interest.  Jodie Foster give her
usual wonderful performance.  Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey), is
a respected religious scholar and high up in the government
hierarchy.   He and Ellie are in love . . . more or less.
S R Hadden (John Hurt), is an eccentric billionaire who takes an
interest in Ellie's behalf to help her combat those who would thwart
her.  For instance, the first trip to VEGA is not given to Ellie
who is most deserving, but to some other prominent scientist, David
Drumlin (Tom Skerritt).   Rachel Constantine (Angela Bassett) is
the President's press secretary.
CONTACT is one terrific film.  The sets, which include a space ship
readied to visit Vega, are perfect.  Many are the questions that
are raised as various events unfold.   These are answered in a most
satisfying conclusion.   There was one point where I thought there
was a cop-out; I could not believe Sagan would have opted for that.
However it turned out to be logical, not at all the cop-out I had
feared and I sighed with relief.  I wanted nothing to spoil this
most entertaining, exciting and informative movie that will give you
pause to ponder some of the questions it raised.
Directed by Robert Zemeckis who gave us FORREST GUMP.

Title
Review for Quest for Camelot (1998)
Warner Bros.  Studio's animation films go back to 1958 when it won an
Oscar for KNIGHTY KNIGHT BUGS.    The current offering is its first full
length animation, one that kids should like very much.
 Based on the Camelot legends and the sword of Excalibur, it makes a
departure from the story by having a girl as the protagonist   This was
the time of King Arthur and his Knights of the Round Table when Knighthood
was in flower, as the saying goes.     Sir Lionel (voice of Gabriel Byrne)
had a daughter Kayley (voice of Jessalyn Gilsig; singing by Andrea Corr)
who wished to emulate her father and to also become a knight.     When
Ruber (Gary Oldman) and his equally vicious aid Griffin (Bronson Pinchot)
steal King Arthur's sword Excalibur, it is Kayley who sets out on the
dangerous mission of recapturing the sword and saving Camelot.
Her adventure leads her through lush, beautiful  forests inhabited with
strange animals that lend themselves to talented animators.   There she
meets a young, blind man, Garrett (Cary Elwes , singing by Bryan White)
who joins forces with her.   Along with them is a comical two-headed
dragon (Eric Idle and Don Rickles).    They also meet up with old Merlin,
the magician, (Sir John Gielgud).   As well, they rescue Kayley's mother,
Lady Juliana (Jane Seymour).
While the movie is sure to please the young, it does lack a bit of
excitement. The drawings are well done; the story is excellent.  And the
cast behind the animation is perfect.  Still, it could have used some
spark to light the fire to all of it.  Unfortunately, it did not quite do
that.
The story is based on THE KING'S DAMOSEL by Vera Chapman. Original songs
composed by David Foster and Carole Bayer Sager. Musical score by Patrick
Doyle.

Title
Review for Dracula: Dead and Loving It (1995)
     It appears that Mel Brooks ought to retire from his long and
successful career as both actor and director.  His last films, LIFE
STINKS and DRACULA: DEAD AND LOVING IT are sooo bad, it's pitiful.  I
would like to remember him for the great laughs he gave us over a long
career rather than for the ridiculous one note films he has been
turning out these past few years.  Mel, quit while you are still
ahead.
     In LIFE STINKS the whole story revolved around a very wealthy man
who gave up his all for one month to prove he could survive in the
sordid world.  In DRACULA: DEAD AND LOVING IT, Dracula is a bumbling
idiot whose every scheme fails miserably.
     Satire is the most difficult form of comedy to write and
perform.  It's either brilliant or falls flat on its face.  This one
is not in the brilliant class despite heroic "shtick" by Leslie Nelson
as Dracula and Amy Yasbeck as the undersexed woman he tries to seduce.
Another "vampirette" is Lysette Anthony.
     Peter MacNicol is a groveling slave (remember Mel kissing the
boots of his lord and master in the wonderful 12 CHAIRS?) and Mel
himself plays a "vampireologist."   With the exception of 2 gags that
ARE funny, the remainder is an awful bore.  Mel: quit.

Title
Review for Mrs. Winterbourne (1996)
     As an actor, Richard Benjamin always turned in a good
performance.  With rare exceptions, his directorial endeavors somehow
have fallen flat.  Mrs. Winterbourne is an example of the latter.  What
saves the film is the talent of Shirley MacLaine, who plays the title
role.  MacLaine is a born actress.  When, in the film, she does a
momentary movement of her hands and head I suddenly remembered that her
original fame was as a dancer.  The slight momentary movements were so
graceful, so delightful, so filled with Class.
     It is the story that turns the film down into little more than
just another ordinary movie.  The first scene is of a man lying on a
bed, a couple of bullet holes in him.  The TV is on but nobody is
listening.  He,  Steve DeCunzo (Loren Dean), is dead.. How and why and
by whom did DeCunzo meet his Maker?   Flashback.
     Connie Doyle (Ricki Lake) is a young woman on a train but neither
knows nor cares where it is going.  Homeless, broke and in the last
months of pregnancy she is sorely in need of a miracle.  The film's
author provides exactly that.  Based on the novel, "I Married A Dead
Man" by Cornell Woolrich, a series of unlikely events happen
unexpectedly.  There is a train accident and the penniless Connie ends
up in a hospital. She is mistakenly thought, by everyone, to be Mrs.
Wellbourne's daughter-in-law  (also pregnant) who was on the same train
on her way to meet her mother-in-law for the first time..  Both she
and her husband, Hugh Winterbourne (Brendan Frazer) are killed in the
derailment.
     Once we have accepted this series of coincidences, the film moves
along nicely even to the point where the dead Hugh has a twin brother,
Bill.  Connie has to keep the family from discovering who she really is
while her "brother-in-law'" Bill appears to be suspicious.  Because the
actors are so good, because Connie is so charming and Bill so handsome
we are in their rooting for them.  This mistaken identity bit is a
kind of romantic comedy . . . and story of a murder.  Well told.  And,
again, there;s MacLaine.

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
     Living as we do in a crazy world, the weirder the story, the more
likely it is to be true.   Put the story in the hands of the Coen
brothers and we get a reality-based film that is quirky, funny and
still believable.   This one takes place in Minnesota in 1987.
Beautiful snow with photography by Britain's Roger Deakins.
     Jerry Lundegaard (William H Macy) is the business manager of an
auto sales company.  Business has been so poor that he is in dire
straits, needing money badly enough to come up with the idea of hiring
a couple of thugs (Steve Buscemi and Peter Stormare) to kidnap the wife
he loves.  She will be held for ransom, unhurt, while Jerry will hit up
his wealthy father-in-law, Wade Gustafson (Harve Presnell) for the
money to pay the kidnappers.   The kidnappers and Jerry will split the
ransom.
     A few mishaps and the whole scheme falls apart when several people
get shot.  This brings in the local police  chief, Marge Gunderson
(Frances McDormand) who is several months pregnant.  She can still say
"Yah" (for "yes") with the best of them.  While everyone in the cast is
more than adequate (especially Macy), it is McDormand who runs away
with the film.

Title
Review for Everest (1998)
For starters, anyone who has never attended an IMAX screening has
missed out on a new kind of amazing movie.   With a screen five to
eight stories high and some ninety feet wide, the panorama is
magnificent.   Add that IMAX films are photographed in 70 millimeter
film so that unbelievably crisp, sharp focus prevails  This huge
encompassing brings you right into the picture as if you were there.
In this thrilling movie, a documentary of mountain climbers, both men
and women, who want to conquer the very highest mountain peak on
Earth located in China we are made to feel as if we know them; we
understand to some degree their drive, their belief they can make it
to the top despite many attempts by others having ended in the
tragedy of frostbite and death because of the terrible windstorms and
avalanches.
MacGillivray Freeman Films was fortunate enough to have two veterans
of Mt. Everest leading the group, filmmaker David Brashears and Ed
Viesturs, America's leading Himalayan mountaineer.   Jamling Tenzing
of Norway and Araceli Segarra, the latter wanting to be the first
Spanish woman to reach the peak, were among those along with 8 other
climbers, 50 porters and 100 yaks who were on this expedition.   The
cameras follow the intrepid adventurers ascent, the interim places
where they stop to rest, the Sherpa villages, the base camps.
 With oxygen content of the air becoming thinner and thinner with
each new altitude, they are aware that the body must be allowed to
accustom itself.  To go straight up, even if one could, would mean
death.  These are some of the things the climbers have to keep in
mind.    Later, when they are near the top, the lack of oxygen
combines with the utter weariness to cause them to lose their normal
behavior and reasoning.   Climbing is but one of the obstacles they
have to face.
We are shown the gear used to climb, to span chasms,   But the
filming of the ascent required heroic work of getting cameras and
film to the top where helicopters found it hard to go because there
was not enough air to be gripped by the blades.
Breathtaking vistas, sweeping panoramas, fierce winds and snow storms
are the norm in this magnificent film.  For an adventure unlike most
others, EVEREST cannot be beat.

Title
Review for Home for the Holidays (1995)
     It is hard to believe but Jodie Foster, a most talented young
actress, has appeared in thirty-two films.  When she further became a
director, in the wonderful LITTLE MAN TATE, no one could deny that here
was someone very special.  So when HOME FOR THE HOLIDAYS was about to
be screened I could hardly wait.  Sadly, the movie is very mediocre, to
which we must add, even the best do not always succeed every time.
     With a great cast and a brilliant director, the fault lies mostly
with the story itself.   My having spent many years at family
gatherings at holidays, with Thanksgivings being the most memorable,
and all of them joyful, it was difficult to relate to HOME FOR THE
HOLIDAYS where holiday gatherings where close relatives attended every
year but wished they did not have to.
     Claudia Larson (Holly Hunter) has just been a victim of
"downsizing" (what an ugly euphemism!) at her job in an art gallery.
Her 15-year-old daughter says she is not going to the Dinner but will
stay home with her boy friend and "go all the way."  With this and more
on Claudia's mind and heart she takes a plane to her family in
Baltimore.
     Mom (Anne Bancroft) and Dad (Charles Durning) a most loving
couple, are, as usual, the hosts.  Eccentric Aunt Glady is there, as
are Claudia's sister and brother-in-law and their children.  Brother
Tommy (Robert Downey, Jr.) is there, too, but only because Claudia felt
she could not endure the gathering without him. He arrives with his gay
friend, Leo Fish (Dylan McDermott) which astonishes most of the family
who did not know about Robert and Leo.
     Bickering abounds before, during and after dinner.  Again, I found
it hard to relate to that.  And through it all, much of the dialogue
(screenplay by W. D. Richter) seems as if most are speaking lines
rather than real-life talk.  It was difficult to warm up to the family
and the movie.  With all that was going on, there was nothing exciting
to make me want to know what happened next.  Nothing much did.

Title
Review for Only You (1994)
     So what if it is only a romantic fairy tale, a comedy, the kind
they used to do in the 1930s?  Maybe that is what we need right around
now after so many heavy films, something we can just sit back and enjoy
and laugh and not worry about whether or not anything up on the screen
could possibly happen.  If you are in the mood for that, this is you
movie.
     Marisa Tomei is so pretty in a non-Hollywood way, so wholesome and
lovable that you just wish you could hold her in your arms and live
happily ever after.  When, as Faith, she meets up with Peter (Robert
Downey Jr.) another handsome, non-grunge, and he needs only one glimpse
to fall completely in love with her, we are delighted for them.
     When Faith was a child, her Ouija board came up with the name,
D-A-M-O-N B-R-A-D-L-E-Y, as the man she would one day meet and marry.
Now, grown up, Faith visits a Fortune Teller who sees in the crystal
ball the name, Damon Bradley; Faith realizes this can be no mere
coincidence.  But she is about to be married to a podiatrist.  And when
her fiance's old school friend, on his way to Venice, Italy, phones to
wish her well, and *his* name is Damon Bradley, well!
     Her sister-in-law and best friend, Kate (Bonnie Hunt), is having a
problem with her husband's infidelity so when Faith says she absolutely
must go to Venice in search of Damon Bradley, Kate takes off with
her.   There they meet Peter, a shoe salesman,  who pretends that he is
Bradley ... and the fun really starts with many twists and turns and
one delightful surprise following another.
     Rounding out the cast are Joaquim De Almeida, Fisher Stevens,
Billy Zane, Siobhan Fallon, John Benjamin Hickey and Adam LeFevre.
     Written by Diane Drake.  This is her first produced screenplay.
